FORM 10-K
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
(Mark One)
☒ ANNUAL REPORT PURSUANT TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d)
OF THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934
For the fiscal year ended December 31, 2020
OR
☐ TRANSITION REPORT PURSUANT TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d)
OF THE SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934
For the transition period from ______ to
Commission File Number: 001-8610
AT&T INC.
Incorporated under the laws of the State of Delaware
I.R.S. Employer Identification Number 43-1301883
208 S. Akard St., Dallas, Texas, 75202
Telephone Number 210-821-4105
Securities registered pursuant to Section 12(b) of the Act:
  Name of each exchange
Title of each class Trading Symbol(s) on which registered
Common Shares (Par Value $1.00 Per Share) T New York Stock Exchange
Depositary Shares, each representing a 1/1000th interest in a share of
5.000% Perpetual Preferred Stock, Series A T PRA New York Stock Exchange
Depositary Shares, each representing a 1/1000th interest in a share of
4.750% Perpetual Preferred Stock, Series C T PRC New York Stock Exchange
AT&T Inc. 1.875% Global Notes due December 4, 2020 T 20 New York Stock Exchange
AT&T Inc. 2.650% Global Notes due December 17, 2021 T 21B New York Stock Exchange
AT&T Inc. 1.450% Global Notes due June 1, 2022 T 22B New York Stock Exchange
AT&T Inc. 2.500% Global Notes due March 15, 2023 T 23 New York Stock Exchange
AT&T Inc. 2.750% Global Notes due May 19, 2023 T 23C New York Stock Exchange
AT&T Inc. Floating Rate Global Notes due September 5, 2023 T 23D New York Stock Exchange
AT&T Inc. 1.050% Global Notes due September 5, 2023 T 23E New York Stock Exchange
AT&T Inc. 1.300% Global Notes due September 5, 2023 T 23A New York Stock Exchange
AT&T Inc. 1.950% Global Notes due September 15, 2023 T 23F New York Stock Exchange
AT&T Inc. 2.400% Global Notes due March 15, 2024 T 24A New York Stock Exchange
AT&T Inc. 3.500% Global Notes due December 17, 2025 T 25 New York Stock Exchange
AT&T Inc. 0.250% Global Notes due March 4, 2026 T 26E New York Stock Exchange
  Name of each exchange
Title of each class Trading Symbol(s) on which registered
AT&T Inc. 1.800% Global Notes due September 5, 2026 T 26D New York Stock Exchange
AT&T Inc. 2.900% Global Notes due December 4, 2026 T 26A New York Stock Exchange
AT&T Inc. 1.600% Global Notes due May 19, 2028 T 28C New York Stock Exchange
AT&T Inc. 2.350% Global Notes due September 5, 2029 T 29D New York Stock Exchange
AT&T Inc. 4.375% Global Notes due September 14, 2029 T 29B New York Stock Exchange
AT&T Inc. 2.600% Global Notes due December 17, 2029 T 29A New York Stock Exchange
AT&T Inc. 0.800% Global Notes due March 4, 2030 T 30B New York Stock Exchange
AT&T Inc. 2.050% Global Notes due May 19, 2032 T 32A New York Stock Exchange
AT&T Inc. 3.550% Global Notes due December 17, 2032 T 32 New York Stock Exchange
AT&T Inc. 5.200% Global Notes due November 18, 2033 T 33 New York Stock Exchange
AT&T Inc. 3.375% Global Notes due March 15, 2034 T 34 New York Stock Exchange
AT&T Inc. 2.450% Global Notes due March 15, 2035 T 35 New York Stock Exchange
AT&T Inc. 3.150% Global Notes due September 4, 2036 T 36A New York Stock Exchange
AT&T Inc. 2.600% Global Notes due May 19, 2038 T 38C New York Stock Exchange
AT&T Inc. 1.800% Global Notes due September 14, 2039 T 39B New York Stock Exchange
AT&T Inc. 7.000% Global Notes due April 30, 2040 T 40 New York Stock Exchange
AT&T Inc. 4.250% Global Notes due June 1, 2043 T 43 New York Stock Exchange
AT&T Inc. 4.875% Global Notes due June 1, 2044 T 44 New York Stock Exchange
AT&T Inc. 4.000% Global Notes due June 1, 2049 T 49A New York Stock Exchange
AT&T Inc. 4.250% Global Notes due March 1, 2050 T 50 New York Stock Exchange
AT&T Inc. 3.750% Global Notes due September 1, 2050 T50A New York Stock Exchange
AT&T Inc. 5.350% Global Notes due November 1, 2066 TBB New York Stock Exchange
AT&T Inc. 5.625% Global Notes due August 1, 2067 TBC New York Stock Exchange
Securities registered pursuant to Section 12(g) of the Act: None.
Indicate by check mark if the registrant is a well-known seasoned issuer, as defined in Rule 405 of the Securities Act.
Yes ☒ No ☐
Indicate by check mark if the registrant is not required to file reports pursuant to Section 13 or Section 15(d) of the Act. Yes ☐ No ☒
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant (1) has filed all reports required to be filed by Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities
Exchange Act of 1934 during the preceding 12 months (or for such shorter period that the registrant was required to file such reports),
and (2) has been subject to such filing requirements for the past 90 days. Yes ☒ No ☐
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant has submitted electronically every Interactive Data File required to be submitted pursuant
to Rule 405 of Regulation S-T during the preceding 12 months (or for such shorter period that the registrant was required to submit such
files). Yes ☒ No ☐
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant is a large accelerated filer, an accelerated filer, a non-accelerated filer, a smaller reporting
company, or an emerging growth company. See definition of “large accelerated filer,” “accelerated filer,” “smaller reporting company,”
and “emerging growth company” in Rule 12b-2 of the Exchange Act.
Large Accelerated Filer ☒ Accelerated Filer ☐
Non-accelerated filer ☐ Smaller reporting company ☐
Emerging growth company ☐
If an emerging growth company, indicate by check mark if the registrant has elected not to use the extended transition period for
complying with any new or revised financial accounting standards provided pursuant to Section 13(a) of the Exchange Act. ☐
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant has filed a report on and attestation to its management's assessment of the effectiveness of
its internal control over financial reporting under Section 404(b) of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act (15 U.S.C. 7262(b)) by the registered public
accounting firm that prepared or issued its audit report. ☒
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant is a shell company (as defined in Rule 12b-2 of the Exchange Act).
Yes ☐ No ☒
Based on the closing price of $30.23 per share on June 30, 2020, the aggregate market value of our voting and non-voting common stock
held by non-affiliates was $215 billion.
At February 12, 2021, common shares outstanding were 7,131,763,496.
DOCUMENTS INCORPORATED BY REFERENCE
(1)Portions of AT&T Inc.’s Notice of 2021 Annual Meeting and Proxy Statement dated on or about March 11, 2021 to be filed within
the period permitted under General Instruction G(3) (Parts III and IV).
AT&T Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
TABLE OF CONTENTS
Item Page
PART I
1. Business 1
1A. Risk Factors 14
2. Properties 23
3. Legal Proceedings 23
4. Mine Safety Disclosures 23
Information about our Executive Officers 24
PART II
5.Market for Registrant’s Common Equity, Related Stockholder Matters and Issuer Purchases of Equity
Securities 25
6. Selected Financial Data 27
7. Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations 28
7A. Quantitative and Qualitative Disclosures about Market Risk 60
8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data 66
9. Changes in and Disagreements with Accountants on Accounting and Financial Disclosure 127
9A. Controls and Procedures 127
9B. Other Information 127
PART III
10. Directors, Executive Officers and Corporate Governance 128
11. Executive Compensation 128
12. Security Ownership of Certain Beneficial Owners and Management and Related Stockholder Matters 129
13. Certain Relationships and Related Transactions, and Director Independence 130
14. Principal Accountant Fees and Services 130
PART IV
15. Exhibits and Financial Statement Schedules 130
16. Form 10-K Summary 133
AT&T Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
PART I
ITEM 1. BUSINESS
GENERAL
AT&T Inc. (“AT&T,” “we” or the “Company”) is a holding company incorporated under the laws of the State of Delaware in 1983 and
has its principal executive offices at 208 S. Akard St., Dallas, Texas, 75202 (telephone number 210-821-4105). We maintain an internet
website at www.att.com. (This website address is for information only and is not intended to be an active link or to incorporate any
website information into this document.) We file electronically with the Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC) required reports on
Form 8-K, Form 10-Q and Form 10-K; proxy materials; registration statements on Forms S-3 and S-8, as necessary; and other forms or
reports as required. The SEC maintains a website (www.sec.gov) that contains reports, proxy and information statements, and other
information regarding issuers that file electronically with the SEC. We make available, free of charge, on our website our annual report
on Form 10-K, our quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, current reports on Form 8-K and all amendments to those reports as soon as
reasonably practicable after such reports are electronically filed with, or furnished to, the SEC. We also make available on that website,
and in print, if any stockholder or other person so requests, our “Code of Ethics” applicable to all employees and Directors, our
“Corporate Governance Guidelines,” and the charters for all committees of our Board of Directors, including Audit, Human Resources
and Corporate Governance and Nominating. Any changes to our Code of Ethics or waiver of our Code of Ethics for senior financial
officers, executive officers or Directors will be posted on that website.
A reference to a “Note” refers to the Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements in Item 8.
History
AT&T, formerly known as SBC Communications Inc. (SBC), was formed as one of several regional holding companies created to hold
AT&T Corp.’s (ATTC) local telephone companies. On January 1, 1984, we were spun-off from ATTC pursuant to an anti-trust consent
decree, becoming an independent publicly-traded telecommunications services provider. At formation, we primarily operated in five
southwestern states.
Following our formation, we have expanded our footprint and operations by acquiring various businesses, most significantly:
•Our subsidiaries merged with Pacific Telesis Group in 1997, Southern New England Telecommunications Corporation in 1998
and Ameritech Corporation in 1999, thereby expanding our wireline operations as the incumbent local exchange carrier (ILEC)
into a total of 13 states.
•In 2005, we merged one of our subsidiaries with ATTC, creating one of the world’s leading telecommunications providers. In
connection with the merger, we changed the name of our company from “SBC Communications Inc.” to “AT&T Inc.”
•In 2006, we merged one of our subsidiaries with BellSouth Corporation (BellSouth) making us the ILEC in an additional nine
states. With the BellSouth acquisition, we also acquired BellSouth’s 40 percent economic interest in AT&T Mobility LLC
(AT&T Mobility), formerly Cingular Wireless LLC, resulting in 100 percent ownership of AT&T Mobility.
•In 2014, we completed the acquisition of wireless provider Leap Wireless International, Inc. and sold our ILEC operations in
Connecticut, which we had previously acquired in 1998.
•In 2015, we acquired wireless properties in Mexico, and acquired DIRECTV, a leading provider of digital television
entertainment services in both the United States and Latin America.
•In June 2018, we acquired Time Warner Inc. (Time Warner), a leader in media and entertainment that operates the Turner, Home
Box Office (HBO) and Warner Bros. business units. We also acquired Otter Media Holdings and advertising platform
AppNexus in August 2018.
•In October 2020, we sold our wireless and wireline operations in Puerto Rico and the U.S. Virgin Islands.
1
AT&T Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
General
We are a leading provider of telecommunications, media and technology services globally. The services and products that we offer vary
by market and utilize various technology platforms in a range of geographies. Our reportable segments are organized as follows:
The Communications segment provides services to businesses and consumers located in the U.S. and businesses globally. Our business
strategies reflect bundled product offerings that cut across product lines and utilize shared assets. This segment contains the following
business units:
•Mobility provides nationwide wireless service and equipment.
•Video provides video, including over-the-top (OTT) services and also sells multiplatform advertising services recognized as video
revenues.
•Broadband provides internet, including broadband fiber, and legacy telephony voice communications services to residential
customers.
•Business Wireline provides advanced IP-based services, as well as traditional voice and data services to business customers.
The WarnerMedia segment develops, produces and distributes feature films, television, gaming and other content over various physical
and digital formats, including our HBO Max streaming platform. This segment contains the following:
•Turner primarily operates multichannel basic television networks and digital properties. Turner also sells advertising on its
networks and digital properties.
•Home Box Office consists of premium pay television and our HBO Max streaming platform domestically and premium pay, basic
tier television and OTT and streaming services internationally, as well as content licensing and home entertainment.
•Warner Bros. consists of the production, distribution and licensing of television programming and feature films, the distribution of
home entertainment products and the production and distribution of games.
•Eliminations & Other includes the Xandr advertising business and Otter Media Holdings operations, excluding Crunchyroll for
which we reached an agreement to sell in December 2020 and applied held-for-sale accounting treatment, moving those results to
Corporate and Other. Eliminations & Other also removes transactions between the Turner, Home Box Office and Warner Bros.
business units, including internal sales of content to the HBO Max platform that began in the fourth quarter of 2019.
The Latin America segment provides entertainment and wireless services outside of the U.S. This segment contains the following
business units:
•Vrio provides video services primarily to residential customers using satellite and streaming technology in Latin America and the
Caribbean.
•Mexico provides wireless service and equipment to customers in Mexico.
Corporate and Other reconciles our segment results to consolidated operating income and income before income taxes, and includes:
•Corporate, which consists of: (1) businesses no longer integral to our operations or which we no longer actively market, (2)
corporate support functions, (3) impacts of corporate-wide decisions for which the individual operating segments are not being
evaluated, and (4) the reclassification of the amortization of prior service credits, which we continue to report with segment
operating expenses, to consolidated “Other income (expense) – net.”
•Acquisition-related items, which consists of items associated with the merger and integration of acquired businesses, including
amortization of intangible assets.
•Certain significant items, which includes (1) employee separation charges associated with voluntary and/or strategic offers, (2)
losses resulting from asset impairments and abandonments, and (3) other items for which the individual segments are not being
evaluated.
•Eliminations and consolidations, which (1) removes transactions involving dealings between our segments, including channel
distribution between WarnerMedia and Communications, and (2) includes adjustments for our reporting of the advertising business.
2
AT&T Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
Areas of Focus
We are in a period of rapid growth in wireless video usage and believe that there are substantial opportunities available for next-
generation converged services that combine technologies and services. Our First Responder Network Authority (FirstNet) contract and
our strong spectrum position allow us to execute a progressive 5G deployment strategy. With our subscription video on demand
streaming platform, HBO Max, we intend to capitalize on our premier network, technology and distribution capabilities to provide our
premier content in this highly attractive offering. Our fiber expansion allows us to respond to continuing advances in technology and
changing demands from our customers. We expect our transition to software-based products with low acquisition costs will provide
better economics and improve our product portfolio, including expansion of streaming services. Our acquisitions over the past few years
and our continued investment in a premier network experience make our customers’ lives more convenient and productive and foster
competition and further innovation in the communications and entertainment industry.
Communications
Our integrated telecommunications network utilizes different technological platforms, including wireless, satellite and wireline, to
provide instant connectivity at the higher speeds made possible by our fiber network expansion and wireless network enhancements.
Video streaming is expected to drive greater demand for broadband and capitalize on our fiber deployment. These investments have and
should continue to prepare us to meet increased customer demand for enhanced wireless and broadband services, including video
streaming, augmented reality and “smart” technologies. During 2021, we will continue to develop and provide high-value, integrated
mobile and broadband solutions. We believe offering integrated services facilitates our customers’ desire to view content anywhere on
demand and encourages customer retention.
Wireless Service We are experiencing rapid growth in data usage as consumers are demanding seamless access across their wireless and
wired devices, and businesses and municipalities are connecting more and more equipment and facilities to the internet. We were
awarded the FirstNet contract in 2018, which provided us with access to 20 MHz of nationwide low band spectrum and invested in 37/39
GHz spectrum in a Federal Communications Commission (FCC) auction. These bands facilitate our 5G services. At December 31, 2020,
our FirstNet coverage is more than 80 percent complete with 1.9 million FirstNet connections. Our 5G service went nationwide in July
2020, and with that availability, we anticipate the introduction of 5G handsets and devices will contribute to a renewed interest in
equipment upgrades. We will continue to invest in our wireless network as we look to provide future service offerings and participate in
emerging technologies, such as 5G and millimeter-wave bands. The increased speeds and network operating efficiency expected with this
technology should enable massive deployment of devices connected to the internet as well as faster delivery of data services. We expect
that 5G will enhance our customers’ entire connected experience and not just provide faster speeds.
Our network covers over 440 million people in North America with 4G LTE technology, and, in the United States, our network covers all
major metropolitan areas and more than 330 million people with our LTE technology. Our 3G network provides services to customers
using older handsets and connected devices. We expect to redeploy spectrum currently used for our 3G services as we transition to 5G
service and project that we will discontinue service on our 3G network in early 2022; we will manage this process consistent with
previous network upgrades. As of December 31, 2020, about 5 percent of our postpaid subscribers were using 3G handsets, and we
expect them to transition to newer technologies. We do not expect this transition to have a material impact on our consolidated operating
results.
As the wireless industry has matured, future wireless growth will increasingly depend on our ability to offer innovative data services on a
wireless network that has sufficient spectrum and capacity to support these innovations. We continue to invest significant capital in
expanding our network capacity, as well as obtaining additional spectrum that meets our long-term needs. We participate in FCC
spectrum auctions and have been redeploying spectrum previously used for more basic services to support more advanced mobile
internet services.
Broadband Technology We are rapidly converting to a software-based network and managing the migration of wireline customers to
services using our fiber infrastructure to provide broadband technology. Software-based technologies align with our global leadership in
software defined network (SDN) and network function virtualization (NFV). This network approach, of which we have led the industry
in virtualizing over 75 percent of our network as of the end of 2020, delivers a demonstrable cost advantage in the deployment of next-
generation technology over the traditional, hardware-intensive network approach. Our virtualized network will be able to support next-
generation applications like 5G and broadband-based services quickly and efficiently.
3
AT&T Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
Media
We produce and distribute high-quality video content to take advantage of growing global demand. Our media businesses use their strong
brands, distinctive intellectual property and global scale to produce and distribute quality content. As the television industry continues to
evolve from a distribution system using satellite and cable offerings to internet streaming video services, we are well-positioned to
address and capitalize on these changes, but we face financial risks and new sources of competition associated with these developments.
In 2021, we plan to continue providing more personalized services offered directly to consumers through our own distribution and
distribution partner channels, including launching our streaming platform, HBO Max, internationally beginning with Latin America.
AT&T customers in the U.S. that have premium video, mobile and broadband services can bundle with HBO Max included at no
additional charge. We also plan to add an advertising-supported HBO Max offering in 2021 to take advantage of our advertising
capabilities. In the future, we expect to provide HBO Max subscribers with highly attractive live, interactive and special event
programming.
Latin America
We believe that the wireless model in the U.S., with accelerating demand for mobile internet service and the associated economic
benefits, will be repeated around the world as companies invest in high-speed mobile networks. Due in part to changes in the legal and
regulatory framework in Mexico, we acquired Mexican wireless operations in 2015 to establish a seamless, cross-border North American
wireless network covering an area with over 440 million people and businesses in the United States and Mexico. With the increased
capacity from our completed LTE network, we also expect additional reseller revenue in 2021. Our 4G LTE network in Mexico now
covers approximately 110 million people and businesses. Our Vrio business unit provides video services to primarily residential
customers using satellite technology in Latin America and the Caribbean. We have approximately 11 million video subscribers in Latin
America.
BUSINESS OPERATIONS
OPERATING SEGMENTS
Our segments are strategic business units that offer different products and services over various technology platforms and/or in different
geographies that are managed accordingly. We analyze our operating segments based on segment contribution, which consists of
operating income, excluding acquisition-related costs and other significant items, and equity in net income (loss) of affiliates for
investments managed within each operating segment. We have three reportable segments: (1) Communications, (2) WarnerMedia and (3)
Latin America. Historical results from Xandr, previously a separate reportable segment, have been combined with the WarnerMedia
segment.
Additional information about our segments, including financial information, is included under the heading “Segment Results” in Item 7.
and in Note 4 of Item 8.
COMMUNICATIONS
Our Communications segment provides wireless and wireline telecom, video and broadband services to consumers located in the U.S.
and businesses globally. Our Communications services and products are marketed under the AT&T, Cricket, AT&T PREPAID, AT&T
TV, AT&T Fiber and DIRECTV brand names. The Communications segment provided approximately 79% of 2020 segment operating
revenues and 80% of our 2020 total segment contribution. This segment contains the Mobility, Video, Broadband and Business Wireline
business units.
Mobility – Our Mobility business unit provides nationwide wireless services to consumers and wholesale and resale wireless subscribers
located in the United States by utilizing our network to provide voice and data services, including high-speed internet over wireless
devices. We classify our subscribers as either postpaid, prepaid, connected device or reseller. At December 31, 2020, we served 183
million Mobility subscribers, including 77 million postpaid, 18 million prepaid, 7 million reseller and 81 million connected devices. Our
Mobility business unit revenue includes the following categories: service and equipment.
Wireless Services
We offer a comprehensive range of high-quality nationwide wireless voice and data communications services in a variety of pricing plans
to meet the communications needs of targeted customer categories. Through our FirstNet services, we also provide a nationwide wireless
broadband network dedicated to public safety.SM
4
AT&T Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
Consumers continue to require increasing availability of data-centric services and a network to connect and control those devices. An
increasing number of our subscribers are using more advanced integrated and data-centric devices, including embedded computing
systems and/or software, commonly called the Internet of Things (IoT). We offer plans that include unlimited features allowing for the
sharing of voice, text and data across multiple devices, which attracts subscribers from other providers and helps minimize subscriber
churn. Customers in our “connected device” category (e.g., users of monitoring devices and automobile systems) generally purchase
those devices from third-party suppliers that buy data access supported by our network. We continue to upgrade our network and
coordinate with equipment manufacturers and application developers to further capitalize on the continued growing demand for wireless
data services.
We also offer nationwide wireless voice and data communications to certain customers who prefer to pay in advance. These services are
offered under the Cricket and AT&T PREPAID brands and are typically monthly prepaid services.
Equipment
We sell a wide variety of handsets, wirelessly enabled computers and wireless data cards manufactured by various suppliers for use with
our voice and data services. We also sell accessories, such as carrying cases and hands-free devices. We sell through our own company-
owned stores, agents and third-party retail stores. We provide our customers the ability to purchase handsets on an installment basis and
the opportunity to bring their own device. In recent years, subscribers have been bringing their own devices or retaining their handsets
for longer periods, which could continue to impact upgrade activity. Like other wireless service providers, we also provide a limited
number of postpaid contract subscribers substantial equipment subsidies to initiate, renew or upgrade service.
Video – Our Video business unit provides video and targeted advertising services to customers in the United States. Our Video business
unit revenue includes the following categories: service and equipment.
Video Services
Video service revenues are comprised of subscription and advertising revenues, and are offered over satellite and IP-based technologies
(referred to as “premium” or “linear”) as well as OTT options that do not require either technology. Due to the rising cost of
programming and an increasingly competitive industry, we have focused on acquiring and retaining high-value subscribers. Our OTT
offering is delivered over our software-based video architecture and is bundled with our fiber broadband services.
We provide approximately 17 million subscribers with premium TV and OTT services. Our video subscribers can use the internet and/or
our mobile applications from smartphones and tablets to view authorized content, search program listings and schedule DVR recordings.
Consistent with industry trends, our customers continue to shift from premium TV services to OTT service and/or competitors, which has
pressured our video revenues.
Equipment
We sell IP-based set-top boxes for delivery of video services.
Broadband – Our Broadband business unit provides broadband, including fiber, and legacy telephony internet and voice communication
to customers in the United States by utilizing our IP-based and copper wired network. Our Broadband business unit revenue includes the
following categories: high-speed internet, legacy voice and data services and other service and equipment.
High-Speed Internet
We offer broadband and internet services to more than 14 million customer locations, with 5 million fiber broadband connections at
December 31, 2020. With changes in video viewing preferences and the recent work and learn from home trends, we are experiencing
increasing demand for high-speed broadband services. Our investment in expanding our industry-leading fiber network positions us to be
a leader in wired connectivity.
We believe that our flexible platform with a broadband and wireless connection is the most efficient way to transport direct-to-consumer
video experiences both at home and on mobile devices. Through this integrated approach, we can optimize the use of storage in the home
as well as in the cloud, while also providing a seamless service for consumers across screens and locations. Our WarnerMedia streaming
platform, HBO Max, provides an attractive offering of video options as well as bundling opportunities for our wireless customers and is
driving our direct to consumer strategy.
5
AT&T Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
Legacy Voice and Data Services
Revenues from our traditional voice services continue to decline as customers switch to wireless or VoIP services provided by us, cable
companies or other internet-based providers. We have responded by offering packages of combined voice and data services, including
broadband and video, and intend to continue this strategy during 2021.
Other Services and Equipment
Other service revenues include AT&T U-verse voice services (which use VoIP technology), customer fees and equipment.
Business Wireline – Our Business Wireline business unit provides services to business customers, including multinational corporations,
small and mid-sized businesses, governmental and wholesale customers. Our Business Wireline business unit revenue includes the
following categories: strategic and managed services, legacy voice and data services, and other services and equipment.
Strategic and Managed Services
Strategic and managed services are our most advanced business solutions and allow our customers to create and manage their own
internal networks and to access external data networks. Additionally, we provide collaboration services that utilize our IP infrastructure
and allow our customers to utilize the most advanced technology to improve their productivity. Our strategic and managed services are
made up of Strategic Data, Strategic Voice, Security, Cloud Solutions, Outsourcing, Managed Services and Professional Services.
Strategic Data services include our Virtual Private Networks (VPN), AT&T Dedicated Internet (ADI), and Ethernet and broadband
services. We continue to reconfigure our wireline network to take advantage of the latest technologies and services. We have developed
services that rely on our SDN and NFV to enhance business customers’ digital agility in a rapidly evolving environment. We also
provide state-of-the-art security solutions like Threat Management, Intrusion Detection and other business security applications. Due to
developing technology, our most advanced business solutions are subject to change periodically. We review and evaluate our strategic
and managed service offerings annually, which may result in an updated definition and the recast of our historical financial information
to conform to the current period presentation. Any modifications will be reflected in the first quarter.
Legacy Voice and Data Services
Voice services include services provided to business and governmental customers, either directly or through wholesale arrangements with
other service providers. Our circuit-based, traditional data products include switched and dedicated transport services that allow
customers to transmit data at high speeds, as well as access to the internet using a DSL connection.
Other Services and Equipment
Other service revenues include licensing of intellectual property and customer premises equipment.
Additional information on our Communications segment is contained in the “Overview” section of Item 7.
WARNERMEDIA
Our WarnerMedia segment is comprised of leading media and entertainment businesses that principally develop, produce and distribute
feature films, television content, and other content globally; operate cable networks, premium pay television and subscription video on
demand (SVOD or streaming) services domestically and internationally; and operate digital media properties. The WarnerMedia segment
provided approximately 17% of 2020 segment operating revenues and 22% of our 2020 total segment contribution. This segment
consists primarily of the Turner, Home Box Office, including our HBO Max streaming platform, and Warner Bros. business units.
Turner – The Turner business unit operates television networks and related properties that offer branded news, entertainment, sports and
kids multi-platform content for consumers around the world. Turner licenses programming to distributors, sells advertising on its
networks and digital properties owned or managed for other companies, and licenses its original programming and brands and characters
for consumer products and other business ventures. Turner revenue includes the following categories: subscription, advertising and
content and other.
Subscription
Turner’s programming is primarily delivered by distributors and is available to subscribers of the distributors for viewing live and on
demand through the distributors’ services and Turner’s network apps. License agreements are typically multi-year arrangements that
provide for annual service fee increases and have fee arrangements that are generally related to the number of networks provided to and
subscribers served by the distributor.
6
AT&T Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
Advertising
Advertising arrangements for Turner’s networks generally have terms of one year or less. In the U.S., the advertising revenues generally
depend on the size and demographics of a network’s audience delivered to an advertiser, the number of units of time sold and the price
per unit. The price per unit of advertising is determined considering factors such as the type of program or network and/or the time of day
the advertising is to be run. Certain advertising inventory is sold in the “upfront” market in advance each year and other inventory in the
“scatter” market closer to the time a program airs. Outside the U.S., advertising is generally sold at a fixed rate for the unit of time sold,
determined by the time of day and network.
Turner’s digital properties consist of owned assets and those managed and/or operated for sports leagues where Turner holds the related
programming rights. Digital properties managed or operated for sports leagues include NBA.com, NBA Mobile and NCAA.com.
Content and Other
Turner licenses certain owned original programming to international territories and to SVOD services. Turner also licenses its brands and
characters for consumer products and other business ventures.
Home Box Office – Our Home Box Office business unit includes our streaming platform, HBO Max, and leading multichannel pay
television services, HBO and Cinemax. In May 2020, we acquired the remaining interest in HBO Latin America Group (HBO LAG),
which owns and operates various television channels and the streaming platform HBO GO in Latin America and the Caribbean. Our
Home Box Office business unit revenue includes the following categories: subscription and content and other.
Subscription
In the U.S., HBO and Cinemax premium programming services are available to subscribers of traditional and digital distributors for
viewing live and on-demand on television and on various internet-connected devices. We launched our streaming platform, HBO Max, in
May 2020 through which programming is made available on a SVOD basis both direct-to-consumer and through distributors.
WarnerMedia’s domestic license agreements with distributors are multi-year arrangements that typically provide for packaging and
marketing support. Revenues depend on the specific terms of the applicable agreement, which may include subscriber thresholds, volume
discounts and other performance-based discounts. As of December 31, 2020, we had more than 41 million domestic HBO Max and HBO
subscribers (excluding Cinemax).
Internationally, HBO and Cinemax-branded premium pay, basic tier television and/or SVOD services are distributed in over 70 countries
in Latin America, Europe and Asia. As of December 31, 2020, we had nearly 61 million HBO Max and HBO subscribers worldwide,
including approximately 19 million international HBO premium pay television and SVOD service subscribers (excluding Cinemax and
basic tier subscribers).
Content and Other
Original programming is licensed to television networks and OTT services in over 150 countries and is also available to customers in
both physical and digital formats in the U.S. and various international regions.
Warner Bros. – Our Warner Bros. business unit is one of the largest television and film studios in the world. Warner Bros. produces,
distributes and licenses television programming and feature films and distributes home entertainment products in both physical and
digital formats, as well as producing and distributing games and licensing consumer products and brands. Warner Bros. allows us to offer
an expanded library of programming available under HBO Max. At December 31, 2020, Warner Bros.’ vast content library consists of
more than 120,000 hours of programming, including over 10,000 feature films and 5,500 television seasons comprised of tens of
thousands of individual episodes.
The home entertainment industry is rapidly moving toward digital formats. While consumer spending on the higher-margin digital
formats has increased in recent years, it has not offset decline in spending on product in physical formats, like DVDs. As such, Warner
Bros. has been focusing on increasing the more profitable electronic sell-through and transactional digital VOD rentals of its film and
television content while executing on opportunities to improve the operational efficiency of the physical distribution business.
Our Warner Bros. business unit revenue includes the following categories: theatrical product, television product, and games and other.
7
AT&T Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
Theatrical Product
Theatrical product consists of (1) rental fees paid by movie theaters for the initial exhibition of feature films produced and/or distributed
by Warner Bros., (2) licensing fees paid by HBO Max (which are eliminated in consolidation), television networks, premium pay
television services and OTT services for the exhibition of feature films produced by Warner Bros. and (3) revenues from the distribution
of Warner Bros.’ and other companies’ feature films in physical and digital formats. Our feature films also support key brands and
franchises, which helps generate consumer product and brand licensing revenues based on Warner Bros.’ films and characters.
Driven by the pandemic-related partial closure of movie theaters and the availability of our HBO Max streaming platform, we have
decided to release our 2021 films simultaneously on HBO Max and in theaters for 31 days. Both the continued partial closure of movie
theaters and the resulting hybrid distribution model are expected to pressure revenues in 2021.
Television Product
Television product consists of (1) fees for the initial broadcast of television programming on U.S. broadcast and cable television
networks and premium pay television and OTT services, (2) fees for the airing or other distribution of television programming after the
initial broadcast in secondary U.S. distribution channels (such as basic cable networks, local television stations and OTT services), (3)
fees for the international distribution of television programming for free-to-air television, basic tier television services, premium pay
television services and OTT services, and (4) revenues from the sale of the television programming in physical and digital formats. Our
television programming also supports Warner Bros.’ key brands and franchises, which helps generate consumer product and brand
licensing revenues based on the programming for years beyond the initial airing of the programming on television. Warner Bros. licenses
its U.S. programming globally.
Games and Other
We develop, publish and distribute games, including mobile and console games. The games are based on intellectual property owned or
licensed by Warner Bros. (including DC Entertainment properties, Harry Potter and Mortal Kombat).
Additional information on our WarnerMedia segment is contained in the “Overview” section of Item 7.
LATIN AMERICA
Our Latin America segment provides entertainment services in Latin America and wireless services in Mexico. The Latin America
segment provided approximately 3% of 2020 segment operating revenues. Our Latin America services and products are marketed under
the AT&T, DIRECTV, SKY and Unefon brand names. This segment contains the Vrio and Mexico business units.
Vrio – Video entertainment services are provided to primarily residential customers using satellite technology. We are a leading provider
of digital television services throughout Latin America, providing a wide selection of local and international digital-quality video
entertainment and audio programming under the DIRECTV and SKY brands. We provide one of the most extensive collections of
programming available in the Latin America pay-TV market, including HD sports video content and the most innovative interactive
technology across the region. In addition, we have the unique ability to sell superior offerings of our differentiated products and services
on a continent-wide basis with an operational cost structure that we believe to be lower than that of our competition.
In May 2020, we found it necessary to close our DIRECTV operations in Venezuela due to political instability in the country and to
comply with sanctions of the U.S. government.
We have approximately 11 million video subscribers in Latin America. Our business encompasses pay television services with satellite
operations serving Argentina, Brazil, Chile, Colombia, Ecuador, Peru, Uruguay and parts of the Caribbean. Our operations also include
our 41% equity method investment in Innova, S. de R.L. de C.V., or SKY Mexico. SKY Mexico financial results are accounted for as an
equity method investment.
Mexico – We utilize our regional and national wireless networks in Mexico to provide consumer and business customers with wireless
data and voice communication services. We divide our revenue into the following categories: wireless service and wireless equipment.
8
AT&T Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
We provide postpaid and prepaid wireless services in Mexico to approximately 19 million subscribers under the AT&T and Unefon
brands. Postpaid services allow for (1) no annual service contract for subscribers who bring their own device or purchase a device on
installment (the device must be paid in full if the customer chooses to drop their service from AT&T) and (2) service contracts for
periods up to 36 months for subscribers who purchase their equipment under the traditional device subsidy model. Plans offer no
roaming charges in the United States or Canada, unlimited minutes and messages to the extended AT&T community and unlimited data
access to social networking. We also offer prepaid services to customers who prefer to pay in advance.
We sell a wide variety of handsets, including smartphones manufactured by various suppliers for use with our voice and data services.
We sell through our own company-owned stores, agents and third-party retail stores.
Additional information on our Latin America segment is contained in the “Overview” section of Item 7.
MAJOR CLASSES OF SERVICE
The following table sets forth the percentage of total consolidated reported operating revenues by any class of service that accounted for
10% or more of our consolidated total operating revenues in any of the last three fiscal years:
Percentage of Total
Consolidated Operating Revenues
2020 2019 2018
Communications Segment
Wireless service 32  % 30  % 32  %
Subscription 16 17 19 
Advanced data 13 12 12 
Equipment 10 9 10 
WarnerMedia Segment
Subscription 8 8 4 
Latin America Segment
Subscription 2 2 3 
Wireless service 1 1 1 
Equipment 1 1 1 
Excludes advertising revenues included as W ireless service in our Mobility business unit of $291, $292 and $232 in 2020, 2019 and 2018,
respectively .
Subscription is reported as V ideo in our V ideo and V rio business units.
Excludes advertising revenues included as V ideo in our V ideo business unit of $1,718, $1,672 and $1,595 in 2020, 2019 and 2018, respectively .
Advanced data is reported as High-speed internet and Strategic services in our Broadband and Business W ireline business units, respectively .
Additional information on our geographical distribution of revenues is contained in Note 4 of Item 8.
GOVERNMENT REGULATION
Wireless communications providers in the United States must be licensed by the FCC to provide communications services at specified
spectrum frequencies within defined geographic areas and must comply with the rules and policies governing the use of the spectrum as
adopted by the FCC. The FCC’s rules have a direct impact on whether the wireless industry has sufficient spectrum available to support
the high-quality, innovative services our customers demand. Wireless licenses are issued for a fixed time period, typically ten years, and
we must seek renewal of these licenses. While the FCC has generally renewed licenses given to operating companies such as us, the FCC
has authority to both revoke a license for cause and to deny a license renewal if a renewal is not in the public interest. Additionally, while
wireless communications providers’ prices and service offerings are generally not subject to regulation, the federal government and
various states periodically consider new regulations and legislation relating to various aspects of wireless services.1
2, 3
4
2
1
2
3
4
9
AT&T Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
The Communications Act of 1934 and other related acts give the FCC broad authority to regulate the U.S. operations of our satellite
services, which are licensed by the FCC, and some of WarnerMedia’s businesses are also subject to obligations under the
Communications Act and related FCC regulations. We continue to support regulatory and legislative measures and efforts at both the
federal and state levels to minimize and/or moderate regulatory burdens that are no longer appropriate in a competitive communications
market and that inhibit our ability to compete more effectively and offer services wanted and needed by our customers, including
initiatives to transition services from traditional networks to all IP-based networks. At the same time, we also seek to ensure that legacy
regulations are not further extended to broadband or wireless services, which are subject to vigorous competition.
Our ILEC subsidiaries are subject to regulation by state governments, which have the power to regulate intrastate rates and services,
including local, long-distance and network access services, provided such state regulation is consistent with federal law. Some states
have eliminated or reduced regulations on our retail offerings. In addition, many states have adopted legislation that enables us to provide
IP-based video service through a single statewide or state-approved franchise to offer a competitive video product. These subsidiaries are
also subject to the jurisdiction of the FCC with respect to intercarrier compensation, interconnection, and interstate and international rates
and services, including interstate access charges. Access charges are a form of intercarrier compensation designed to reimburse our
wireline subsidiaries for the use of their networks by other carriers.
Our subsidiaries operating outside the United States are subject to the jurisdiction of national and supranational regulatory authorities in
the market where service is provided.
The following discussion highlights significant regulatory issues directly affecting our operations:
Communications Segment
Wireless
The industry-wide deployment of 5G technology, which is needed to satisfy extensive demand for video and internet access, will involve
significant deployment of “small cell” equipment and therefore increase the need for local permitting processes that allow for the
placement of small cell equipment on reasonable timelines and terms. Federal regulations also can delay and impede broadband services,
including small cell equipment. In March, August and September 2018, the FCC adopted orders to streamline the wireless infrastructure
review process in order to facilitate deployment of next-generation wireless facilities. Specifically, the FCC’s March 2018 Order
streamlined historical, tribal, and environmental review requirements for wireless infrastructure, including the exclusion of most small
cell facilities from such review. The Order was appealed and in August 2019, the D.C. Circuit Court of Appeals vacated the FCC’s
finding that most small cell facilities are excluded from review, but otherwise upheld the FCC’s Order. The FCC’s August and September
2018 Orders simplified the regulations for attaching telecommunications equipment to utility poles and clarified when local government
right-of-way access and use restrictions can be preempted because they unlawfully prohibit the provision of telecommunications
services. Those orders were appealed to the 9th Circuit Court of Appeals, which in August 2020 largely upheld the FCC Orders. Those
orders have been appealed and the various appeals remain pending in the D.C. Circuit and 9th Circuit Court of Appeals. In addition, to
date, 31 states and Puerto Rico have adopted legislation to facilitate small cell deployment.
Internet
In February 2015, the FCC released an order classifying both fixed and mobile consumer broadband internet access services as
telecommunications services, subject to Title II of the Communications Act. The Order, which represented a departure from longstanding
bipartisan precedent, significantly expanded the FCC’s authority to regulate broadband internet access services, as well as internet
interconnection arrangements. In December 2017, the FCC reversed its 2015 decision by reclassifying fixed and mobile consumer
broadband services as information services and repealing most of the rules that were adopted in 2015. In lieu of broad conduct
prohibitions, the order requires internet service providers to disclose information about their network practices and terms of service,
including whether they block or throttle internet traffic or offer paid prioritization. On October 1, 2019, the D.C. Circuit issued a
unanimous opinion upholding the FCC’s reclassification of broadband as an information service, and its reliance on transparency
requirements and competitive marketplace dynamics to safeguard net neutrality. While the court vacated the FCC’s express preemption
of any state regulation of net neutrality, it stressed that its ruling did not prevent the FCC or ISPs from relying on conflict preemption to
invalidate particular state laws that are inconsistent with the FCC’s regulatory objectives and framework. The court also remanded the
matter to the FCC for further consideration of the impact of reclassifying broadband services as information services on public safety, the
Lifeline program, and pole attachment regulation. In October 2020, the FCC adopted an order concluding that those issues did not justify
reversing its decision to reclassify
10
AT&T Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
broadband services as information services. An appeal of the FCC’s remand decision is pending.
Following the FCC’s 2017 decision to reclassify broadband as information services, a number of states adopted legislation to reimpose
the very rules the FCC repealed. In some cases, state legislation imposes requirements that go beyond the FCC’s February 2015 order.
Additionally, some state governors have issued executive orders that effectively reimpose the repealed requirements. Suits have been
filed concerning laws in California and Vermont. Both lawsuits were stayed pursuant to agreements by those states not to enforce their
laws pending final resolution of all appeals of the FCC’s December 2017 order. Because that order is now final, the California suit has
returned to active status. Nonetheless, enforcement of both the California and Vermont laws remain stayed pending a ruling by a U.S.
District Court in California on motions for a preliminary injunction against enforcement of the California law. Argument on those
motions is now scheduled for February 2021. We expect that going forward additional states may seek to impose net neutrality
requirements. We will continue to support congressional action to codify a set of standard consumer rules for the internet.
Privacy-related legislation continues to be adopted or considered in a number of jurisdictions. Legislative, regulatory and litigation
actions could result in significant penalties, increased costs of compliance, further regulation or claims against broadband internet access
service providers and others, and increased uncertainty in the value and availability of data.
WarnerMedia Segment
WarnerMedia creates, owns and distributes intellectual property, including copyrights, trademarks and licenses of intellectual property.
To protect its intellectual property, WarnerMedia relies on a combination of laws and license agreements. Outside the U.S., laws and
regulations relating to intellectual property protection and the effective enforcement of these laws and regulations vary greatly from
country to country. The European Union is pursuing legislative and regulatory initiatives which could impact WarnerMedia’s activities in
the EU. Piracy, particularly of digital content, continues to threaten revenues from WarnerMedia’s products and services, as well as
revenues from our pay TV business, and we work to limit that threat through a combination of approaches, including technological and
legislative solutions. Outside the U.S., various laws and regulations, as well as trade agreements with the U.S., also apply to the
distribution or licensing of feature films for exhibition in theaters and on broadcast and cable networks. For example, in certain countries,
including China, laws and regulations limit the number of foreign films exhibited in such countries in a calendar year.
Additional information relating to regulation of our subsidiaries is contained under the headings “Operating Environment Overview” and
“Regulatory Developments” of Item 7.
IMPORTANCE, DURATION AND EFFECT OF LICENSES
Certain of our subsidiaries own or have licenses to various patents, copyrights, trademarks and other intellectual property necessary to
conduct business. Many of our subsidiaries also hold government-issued licenses or franchises to provide wireline, satellite or wireless
services. Additional information relating to regulation affecting those rights is contained under the heading “Operating Environment
Overview,” of Item 7. We actively pursue patents, trademarks and service marks to protect our intellectual property within the United
States and abroad. We maintain a significant global portfolio of patents, trademarks and service mark registrations. We have also entered
into agreements that permit other companies, in exchange for fees and rights, and subject to appropriate safeguards and restrictions, to
utilize certain of our patents, trademarks and service marks. As we transition our network from a switch-based network to an IP,
software-based network, we have increasingly entered into licensing agreements with software developers.
We periodically receive offers from third parties to obtain licenses for patents and other intellectual rights in exchange for royalties or
other payments. We also receive notices asserting that our products or services sold to customers or software-based network functions
infringe on their patents and other intellectual property rights. These claims, whether against us directly, such as network functions or
against third-party suppliers of products or services that we, in turn, sell to our customers, such as wireless handsets, could require us to
pay damages, royalties, stop offering the relevant products or services and/or cease network functions or other activities. While the
outcome of any litigation is uncertain, we do not believe that the resolution of any of these infringement claims or the expiration or non-
renewal of any of our intellectual property rights would have a material adverse effect on our results of operations.
11
AT&T Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
MAJOR CUSTOMERS
No customer accounted for 10% or more of our consolidated revenues in 2020, 2019 or 2018.
COMPETITION
Competition continues to increase for communications, media entertainment and digital services from traditional and nontraditional
competitors. Technological advances have expanded the types and uses of services and products available. In addition, lack of or a
reduced level of regulation of comparable legacy services has lowered costs for alternative communications service providers. As a
result, we face continuing competition as well as some new opportunities in significant portions of our business.
Wireless We face substantial competition in our wireless businesses. Under current FCC rules, multiple licensees, who provide wireless
services on the cellular, PCS, Advanced Wireless Services, 700 MHz and other spectrum bands, may operate in each of our U.S. service
areas. Our competitors include two national wireless providers; a larger number of regional providers and resellers of those services; and
certain cable companies. In addition, we face competition from providers who offer voice, text messaging and other services as
applications on data networks. We are one of four facilities-based providers in Mexico (retail and wholesale), with the most significant
market share controlled by América Móvil. We may experience significant competition from companies that provide similar services
using other communications technologies and services. While some of these technologies and services are now operational, others are
being developed or may be developed. We compete for customers based principally on service/device offerings, price, network quality,
coverage area and customer service.
Video/Broadband Our businesses providing communications and digital entertainment services will face continued competitive pressure
in 2021 from multiple providers, including wireless, satellite, cable, online video providers, and resellers. In addition, the desire for high-
speed data on demand, including video, is continuing to lead customers to terminate their traditional wired or linear services and use our
or competitors’ wireless, satellite and internet-based services. We have launched our own video OTT and/or streaming options to attract
or retain customers that do not want a full-scale traditional video package. In most U.S. markets, we compete for customers with large
cable companies for high-speed internet, video and voice services and other smaller telecommunications companies for both long-
distance and local services. In addition, in Latin American countries served by our Vrio subsidiary, we also face competition from other
video providers, including América Móvil and Telefónica.
Legacy Voice and Data We continue to lose legacy voice and data subscribers due to competitors (e.g., wireless, cable and VoIP
providers) who can provide comparable services at lower prices because they are not subject to traditional telephone industry regulation
(or the extent of regulation they are subject to is in dispute), utilize different technologies or promote a different business model (such as
advertising-based). In response to these competitive pressures, for a number of years we have used a bundling strategy that rewards
customers who consolidate their services with us. We continue to focus on bundling services, including combined packages of wireless
and video service through our IP-based services. We will continue to develop innovative and integrated services that capitalize on our
wireless and IP-based network.
Additionally, we provide local and interstate telephone and switched services to other service providers, primarily large internet service
providers using the largest class of nationwide internet networks (internet backbone), wireless carriers, other telephone companies, cable
companies and systems integrators. These services are subject to additional competitive pressures from the development of new
technologies, the introduction of innovative offerings and increasing satellite, wireless, fiber-optic and cable transmission capacity for
services. We face a number of international competitors, including Orange Business Services, BT, Singapore Telecommunications
Limited and Verizon Communications Inc., as well as competition from a number of large systems integrators.
Media Our WarnerMedia businesses face shifts in consumer viewing patterns, increased competition from streaming services and the
expansion by other companies, in particular, technology companies. In May 2020, we launched HBO Max, our platform for premium
content and video offered directly to consumers, as well as through our traditional distributors.
12
AT&T Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
WarnerMedia competes with other studios and television production groups and independents to produce and sell programming. Many
television networks and online platforms have affiliated production companies from which they are increasingly obtaining their
programming, which has reduced their demand for programming from non-affiliated production companies. WarnerMedia also faces
competition from other television networks, online platforms, and premium pay television services for distribution and marketing of its
television networks and premium pay and basic tier television services by affiliates.
Our WarnerMedia businesses compete with other production companies and studios for the services of producers, directors, writers,
actors and others and for the acquisition of literary properties. In recent years, technology companies also have begun to produce
programming and compete with WarnerMedia for talent and property rights.
Advertising The increased amount of consumer time spent online and on mobile activities has resulted in the shift of advertising budgets
away from traditional television to digital advertising. WarnerMedia’s advertising-supported television networks and digital properties
compete with streaming services, other networks and digital properties, print, radio and other media. Our programmatic advertising
business faces competition from a variety of technology companies. Similar to all participants in the advertising technology sector, we
contend with the dominance of Google, as well as the influence of Facebook, whose practices may result in the decreased ability and
willingness of advertisers and programmers to adopt programmatic solutions offered by alternative suppliers.
RESEARCH AND DEVELOPMENT
AT&T scientists and engineers conduct research in a variety of areas, including IP networking, advanced network design and
architecture, network and cyber security, network operations support systems, satellite technology, video platform development and data
analytics. The majority of the development activities are performed to create new services and to invent tools and systems to manage
secure and reliable networks for us and our customers. Research and development expenses were $1,210 in 2020, $1,276 in 2019, and
$1,194 in 2018.
HUMAN CAPITAL
Number of Employees As of January 31, 2021, we employed approximately 230,000 persons.
Employee Development We believe our success depends on our employees’ success and that all employees must have the skills they
need to thrive. We offer training and elective courses that give employees the opportunity to enhance their skills. We also intend to help
cultivate the next generation of talent that will lead our company into the future by providing employees with educational opportunities
through our award-winning internal training organization, AT&T University.
Labor Contracts Approximately 37% of our employees are represented by the Communications Workers of America (CWA), the
International Brotherhood of Electrical Workers (IBEW) or other unions. After expiration of the collective bargaining agreements, work
stoppages or labor disruptions may occur in the absence of new contracts or other agreements being reached. There are no significant
contracts expiring in 2021. A contract covering approximately 14,000 Mobility employees in 36 states and the District of Columbia that
was set to expire in February 2021 was extended until February 2022. A contract covering approximately 10,000 Mobility employees in
nine Southeast states that was set to expire in February 2022 was extended until February 2023.
Compensation and Benefits In addition to salaries, we provide a variety of benefit programs to help meet the needs of our employees.
These programs cover active and former employees and may vary by subsidiary and region. These programs include 401(k) plans,
pension benefits, and health and welfare benefits, among many others. In addition to our active employee base, at December 31, 2020,
we had approximately 517,000 retirees and dependents that were eligible to receive retiree benefits.
We review our benefit plans to maintain competitive packages that reflect the needs of our workforce. We also adapt our compensation
model to provide fair and inclusive pay practices across our business. We are committed to pay equity for employees who hold the same
jobs, work in the same geographic area, and have the same levels of experience and performance.
13
AT&T Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
Employee Safety We provide our employees access to flexible and convenient health and welfare programs and workplace
accommodations. In response to the COVID-19 pandemic, we consulted with medical professionals to institute policies that best
protected our employees and their families. We have prioritized self-care and emphasized a focus on wellness, providing personal
protective equipment, flexible scheduling or time-off options and implementing technologies to enhance the necessary remote-work
environment. As we look to life and operations beyond the pandemic, we are revising our business models to support flexible office
space and at-home productivity for many employees on a permanent basis.
Diversity and Inclusion We believe that championing diversity and fostering inclusion do more than just make us a better company,
they contribute to a world where people are empowered to be their very best. That is why one of our core values is to stand for equality
and why our mission is to inspire human progress through the power of communication and entertainment.
To have a diverse and inclusive workforce, we have put an emphasis on attracting and hiring talented people who represent a mix of
genders, races, abilities and experiences. Across the AT&T family of companies, we have employee groups that reflect our diverse
workforce. These groups are not only organized around women, people of color, LGBTQ+ individuals, people with disabilities and
veterans, but also around professionals who are experienced or interested in cybersecurity, engineering, innovation, project management
and media and entertainment technology. When everyone’s unique story is celebrated, we are able to connect, create and innovate in real
and meaningful ways. It is important that our employees feel valued, have a sense of belonging and are fully engaged in our success.
ITEM 1A. RISK FACTORS
In addition to the other information set forth in this document, including the matters contained under the caption “Cautionary Language
Concerning Forward-Looking Statements,” you should carefully read the matters described below. We believe that each of these matters
could materially affect our business. We recognize that most of these factors are beyond our ability to control and therefore we cannot
predict an outcome.
Macro-economic Factors:
Adverse changes in the U.S. securities markets, interest rates and medical costs could materially increase our benefit plan costs
and future funding requirements.
Our costs to provide current benefits and funding for future benefits are subject to increases, primarily due to continuing increases in
medical and prescription drug costs, and can be affected by lower returns on assets held by our pension and other benefit plans, which are
reflected in our financial statements for that year. In calculating the costs included on our financial statements of providing benefits under
our plans, we have made certain assumptions regarding future investment returns, interest rates and medical costs. These assumptions
could change significantly over time and could be materially different than originally projected. Lower than assumed investment returns,
a decline in interest rates with a corresponding increase in our benefit obligations, and higher than assumed medical and prescription
drug costs will increase expenses.
The Financial Accounting Standards Board requires companies to recognize the funded status of defined benefit pension and
postretirement plans as an asset or liability in their statement of financial position and to recognize changes in that funded status in the
year in which the changes occur. We have elected to reflect the annual adjustments to the funded status in our consolidated statement of
income. Therefore, an increase in our costs or adverse market conditions will have a negative effect on our operating results.
Significant adverse changes in capital markets could result in the deterioration of our defined benefit plans’ funded status and result in
increased contribution requirements for such plans, which could be material.
14
AT&T Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
Adverse changes in global financial markets could limit our ability and our larger customers’ ability to access capital or increase
the cost of capital needed to fund business operations.
During 2020, uncertainty surrounding global growth rates and the impact of the COVID-19 pandemic helped create volatility in the
credit, currency, equity and fixed income markets. Volatility may affect companies’ access to the credit markets, leading to higher
borrowing costs, or, in some cases, the inability to fund ongoing operations. In addition, we contract with large financial institutions to
support our own treasury operations, including contracts to hedge our exposure on interest rates and foreign exchange and the funding of
credit lines and other short-term debt obligations, including commercial paper. These financial institutions face stricter capital-related
and other regulations in the United States and Europe, as well as ongoing legal and financial issues concerning their loan portfolios,
which may hamper their ability to provide credit or raise the cost of providing such credit.
The U.K. Financial Conduct Authority, which regulates LIBOR, has announced that it intends to phase out LIBOR by the end of 2021.
Although our securities may provide for alternative methods of calculating the interest rate payable on such indebtedness, uncertainty as
to the extent and manner of future changes may adversely affect the current trading market for LIBOR-based securities, and the value of
variable rate indebtedness in general. A company’s cost of borrowing is also affected by evaluations given by various credit rating
agencies and these agencies have been applying tighter credit standards when evaluating debt levels and future growth prospects. While
we have been successful in continuing to access the credit and fixed income markets when needed, adverse changes in the financial
markets could render us either unable to access these markets or able to access these markets only at higher interest costs and with
restrictive financial or other conditions, severely affecting our business operations. Additionally, downgrades of our credit rating by the
major credit rating agencies could increase our cost of borrowing and also impact the collateral we would be required to post under
certain agreements we have entered into with our derivative counterparties, which could negatively impact our liquidity. Further,
valuation changes in our derivative portfolio due to interest rates and foreign exchange rates could require us to post collateral and thus
may negatively impact our liquidity.
Our international operations have increased our exposure to political instability, to changes in the international economy and to
the level of regulation on our business and these risks could offset our expected growth opportunities.
We have international operations, particularly in Latin America, including Mexico, and worldwide through WarnerMedia’s content
distribution. We need to comply with a wide variety of complex local laws, regulations and treaties. We are exposed to restrictions on
cash repatriation, foreign exchange controls, fluctuations in currency values, changes in relationships between U.S. and foreign
governments, trade restrictions including potential tariffs, differences in intellectual property protection laws, and other regulations that
may affect materially our earnings. Our Mexico operations, in particular, rely on a continuation of a regulatory regime that fosters
competition. While our foreign operations represent significant opportunities to sell our services, a number of foreign countries where we
operate have experienced unstable growth patterns, increased inflation, currency devaluation, foreign exchange controls, instability in the
banking sector and high unemployment. In addition, significant political turmoil has continued in several Latin American countries.
Should these conditions persist, our ability to offer service in one or more countries could be adversely affected and customers in these
countries may be unable to purchase the services we offer or pay for services already provided. For example, we found it necessary in
May 2020 to close our DIRECTV operations in Venezuela due to political instability in the country and in order to comply with sanctions
of the U.S. government.
In addition, operating in foreign countries also typically involves participating with local businesses, either to comply with local laws or,
for example, to enhance product marketing, deploy networks or execute on other capital projects. Involvement with foreign firms
exposes us to the risk of being unable to control the actions of those firms and therefore exposes us to risks associated with our obligation
to comply with the Foreign Corrupt Practices Act (FCPA). Violations of the FCPA could have a material adverse effect on our operating
results.
15
AT&T Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
Industry-wide Factors:
Our business is subject to risks arising from the outbreak of the COVID-19 virus.
The COVID-19 pandemic and resulting mitigation measures have caused, and may continue to cause, a negative effect on our operating
results. To date, mitigation measures have caused sports leagues to modify their seasons and suspend certain operations as the
cancellation of many sporting events, including the 2020 NCAA tournament, which has adversely affected our advertising revenues, may
result in contract disputes concerning carriage rights and has caused us to incur expenses relating to certain of these sporting events
notwithstanding their cancellation. The closure or avoidance of theaters, and the interruptions in movie production and other
programming caused by COVID-19 are expected to continue to impact the timing of revenues and may cause a loss of revenue to our
WarnerMedia business over the long term. The COVID-19 pandemic could also drive higher costs for our WarnerMedia business in 2021
based on the hybrid distribution model for releasing films in 2021 and costs associated with safety measures put in place to help provide
a safe environment for content production. If the mitigation measures or the associated effects are prolonged, we expect business
customers in industries most significantly impacted will continue to reduce or terminate services, having a negative effect on the
performance of our Business Wireline business unit. Further, concerns over the COVID-19 pandemic could again result in the prolonged
closure of many of our retail stores and deter customers from accessing our stores even as the pandemic subsides. These pandemic
concerns may also result in continued impact to our customers’ ability to pay for our products and services. We may also continue to see
significant impact on roaming revenues due to a downturn in international travel. The COVID-19 pandemic has caused and could further
cause reduced staffing levels at our call centers and field operations, resulting in delays in service. Further reductions in staffing levels
could additionally limit our ability to provide services, adversely impacting our competitive position. We may also incur significantly
higher expenses attributable to infrastructure investments required to meet higher network utilization from more customers consuming
bandwidth from changes in work from home trends; extended cancellation periods; and increased labor costs if the COVID-19 pandemic
continues for an extended period.
The COVID-19 pandemic and mitigation measures have caused, and may continue to cause, adverse impacts on global economic
conditions and consumer confidence, spending and consumer behavior, which could affect demand for our products and services. The
extent to which the COVID-19 pandemic impacts our business results of operations, cash flows and financial condition will depend on
future developments that are highly uncertain and cannot be predicted, including new information that may emerge concerning other
strains of the virus and the actions to contain its impact. Due to the speed with which the situation continues to develop and change, we
are not able at this time to estimate the additional impact of COVID-19 on our financial or operational results, but the impact could be
material.
Changes to federal, state and foreign government regulations and decisions in regulatory proceedings, as well as private
litigation, could further increase our operating costs and/or alter customer perceptions of our operations, which could materially
adversely affect us.
Our subsidiaries providing wired services are subject to significant federal and state regulation while many of our competitors are not. In
addition, our subsidiaries and affiliates operating outside the United States are also subject to the jurisdiction of national and
supranational regulatory authorities in the market where service is provided. Our wireless and various video subsidiaries are regulated to
varying degrees by the FCC and in some instances, by state and local agencies. Adverse regulations and rulings by the FCC relating to
broadband, wireless deployment and satellite video issues could impede our ability to manage our networks and recover costs and lessen
incentives to invest in our networks. The continuing growth of IP-based services, especially when accessed by wireless devices, has
created or potentially could create conflicting regulation between the FCC and various state and local authorities, which may involve
lengthy litigation to resolve and may result in outcomes unfavorable to us. In addition, increased public focus on a variety of issues
related to our operations, such as privacy issues, government requests or orders for customer data, and concerns about global climate
changes, have led to proposals or new legislation at state, federal and foreign government levels to change or increase regulation on our
operations. Enactment of new privacy laws and regulations could, among other things, adversely affect our ability to collect and offer
targeted advertisements or result in additional costs of compliance or litigation. Should customers decide that our competitors offer a
more customer-friendly environment, our competitive position, results of operations or financial condition could be materially adversely
affected.
16
AT&T Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
Continuing growth in and the converging nature of wireless, video and broadband services will require us to deploy significant
amounts of capital and require ongoing access to spectrum in order to provide attractive services to customers.
Wireless, video and broadband services are undergoing rapid and significant technological changes and a dramatic increase in usage, in
particular, the demand for faster and seamless usage of video and data across mobile and fixed devices. The COVID-19 pandemic has
accelerated these changes and also resulted in higher network utilization, as more customers consume bandwidth from changes in work
from home trends. We must continually invest in our networks in order to improve our wireless, video and broadband services to meet
this increasing demand and changes in customer expectations, while remaining competitive. Improvements in these services depend on
many factors, including continued access to and deployment of adequate spectrum and the capital needed to expand our wireline network
to support transport of these services. In order to stem broadband subscriber losses to cable competitors in our non-fiber wireline areas,
we have been expanding our all-fiber wireline network. We must maintain and expand our network capacity and coverage for transport
of video, data and voice between cell and fixed landline sites. To this end, we participate in spectrum auctions and continue to deploy
software and other technology advancements in order to efficiently invest in our network.
Network service enhancements and product launches may not occur as scheduled or at the cost expected due to many factors, including
delays in determining equipment and wireless handset operating standards, supplier delays, software issues, increases in network and
handset component costs, regulatory permitting delays for tower sites or enhancements, or labor-related delays. Deployment of new
technology also may adversely affect the performance of the network for existing services. If we cannot acquire needed spectrum or
deploy the services customers desire on a timely basis with acceptable quality and at reasonable costs, then our ability to attract and
retain customers, and, therefore, maintain and improve our operating margins, could be materially adversely affected.
Increasing competition for wireless customers could materially adversely affect our operating results.
We have multiple wireless competitors in each of our service areas and compete for customers based principally on service/device
offerings, price, network quality, coverage area and customer service. In addition, we are facing growing competition from providers
offering services using advanced wireless technologies and IP-based networks. We expect market saturation to continue to cause the
wireless industry’s customer growth rate to moderate in comparison with historical growth rates, leading to increased competition for
customers. Our share of industry sales could be reduced due to aggressive pricing strategies pursued by competitors. We also expect that
our customers’ growing demand for high-speed video and data services will place constraints on our network capacity. These
competition and capacity constraints will continue to put pressure on pricing and margins as companies compete for potential customers.
Our ability to respond will depend, among other things, on continued improvement in network quality and customer service and our
ability to price our products and services competitively as well as effective marketing of attractive products and services. These efforts
will involve significant expenses and require strategic management decisions on, and timely implementation of, equipment choices,
network deployment and service offerings.
Ongoing changes in the television industry and consumer viewing patterns could materially adversely affect our operating
results.
Our video subsidiaries derive substantial revenues and profits from cable networks and premium pay television services and the
production and licensing of television programming to broadcast and cable networks and premium pay television services. The U.S.
television industry is continuing to evolve rapidly, with developments in technology leading to new methods for the distribution of video
content and changes in when, where and how audiences consume video content. These changes have led to (1) internet-based streaming
competitors, which are increasing in number and some of which have significant and growing subscriber/user bases, and (2) reduced
viewers of traditional advertising-supported television resulting from increased video consumption through SVOD services (including
our own), time-shifted viewing of television programming and the use of DVRs to skip advertisements. The number of subscribers to
traditional linear programming in the U.S. has been declining in recent years and the U.S. television industry has generally experienced
declines in ratings for programming, which have negatively affected subscription and advertising revenues, and these trends are expected
to continue. The popularity of content, whether on television, on the internet, or through movies, is difficult to predict and can change
rapidly, and low public acceptance of our television, OTT and movie content, including WarnerMedia’s content, could adversely affect
our results of operations. We are taking steps to mitigate the risks from these changes, such as the launch of our HBO Max direct-to-
consumer streaming platform and new, enhanced advertising opportunities, but there can be no assurance that these and other efforts will
be successful in responding to these changes.
17
AT&T Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
Intellectual property rights may be adversely affected by piracy or be inadequate to take advantage of business opportunities,
such as new distribution platforms, which may materially adversely affect our operations.
Increased piracy of video content, products and other intellectual property, particularly in our foreign WarnerMedia and Latin American
operations, will decrease revenues. Mobile and broadband technological developments have made it easier to reproduce and distribute
high-quality unauthorized copies of content. Piracy is particularly prevalent in countries that lack effective copyright and other legal
protections or enforcement measures and thieves can attract users throughout the world. Effective intellectual property protection may
not be available in every country where we operate. We may need to spend significant amounts of money to protect our rights. We are
also increasingly negotiating broader licensing agreements to expand our ability to use new methods to distribute content to customers.
Any impairment of our intellectual property rights, including due to changes in U.S. or foreign intellectual property laws or the absence
of effective legal protections or enforcement measures, or our inability to negotiate broader distribution rights, could materially adversely
impact our operations.
Incidents leading to damage to our reputation, and any resulting lawsuits, claims or other legal proceedings, could have a
material adverse effect on our business.
We believe that our brand image, awareness and reputation strengthen our relationship with consumers and contribute significantly to the
success of our business. We strive to create a culture in which our colleagues act with integrity and respect and feel comfortable speaking
up to report instances of misconduct or other concerns. Our ability to attract and retain employees is highly dependent upon our
commitment to a diverse and inclusive workplace, ethical business practices and other qualities. Acts of misconduct by any employee,
and particularly by senior management, could erode trust and confidence and damage our reputation. Negative public opinion could
result from actual or alleged conduct by us or those currently or formerly associated with us, and from any number of activities or
circumstances, including operations, employment-related offenses (such as sexual harassment and discrimination), regulatory compliance
and actions taken by regulators or others in response to such conduct. We have in the past been, and may in the future be, named as a
defendant in lawsuits, claims and other legal proceedings that arise in the ordinary course of our business based on alleged acts of
misconduct by employees. These actions seek, among other things, compensation for alleged personal injury (including claims for loss of
life), workers’ compensation, employment discrimination, sexual harassment, workplace misconduct, wage and hour claims and other
employment-related damages, compensation for breach of contract, statutory or regulatory claims, negligence or gross negligence,
punitive damages, consequential damages, and civil penalties or other losses or injunctive or declaratory relief. The outcome of any
allegations, lawsuits, claims or legal proceedings is inherently uncertain and could result in significant costs, damage to our brands or
reputation and diversion of management’s attention from our business. Additionally, our news organization makes editorial judgments
around what is covered and how it is covered in the normal course of business. Although we have disciplined practices that are used to
make such editorial judgments, it is possible that our news coverage alienates some consumers, adversely impacts our reputation and
therefore impacts demand for our other products and services. Any damage to our reputation or payments of significant amounts, even if
reserved, could materially and adversely affect our business, reputation, financial condition, results of operations and cash flows.
Company-Specific Financial Factors:
Adoption of new software-based technologies may involve quality and supply chain issues and could increase capital costs.
The communications and digital entertainment industry has experienced rapid changes in the past several years. An increasing number of
our customers are using mobile devices as the primary means of viewing video and an increasing number of nontraditional video
providers are developing content and technologies to satisfy the desire for video entertainment demand. In addition, businesses and
government bodies are broadly shifting to wireless-based services for homes and infrastructure to improve services to their respective
customers and constituencies. We are spending significant capital to shift our wired network to software-based technology to manage this
demand and are expanding 5G wireless technology to address these consumer demands. We are entering into a significant number of
software licensing agreements and working with software developers to provide network functions in lieu of installing switches or other
physical network equipment in order to respond to rapid developments in video and wireless demand. While software-based functionality
can be changed much more quickly than, for example, physical switches, the rapid pace of development means that we may increasingly
need to rely on single-source and software solutions that have not previously been deployed in production environments. Should this
software not function as intended or our license agreements provide inadequate protection from intellectual property infringement claims,
we could be forced to either substitute (if available) or else spend time to develop alternative technologies at a much higher cost and
incur harm to our reputation for reliability, and, as a result, our ability to remain competitive could be materially adversely affected.
18
AT&T Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
We depend on various suppliers to provide equipment to operate our business and satisfy customer demand and interruption or
delay in supply can adversely impact our operating results.
We depend on suppliers to provide us, directly or through other suppliers, with items such as network equipment, customer premises
equipment, video equipment and wireless-related equipment such as mobile hotspots, handsets, wirelessly enabled computers, wireless
data cards and other connected devices for our customers. These suppliers could fail to provide equipment on a timely basis, or fail to
meet our performance expectations, for a number of reasons, including difficulties in obtaining export licenses for certain technologies,
inability to secure component parts, general business disruption, natural disasters, safety issues, economic and political instability and
public health emergencies such as the COVID-19 pandemic. The COVID-19 pandemic has caused, and may again cause, delays in the
development, manufacturing (including the sourcing of key components) and shipment of products. In certain limited circumstances,
suppliers have been unable to supply products in a timely fashion. In such limited circumstances, we have been unable to provide
products and services precisely as and when requested by our customers. It is possible that, in some circumstances, we could be forced to
switch to a different key supplier. Because of the cost and time lag that can be associated with transitioning from one supplier to another,
our business could be substantially disrupted if we were required to, or chose to, replace the products of one or more key suppliers with
products from another source, especially if the replacement became necessary on short notice. Any such disruption could increase our
costs, decrease our operating efficiencies and have a negative effect on our operating results.
Increasing costs to provide video and other services could adversely affect operating margins.
Our operating costs, including customer acquisition and retention costs, could continue to put pressure on margins and customer
retention levels. In addition, most of our video programming that we distribute via our linear services is provided by other companies and
historically the rates they charge us for programming have often increased more than the rate of inflation. In addition, as customer
viewing habits shift to mobile, on-demand and streaming from linear programming, negotiating licensing rights is increasingly
complicated. We are attempting to use our scale and access to wireless customers to change this trend but such negotiations are difficult
and also may result in programming disruption. Our HBO Max streaming platform is another component of our strategy to reach
nontraditional video customers and we are investing heavily to provide a competitive and attractive offering. If we are unable to restrain
these costs or provide programming desired by our customers, it could impact margins and our ability to attract and retain customers. Our
WarnerMedia operations, which create and license content to other providers, also may experience increasing difficulties securing
favorable terms, including those related to pricing, positioning and packaging, during contract negotiations, which may lead to blackouts
of WarnerMedia programming, and WarnerMedia may face greater difficulty in achieving placement of its networks and premium pay
television services in offerings by third parties.
A number of our competitors offering comparable legacy services that rely on alternative technologies and business models are typically
subject to less (or no) regulation, and therefore are able to operate with lower costs. These competitors generally can focus on discrete
customer segments since they do not have regulatory obligations to provide universal service. Also, these competitors have cost
advantages compared to us, due in part to operating on newer, more technically advanced and lower-cost networks and a nonunionized
workforce, lower employee benefits and fewer retirees. We are transitioning services from our old copper-based network and seeking
regulatory approvals, where needed, at both the state and federal levels. If we do not obtain regulatory approvals for our network
transition or obtain approvals with onerous conditions, we could experience significant cost and competitive disadvantages.
We may not realize or sustain the expected benefits from our business transformation initiatives, and these efforts could have a
materially adverse effect on our business, operations, financial condition, results of operations and competitive position.
We have been and will be undertaking certain transformation initiatives, which are designed to reduce costs, streamline distribution,
remove redundancies and simplify and improve processes and support functions. Our focus is on supporting added customer value with
an improved customer experience. We intend for these efficiencies to enable increased investments in our strategic areas of focus which
consist of improving broadband connectivity (for example, fiber and 5G), developing software-based entertainment (such as HBO Max
and AT&T TV) and utilizing WarnerMedia’s storytelling legacy to engage consumers and gain insights across multiple distribution
points. If we do not successfully manage and execute these initiatives, or if they are inadequate or ineffective, we may fail to meet our
financial goals and achieve anticipated benefits, improvements may be delayed, not sustained or not realized and our business, operations
and competitive position could be adversely affected.
19
AT&T Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
If our efforts to attract and retain subscribers to our new HBO Max platform are not successful, our business will be adversely
affected.
HBO Max’s future success is subject to inherent uncertainty. Our ability to continue to attract subscribers to the HBO Max platform will
depend in part on our ability to consistently provide subscribers with compelling content choices, as well as a quality experience for
selecting and viewing those content choices. Furthermore, the relative service levels, content offerings, promotions, and pricing and
related features of competitors to HBO Max may adversely impact our ability to attract and retain subscribers. If consumers do not
perceive our offerings to be of value, including if we introduce new or adjust existing features, adjust pricing or offerings, terminate or
modify promotional or trial period offerings, experience technical issues, or change the mix of content in a manner that is not favorably
received by them, we may not be able to attract and retain subscribers. In addition, many subscribers to these types of offerings originate
from word-of-mouth advertising from then existing subscribers. If our efforts to satisfy subscribers are not successful, including because
we terminate or modify promotional or trial-period offerings or because of technical issues with the platform, we may not be able to
attract or retain subscribers, and as a result, our ability to maintain and/or grow our business will be adversely affected.
If subscribers cancel or decide to not continue subscriptions for any reason, including a perception that they do not use it sufficiently, the
need to cut household expenses, unsatisfactory availability of content, promotions or trial-period offers expire or are modified,
competitive services or promotions provide a better value or experience, and customer service or technical issues are not satisfactorily
resolved, our business will be adversely affected. We must continually add new subscribers both to replace canceled subscribers and to
grow our business. If we do not grow as expected, given, in particular, that a significant portion of our content costs are committed and
contracted over several years based on minimum subscriber delivery levels, we may not be able to adjust our expenditures or increase
our (per subscriber) revenues commensurate with the lowered growth rate such that our margins, liquidity and results of operations may
be adversely impacted. If we are unable to successfully compete with competitors in retaining and attracting new subscribers, our
business will be adversely affected. Further, if excessive numbers of subscribers do cancel, we may be required to incur significantly
higher marketing expenditures or offer significantly more generous promotions to replace these subscribers with new subscribers.
Unfavorable litigation or governmental investigation results could require us to pay significant amounts or lead to onerous
operating procedures.
We are subject to a number of lawsuits both in the United States and in foreign countries, including, at any particular time, claims
relating to antitrust; patent infringement; wage and hour; personal injury; customer privacy violations; regulatory proceedings; and
selling and collection practices. We also spend substantial resources complying with various government standards, which may entail
related investigations and litigation. In the wireless area, we also face current and potential litigation relating to alleged adverse health
effects on customers or employees who use such technologies including, for example, wireless devices. We may incur significant
expenses defending such suits or government charges and may be required to pay amounts or otherwise change our operations in ways
that could materially adversely affect our operations or financial results.
Cyberattacks, equipment failures, natural disasters and terrorist acts may materially adversely affect our operations.
Cyberattacks, major equipment failures or natural disasters, such as flooding, hurricanes and forest fires, whether caused by discrete
severe weather events and/or precipitated by long-term climate change and earthquakes, software problems, terrorist acts or other
breaches of network or IT security that affect our networks, including software and switches, microwave links, third-party-owned local
and long-distance networks on which we rely, our cell sites or other equipment, our satellites, our customer account support and
information systems, or employee and business records could have a material adverse effect on our operations. Our wired network in
particular is becoming increasingly reliant on software as it evolves to handle increasing demands for video transmission. While we have
been subject to security incidents or cyberattacks, these did not result in a material adverse effect on our operations. However, as such
attacks continue to increase in scope and frequency, we may be unable to prevent a significant attack in the future. Our ability to maintain
and upgrade our video programming also depends on our ability to successfully deploy and operate video satellites. Our inability to
deploy or operate our networks or customer support systems or protect sensitive personal information of customers or employees or
valuable technical and marketing information could result in significant expenses, potential legal liability, a loss of current or future
customers and reputation damage, any of which could have a material adverse effect on our operations and financial condition.
20
AT&T Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
Increases in our debt levels to fund acquisitions, additional spectrum purchases, or other strategic decisions could adversely
affect our ability to finance future debt at attractive rates and reduce our ability to respond to competition and adverse economic
trends.
We have incurred debt to fund significant acquisitions, as well as spectrum purchases needed to compete in our industry. While we
believe such decisions were prudent and necessary to take advantage of both growth opportunities and respond to industry developments,
we did experience credit-rating downgrades from historical levels. Banks and potential purchasers of our publicly traded debt may decide
that these strategic decisions and similar actions we may take in the future, as well as expected trends in the industry, will continue to
increase the risk of investing in our debt and may demand a higher rate of interest, impose restrictive covenants or otherwise limit the
amount of potential borrowing. Additionally, our capital allocation plan is focused on, among other things, managing our debt level
going forward. Any failure to successfully execute this plan could adversely affect our cost of funds, liquidity, competitive position and
access to capital markets.
Our business may be impacted by changes in tax laws and regulations, judicial interpretations of same or administrative actions
by federal, state, local and foreign taxing authorities.
Tax laws are dynamic and subject to change as new laws are passed and new interpretations of the law are issued or applied. In many
cases, the application of existing, newly enacted or amended tax laws (such as the U.S. Tax Cuts and Jobs Act of 2017) may be uncertain
and subject to differing interpretations, especially when evaluated against ever changing products and services provided by our global
telecommunications, media, and technology businesses. In addition, tax legislation has been introduced or is being considered in various
jurisdictions that could significantly impact our tax rate, tax liabilities, carrying value of deferred tax assets or deferred tax liabilities.
Any of these changes could materially impact our financial performance and our tax provision, net income and cash flows.
We are also subject to ongoing examinations by taxing authorities in various jurisdictions. Although we regularly assess the likelihood of
an adverse outcome resulting from these examinations to determine the adequacy of provisions for taxes, there can be no assurance as to
the outcome of these examinations. In the event that we have not accurately or fully described, disclosed or determined, calculated or
remitted amounts that were due to taxing authorities or if the ultimate determination of our taxes owed is for an amount in excess of
amounts previously accrued, we could be subject to additional taxes, penalties and interest, which could materially impact our business,
financial condition and operating results.
21
AT&T Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
CAUTIONARY LANGUAGE CONCERNING FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS
Information set forth in this report contains forward-looking statements that are subject to risks and uncertainties, and actual results could
differ materially. Many of these factors are discussed in more detail in the “Risk Factors” section. We claim the protection of the safe
harbor for forward-looking statements provided by the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995.
The following factors could cause our future results to differ materially from those expressed in the forward-looking statements:
•The severity, magnitude and duration of the COVID-19 pandemic and containment, mitigation and other measures taken in response,
including the potential impacts of these matters on our business and operations.
•Our inability to predict the extent to which the COVID-19 pandemic and related impacts will continue to impact our business
operations, financial performance and results of operations.
•Adverse economic, political and/or capital access changes in the markets served by us or in countries in which we have significant
investments and/or operations, including the impact on customer demand and our ability and our suppliers’ ability to access financial
markets at favorable rates and terms.
•Increases in our benefit plans’ costs, including increases due to adverse changes in the United States and foreign securities markets,
resulting in worse-than-assumed investment returns and discount rates; adverse changes in mortality assumptions; adverse medical
cost trends; and unfavorable or delayed implementation or repeal of healthcare legislation, regulations or related court decisions.
•The final outcome of FCC and other federal, state or foreign government agency proceedings (including judicial review, if any, of
such proceedings) and legislative efforts involving issues that are important to our business, including, without limitation, pending
Notices of Apparent Liability; the transition from legacy technologies to IP-based infrastructure, including the withdrawal of legacy
TDM-based services; universal service; broadband deployment; wireless equipment siting regulations and, in particular, siting for
5G service; E911 services; competition policy; privacy; net neutrality; multichannel video programming distributor services and
equipment; content licensing and copyright protection; availability of new spectrum on fair and balanced terms; and wireless and
satellite license awards and renewals.
•Enactment of additional state, local, federal and/or foreign regulatory and tax laws and regulations, or changes to existing standards
and actions by tax agencies and judicial authorities including the resolution of disputes with any taxing jurisdictions, pertaining to
our subsidiaries and foreign investments, including laws and regulations that reduce our incentive to invest in our networks, resulting
in lower revenue growth and/or higher operating costs.
•Potential changes to the electromagnetic spectrum currently used for broadcast television and satellite distribution being considered
by the FCC could negatively impact WarnerMedia’s ability to deliver linear network feeds of its domestic cable networks to its
affiliates, and in some cases, WarnerMedia’s ability to produce high-value news and entertainment programming on location.
•U.S. and foreign laws and regulations, as well as possible private rights of action, regarding intellectual property rights protection
and privacy, personal data protection and user consent are complex and rapidly evolving and could result in adverse impacts to our
business plans, increased costs, or claims against us that may harm our reputation.
•The ability of our competitors to offer product/service offerings at lower prices due to lower cost structures and regulatory and
legislative actions adverse to us, including non-regulation of comparable alternative technologies and/or government-owned or
subsidized networks.
•Disruption in our supply chain for a number of reasons, including, difficulties in obtaining export licenses for certain technology,
inability to secure component parts, general business disruption, natural disasters, safety issues, economic and political instability
and public health emergencies.
•The continued development and delivery of attractive and profitable wireless, video and broadband offerings and devices, and, in
particular, the success of our HBO Max platform; the extent to which regulatory and build-out requirements apply to our offerings;
our ability to match speeds offered by our competitors and the availability, cost and/or reliability of the various technologies and/or
content required to provide such offerings.
•Our ability to generate advertising revenue from attractive video content, especially from WarnerMedia, in the face of unpredictable
and rapidly evolving public viewing habits and legal restrictions on the use of personal data.
•The availability and cost and our ability to adequately fund additional wireless spectrum and network upgrades; and regulations and
conditions relating to spectrum use, licensing, obtaining additional spectrum, technical standards and deployment and usage,
including network management rules.
•Our ability to manage growth in wireless data services, including network quality and acquisition of adequate spectrum at reasonable
costs and terms.
•The outcome of pending, threatened or potential litigation (which includes arbitrations), including, without limitation, patent and
product safety claims by or against third parties.
•The impact from major equipment or software failures on our networks, including satellites operated by DIRECTV; the effect of
security breaches related to the network or customer information; our inability to obtain handsets, equipment/software or have
handsets, equipment/software serviced in a timely and cost-effective manner from suppliers; and in the case of satellites launched,
timely provisioning of services from vendors; or severe weather conditions including flooding and hurricanes, natural disasters
including earthquakes and forest fires, pandemics, energy shortages, wars or terrorist attacks.
•The issuance by the Financial Accounting Standards Board or other accounting oversight bodies of new accounting standards or
changes to existing standards.
•Our ability to successfully integrate our WarnerMedia operations, including the ability to manage various businesses in widely
dispersed business locations and with decentralized management.
22
AT&T Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
•Changes in our corporate strategies, such as changing network-related requirements or acquisitions and dispositions, which may
require significant amounts of cash or stock, to respond to competition and regulatory, legislative and technological developments.
•The uncertainty surrounding further congressional action to address spending reductions, which may result in a significant decrease
in government spending and reluctance of businesses and consumers to spend in general.
Readers are cautioned that other factors discussed in this report, although not enumerated here, also could materially affect our future
earnings.
ITEM 2. PROPERTIES
Our properties do not lend themselves to description by character and location of principal units. At December 31, 2020, of our total
property, plant and equipment, central office equipment represented 29%; outside plant (including cable, wiring and other non-central
office network equipment) represented 23%; other equipment, comprised principally of satellites, wireless network equipment attached
to towers, furniture and office equipment and vehicles and other work equipment, represented 28%; land, building and wireless
communications towers represented 13%; and other miscellaneous property represented 7%.
For our Communications segment, substantially all of the installations of central office equipment are located in buildings and on land
we own. Many garages, administrative and business offices, wireless towers, telephone centers and retail stores are leased. Property on
which communication towers are located may be either owned or leased.
For our WarnerMedia segment, we own or lease offices; studios; technical, production and warehouse spaces; communications facilities
and other properties in numerous locations globally.
ITEM 3. LEGAL PROCEEDINGS
We are a party to numerous lawsuits, regulatory proceedings and other matters arising in the ordinary course of business. As of the date
of this report, we do not believe any pending legal proceedings to which we or our subsidiaries are subject are required to be disclosed as
material legal proceedings pursuant to this item.
ITEM 4. MINE SAFETY DISCLOSURES
Not applicable.
23
AT&T Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
Information about our Executive Officers
(As of February 1, 2021)
Name Age Position Held Since
John T. Stankey 58 Chief Executive Officer and President 7/2020
Edward W. Gillespie 59Senior Executive Vice President - External and Legislative Affairs, AT&T
Services, Inc. 4/2020
David S. Huntley 62 Senior Executive Vice President and Chief Compliance Officer 12/2014
Jason Kilar 49 Chief Executive Officer, Warner Media, LLC 5/2020
Lori M. Lee 55Chief Executive Officer-AT&T Latin America and Global Marketing
Officer 8/2017
David R. McAtee II 52 Senior Executive Vice President and General Counsel 10/2015
Jeffery S. McElfresh 50 Chief Executive Officer, AT&T Communications, LLC 10/2019
Angela R. Santone 49 Senior Executive Vice President - Human Resources 12/2019
John J. Stephens 61 Senior Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer 6/2011
All of the above executive officers have held high-level managerial positions with AT&T or its subsidiaries for more than the past five
years, except for Mr. Gillespie, Mr. Kilar and Ms. Santone. Mr. Gillespie was previously Managing Director of Sard Verbinnen & Co.
from June 2018 to April 2020, Founder and Principal of Ed Gillespie Strategies from February 2009 to December 2016, and Counselor to
the President for George W. Bush, Executive Office of the President at The White House, from July 2007 to January 2009. Mr. Kilar was
previously Co-Founder and Chief Executive Officer of Vessel from 2013 to 2017 and Founder and Chief Executive Officer of Hulu from
2007 to 2013. Ms. Santone was previously Chief Administrative Officer of AT&T from May 2019 to December 2019, Executive Vice
President and Global Chief Human Resources Officer of Turner from February 2016 to April 2019, and Senior Vice President and Chief
Human Resources Officer of Turner from June 2013 to January 2016. Executive officers are not appointed to a fixed term of office.
24
AT&T Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
PART II
ITEM 5. MARKET FOR REGISTRANT’S COMMON EQUITY, RELATED STOCKHOLDER MATTERS AND ISSUER
PURCHASES OF EQUITY SECURITIES
Our common stock is listed on the New York Stock Exchange under the ticker symbol “T”. The number of stockholders of record as of
December 31, 2020 and 2019 was 858,373 and 891,449. The number of stockholders of record as of February 12, 2021, was 854,769. We
declared dividends on common stock, on a quarterly basis, totaling $2.08 per share in 2020 and $2.05 per share in 2019.
STOCK PERFORMANCE GRAPH
The comparison above assumes $100 invested on December 31, 2015, in AT&T common stock and the following Standard & Poor’s
(S&P) Indices: S&P 500 Index and S&P 500 Communications Services Index. We have adopted the S&P 500 Communications Services
Index, which permits us to use a more diversified set of companies in the communications and media sectors that are relevant to our
businesses. Total return equals stock price appreciation plus reinvestment of dividends.
25
AT&T Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
Our Board of Directors has approved the following authorizations to repurchase common stock: (1) March 2013 authorization program
of 300 million shares (19 million outstanding at December 31, 2019, which we completed during the first quarter of 2020) and (2) March
2014 authorization program for 300 million shares, with 178 million outstanding at December 31, 2020. Excluding the impact of
acquisitions, our 2021 financing activities will focus on managing our debt level and paying dividends, subject to approval by our Board
of Directors. We plan to fund our financing uses of cash through a combination of cash from operations, issuance of debt and asset sales.
The timing and mix of any debt issuance and/or refinancing will be guided by credit market conditions and interest rate trends.
To implement these authorizations, we used open market repurchases, relying on Rule 10b5-1 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934,
where feasible. We entered into an Accelerated Share Repurchase agreement and repurchased $4,000 of common stock during the first
quarter of 2020.
We will continue to fund any share repurchases through a combination of cash from operations, borrowings dependent on market
conditions, or cash from the disposition of certain non-strategic investments.
A summary of our repurchases of common stock during the fourth quarter of 2020 is as follows:
ISSUER PURCHASES OF EQUITY SECURITIES
(a) (b) (c) (d)
PeriodTotal Number of
Shares (or Units)
Purchased 
Average Price Paid Per
Share (or Unit)Total Number of Shares
(or Units) Purchased
as Part of Publicly
Announced Plans or
ProgramsMaximum Number (or
Approximate Dollar
Value) of Shares (or
Units) That May Yet Be
Purchased Under The
Plans or Programs
October 1, 2020 -
October 31, 2020 294,518 $ 28.52 6,374 177,935,856
November 1, 2020 -
November 30, 2020 78,988 $ 28.69 5,062 177,930,794
December 1, 2020 -
December 31, 2020 702,940 $ 28.58 586 177,930,208
Total 1,076,446 $ 28.57 12,022 
In March 2014, our Board of Directors approved an authorization to repurchase up to 300 million shares of our common stock. The authorization has
no expiration date.
Of the shares purchased, 510,190 shares were acquired through the withholding of taxes on the vesting of restricted stock and performance shares or
in respect of the exercise price of options.
Of the shares repurchased or transferred, 554,234 shares were transferred from A T&T maintained V oluntary Employee Benefit Association (VEBA)
trusts.1,2,3 1
1
2
3
26
AT&T Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
ITEM 6. SELECTED FINANCIAL DATA
At December 31 and for the year ended: 2020 2019 2018 2017 2016
Financial Data
Operating revenues $ 171,760 $ 181,193 $ 170,756 $ 160,546 $ 163,786 
Operating expenses $ 165,355 $ 153,238 $ 144,660 $ 140,576 $ 140,243 
Operating income $ 6,405 $ 27,955 $ 26,096 $ 19,970 $ 23,543 
Interest expense $ 7,925 $ 8,422 $ 7,957 $ 6,300 $ 4,910 
Equity in net income (loss) of affiliates $ 95 $ 6 $ (48)$ (128)$ 98 
Other income (expense) - net $ (1,431)$ (1,071)$ 6,782 $ 1,597 $ 1,081 
Income tax (benefit) expense $ 965 $ 3,493 $ 4,920 $ (14,708)$ 6,479 
Net Income (Loss) $ (3,821)$ 14,975 $ 19,953 $ 29,847 $ 13,333 
Less: Net Income Attributable to
Noncontrolling Interest $ (1,355)$ (1,072)$ (583)$ (397)$ (357)
Net Income (Loss) Attributable to AT&T $ (5,176)$ 13,903 $ 19,370 $ 29,450 $ 12,976 
Net Income (Loss) Attributable to Common
Stock $ (5,369)$ 13,900 $ 19,370 $ 29,450 $ 12,976 
Basic Earnings Per Common Share:
Net Income (Loss) Attributable to Common
Stock $ (0.75)$ 1.90 $ 2.85 $ 4.77 $ 2.10 
Diluted Earnings Per Common Share:
Net Income (Loss) Attributable to Common
Stock $ (0.75)$ 1.89 $ 2.85 $ 4.76 $ 2.10 
Weighted-average common shares outstanding
(000,000) 7,157 7,319 6,778 6,164 6,168 
Weighted-average common shares outstanding
with dilution (000,000) 7,183 7,348 6,806 6,183 6,189 
End of period common shares outstanding
(000,000) 7,126 7,255 7,282 6,139 6,139 
Dividends declared per common share $ 2.08 $ 2.05 $ 2.01 $ 1.97 $ 1.93 
Cash and cash equivalents $ 9,740 $ 12,130 $ 5,204 $ 50,498 $ 5,788 
Total assets $ 525,761 $ 551,669 $ 531,864 $ 444,097 $ 403,821 
Long-term debt $ 153,775 $ 151,309 $ 166,250 $ 125,972 $ 113,681 
Total debt $ 157,245 $ 163,147 $ 176,505 $ 164,346 $ 123,513 
Debt ratio 46.7 % 44.7 % 47.7 % 53.6 % 49.9 %
Net debt ratio 43.8 % 41.4 % 46.2 % 37.2 % 47.5 %
Book value per common share $ 25.15 $ 27.84 $ 26.63 $ 23.13 $ 20.22 
Capital expenditures $ 15,675 $ 19,635 $ 21,251 $ 21,550 $ 22,408 
Vendor financing payments $ 2,966 $ 3,050 $ 560 $ 572 $ — 
Gross capital investment $ 19,704 $ 23,690 $ 23,240 $ 22,401 $ 22,408 
Spectrum acquisitions $ 1,613 $ 1,316 $ 447 $ (1,380)$ 2,477 
Number of employees 230,760 247,800 268,220 254,000 268,540 
Includes capital expenditures and vendor financing payments and excludes FirstNet reimbursements of $1,063 in 2020, $1,005 in 2019, $1,429 in
2018, $279 in 2017 and $0 in 2016 (see Note 20).
Cash paid for FCC license and domestic spectrum acquired in business acquisitions and swaps, net of auction deposit returns.1
2
1
2
27
AT&T Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
ITEM 7. MANAGEMENT’S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS OF FINANCIAL CONDITION AND RESULTS OF
OPERATIONS
OVERVIEW
AT&T Inc. is referred to as “we,” “AT&T” or the “Company” throughout this document, and the names of the particular subsidiaries and
affiliates providing the services generally have been omitted. AT&T is a holding company whose subsidiaries and affiliates operate
worldwide in the telecommunications, media and technology industries. You should read this discussion in conjunction with the
consolidated financial statements and accompanying notes (Notes). We completed the acquisition of Time Warner Inc. (Time Warner) on
June 14, 2018, and have included its results after that date. In accordance with U.S. generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP),
operating results from Time Warner prior to the acquisition are excluded.
Our Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations included in this document generally
discusses 2020 and 2019 items and year-to-year comparisons between 2020 and 2019. Discussions of 2018 items and year-to-year
comparisons between 2019 and 2018 that are not included in this document can be found in “Management’s Discussion and Analysis of
Financial Condition and Results of Operations” in Part II, Item 7 of our Annual Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended
December 31, 2019.
We have three reportable segments: (1) Communications, (2) WarnerMedia and (3) Latin America. Our segment results presented in
Note 4 and discussed below follow our internal management reporting. We analyze our segments based on segment operating
contribution, which consists of operating income, excluding acquisition-related costs and other significant items and equity in net income
(loss) of affiliates for investments managed within each segment. Each segment’s percentage calculation of total segment operating
revenue and contribution is derived from our segment results table in Note 4 and may total more than 100% due to losses in one or more
segments. Percentage increases and decreases that are not considered meaningful are denoted with a dash.
We have recast our segment results for all prior periods presented to include our prior Xandr segment within our WarnerMedia segment
and to remove the Crunchyroll anime business that is classified as held-for-sale and removed from the WarnerMedia segment, instead
including it in Corporate and Other.
Percent Change
2020 2019 2018 2020 vs. 2019 2019 vs. 2018
Operating Revenues
Communications $ 138,850 $ 142,359 $ 143,721 (2.5) % (0.9)%
WarnerMedia 30,442 35,259 20,585 (13.7) 71.3 
Latin America 5,716 6,963 7,652 (17.9) (9.0)
Corporate and other 1,932 1,865 2,197 3.6 (15.1)
Eliminations and consolidation (5,180) (5,253) (3,399) 1.4 (54.5)
AT&T Operating Revenues 171,760 181,193 170,756 (5.2) 6.1 
Operating Contribution
Communications 30,521 32,230 32,108 (5.3) 0.4 
WarnerMedia 8,210 10,659 7,020 (23.0) 51.8 
Latin America (729) (635) (710) (14.8) 10.6 
Segment Operating Contribution $ 38,002 $ 42,254 $ 38,418 (10.1)% 10.0 %
The Communications segment accounted for approximately 79% of our 2020 total segment operating revenues compared to 77% in
2019 and 80% of our 2020 total segment operating contribution as compared to 76% in 2019. This segment provides services to
businesses and consumers located in the U.S. and businesses globally. Our business strategies reflect bundled product offerings that cut
across product lines and utilize shared assets. In December 2020, we changed our management strategy and reevaluated our domestic
video business, allowing us to maximize value in our domestic video business and further accelerate our ability to innovate and execute
in our fast-growing broadband and fiber business. In conjunction with the strategy change, we separated the former Entertainment Group
into two business units, Video and Broadband, which includes legacy telephony operations. We have recast our results for all prior
periods to split the Entertainment Group into two separate business units, Video and Broadband, and removed video operations from
Business Wireline, combining all video operations in the Video business unit. This segment contains the following business units:
•Mobility provides nationwide wireless service and equipment.
28
AT&T Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
•Video provides video, including over-the-top (OTT) services and also sells multiplatform advertising services as video revenues.
•Broadband provides internet, including broadband fiber, and legacy telephony voice communication services to residential
customers.
•Business Wireline provides advanced IP-based services, as well as traditional voice and data services to business customers.
The WarnerMedia segment accounted for approximately 17% of our 2020 total segment operating revenues compared to 19% in 2019
and 22% of our 2020 total segment operating contribution compared to 25% in 2019. This segment develops, produces and distributes
feature films, television, gaming and other content over various physical and digital formats globally. Historical financial results of
Eliminations & Other included in the WarnerMedia segment have been recast to include Xandr, previously a separate reportable segment,
and to remove the Crunchyroll anime business that was classified as held-for-sale. This segment contains the following:
•Turner primarily operates multichannel basic television networks and digital properties. Turner also sells advertising on its networks
and digital properties.
•Home Box Office consists of premium pay television and HBO Max domestically and premium pay, basic tier television
internationally and content licensing and home entertainment.
•Warner Bros. primarily consists of the production, distribution and licensing of television programming and feature films, the
distribution of home entertainment products and the production and distribution of games.
•Eliminations & Other includes the Xandr advertising business, and also removes transactions between the Turner, Home Box Office
and Warner Bros. business units, including internal sales of content to the HBO Max platform that began in the fourth quarter of 2019
(see Note 5).
The Latin America segment accounted for approximately 3% of our 2020 total segment operating revenues compared to 4% in 2019.
This segment provides entertainment and wireless services outside of the U.S. This segment contains the following business units:
•Vrio provides video services primarily to residential customers using satellite technology in Latin America and the Caribbean.
•Mexico provides wireless service and equipment to customers in Mexico.
COVID-19 Update
Disruptions caused by the coronavirus (COVID-19) and measures taken to prevent its spread or mitigate its effects both domestically and
internationally have impacted our results of operations. We recorded approximately $850, or $0.10 per diluted share, for the year ended
December 31, 2020, of incremental costs associated with voluntary corporate actions taken to protect and compensate front-line
employees and contractors and additional WarnerMedia production disruption.
 
In addition to these incremental costs, we estimate that our operations and comparability were impacted by approximately $2,925, or
$0.33 per diluted share, for the year ended December 31, 2020, for: (1) reluctance of consumers to travel at previous levels, driving
significantly lower international wireless roaming service revenues that do not have a directly correlated expense reduction, (2) the
partial closure of movie theaters and postponement of theatrical releases, leading to lower content revenues, and (3) lower television
licensing and production revenues due to production hiatus, and associated expenses.
With partial reopening of the economy and improved collections experience, the economic effects of the pandemic and resulting societal
changes remain unpredictable. There are a number of uncertainties that could impact our future results of operations, including the
effectiveness of COVID-19 mitigation measures, the duration of the pandemic, the efficacy and widespread distribution of a vaccine,
global economic conditions, changes to our operations, changes in consumer confidence, behaviors and spending, work and learn from
home trends and the sustainability of supply chains. We expect operating results and cash flows to continue to be adversely impacted by
COVID-19 for the duration of the pandemic. We expect our 2021 results to be impacted by the following:
•Lower revenues from the continued partial closure of movie theaters and higher costs based on our decision to distribute 2021 films
on HBO Max in the U.S. simultaneous with theaters for 31 days and costs associated with the international launch of HBO Max;
•Uncertainty in revenues from international wireless roaming services due to reduced travel, particularly in the first quarter; and
•Continued expenses to protect front-line employees, contractors and customers.
29
AT&T Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
RESULTS OF OPERATIONS
Consolidated Results Our financial results are summarized in the following table. We then discuss factors affecting our overall results.
Additional analysis is discussed in our “Segment Results” section. We also discuss our expected revenue and expense trends for 2021 in
the “Operating Environment and Trends of the Business” section. Certain prior-period amounts have been reclassified to conform to the
current period’s presentation.
Percent Change
2020 2019 20182020 vs.
20192019 vs.
2018
Operating revenues
Service $ 152,767 $ 163,499 $ 152,345 (6.6) % 7.3  %
Equipment 18,993 17,694 18,411 7.3 (3.9)
Total Operating Revenues 171,760 181,193 170,756 (5.2) 6.1 
Operating expenses
Operations and support 117,959 123,563 116,184 (4.5) 6.4 
Asset impairments and abandonments 18,880 1,458 46 — — 
Depreciation and amortization 28,516 28,217 28,430 1.1 (0.7)
Total Operating Expenses 165,355 153,238 144,660 7.9 5.9 
Operating Income 6,405 27,955 26,096 (77.1) 7.1 
Interest expense 7,925 8,422 7,957 (5.9) 5.8 
Equity in net income (loss) of affiliates 95 6 (48) — — 
Other income (expense) – net (1,431) (1,071) 6,782 (33.6) — 
Income (Loss) Before Income Taxes (2,856) 18,468 24,873 — (25.8)
Net Income (Loss) (3,821) 14,975 19,953 — (24.9)
Net Income (Loss) Attributable to AT&T (5,176) 13,903 19,370 — (28.2)
Net Income (Loss) Attributable to
Common Stock $ (5,369)$ 13,900 $ 19,370 — % (28.2)%
OVERVIEW
Operating revenues decreased in 2020, with declines in all segments reflecting impacts of the COVID-19 pandemic. Lower
WarnerMedia segment revenues reflect limited and postponed theatrical and home entertainment releases as well as lower television
licensing, productions and advertising revenues. Communications segment revenue declines were driven by continued declines in video
and legacy services, partially offset by higher wireless device sales and increases in strategic and managed business service revenues.
Latin America segment revenue declines were primarily due to foreign exchange rates.
Operations and support expenses decreased in 2020, driven by impacts of the pandemic which resulted in lower broadcast and
programming costs in our Communications and WarnerMedia segments and lower film-related print and advertising costs at
WarnerMedia. Also contributing to declines were a noncash gain of $900 on a spectrum transaction in the first quarter that was recorded
as an offset to operating expenses as well as our continued focus on cost management. Offsetting these expense decreases were higher
costs associated with our investment in HBO Max, employee separation charges and incremental costs related to COVID-19. As part of
our cost and efficiency initiatives, we expect operations and support expense improvements to continue as we size our operations to
reflect the current economic activity level.
Asset impairments and abandonments increased in 2020, primarily due to noncash impairment charges of $15,508 in the fourth
quarter, resulting from our assessment of the recoverability of the long-lived assets and goodwill associated with our video business (see
Notes 7 and 9). The increase also includes a goodwill impairment of $2,212 at our Vrio business unit in the second quarter (see Note 9)
and $780 from the impairment of production and other content inventory at WarnerMedia, with approximately $524 resulting from the
continued shutdown of theaters during the pandemic and the hybrid distribution model for our 2021 film slate (see Note 11). Charges in
2019 primarily related to the abandonment of certain copper assets that were not necessary to support future network activity (see Note
7).
30
AT&T Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
Depreciation and amortization expense increased in 2020.
Amortization expense increased $307, or 3.9%, in 2020 due to the amortization of orbital slot licenses, which began in the first quarter of
2020 (see Note 1). Amortization expense in 2021 will reflect approximately $1,200 of reductions from the 2020 impairment of orbital
slots and customers lists associated with our domestic video business (see Note 9).
Depreciation expense decreased $8 in 2020 primarily due to ongoing capital spend for network upgrades and expansion partially offset
by fully depreciated assets in our Communications segment. Depreciation expense in 2021 will reflect approximately $480 of reductions
from the 2020 impairment of property, plant and equipment associated with our domestic video business (see Note 7).
Operating income decreased in 2020 and increased in 2019. Our operating margin was 3.7% in 2020, compared to 15.4% in 2019 and
15.3% in 2018.
Interest expense decreased in 2020, primarily due to lower interest rates and debt balances.
Equity in net income (loss) of affiliates increased in 2020, reflecting changes in our investment portfolio, including $130 equity in
earnings resulting from an investee transaction.
Other income (expense) – net decreased in 2020 primarily due to the recognition of $1,405 of debt redemption costs and lower income
from Rabbi trusts and other investments. Offsetting the decrease were lower actuarial losses in 2020, $4,169 compared to $5,171 in 2019
(see Note 15).
Income tax expense decreased in 2020, primarily driven by decreased income before income taxes offset by impairments of goodwill
(see Note 9), which are not deductible for tax purposes.
Our effective tax rate was (33.8)% in 2020, 18.9% in 2019, and 19.8% in 2018. The effective tax rate in 2020 was impacted by the
goodwill impairments, which are not deductible for tax purposes.
Segment Results Our segments are strategic business units that offer different products and services over various technology platforms
and/or in different geographies that are managed accordingly. Our segment results presented below follow our internal management
reporting. In addition to segment operating contribution, we also evaluate segment performance based on EBITDA and/or EBITDA
margin. EBITDA is defined as segment operating contribution, excluding equity in net income (loss) of affiliates and depreciation and
amortization. We believe EBITDA to be a relevant and useful measurement to our investors as it is part of our internal management
reporting and planning processes and it is an important metric that management uses to evaluate operating performance. EBITDA does
not give effect to depreciation and amortization expenses incurred in operating contribution nor is it burdened by cash used for debt
service requirements and thus does not reflect available funds for distributions, reinvestment or other discretionary uses. EBITDA margin
is EBITDA divided by total revenues.
31
AT&T Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
COMMUNICATIONS SEGMENTPercent Change
2020 2019 20182020 vs.
20192019 vs.
2018
Segment Operating Revenues
Mobility $ 72,564 $ 71,056 $ 70,521 2.1  % 0.8  %
Video 28,610 32,124 33,363 (10.9) (3.7)
Broadband 12,318 13,012 13,108 (5.3) (0.7)
Business Wireline 25,358 26,167 26,729 (3.1) (2.1)
Total Segment Operating Revenues 138,850 142,359 143,721 (2.5) (0.9)
Segment Operating Contribution
Mobility 22,372 22,321 21,568 0.2 3.5 
Video 1,729 2,064 1,331 (16.2) 55.1 
Broadband 1,822 2,681 3,369 (32.0) (20.4)
Business Wireline 4,598 5,164 5,840 (11.0) (11.6)
Total Segment Operating Contribution $ 30,521 $ 32,230 $ 32,108 (5.3) % 0.4  %
Selected Subscribers and Connections
December 31,
(000s) 2020 2019 2018
Mobility subscribers 182,558 165,889 151,921 
Total domestic broadband connections 15,384 15,389 15,701 
Network access lines in service 7,263 8,487 10,002 
U-verse VoIP connections 3,816 4,370 5,114 
Operating revenues decreased in 2020 and were impacted by the COVID-19 pandemic. Declines in our Video, Broadband and Business
Wireline business units were partially offset by increases in our Mobility business unit. The decrease also reflects the continued shift
away from linear video and legacy services, partially offset by higher equipment and service revenues.
Operating contribution decreased in 2020 and increased in 2019. The 2020 operating contribution includes declines in our Video,
Broadband and Business Wireline business units, and reflects stable operating contribution from our Mobility business. Our
Communications segment operating income margin was 22.0% in 2020, 22.6% in 2019 and 22.3% in 2018.
Communications Business Unit Discussion
Mobility Results
Percent Change
2020 2019 20182020 vs.
20192019 vs.
2018
Operating revenues
Service $ 55,542 $ 55,331 $ 54,295 0.4  % 1.9 %
Equipment 17,022 15,725 16,226 8.2 (3.1)
Total Operating Revenues 72,564 71,056 70,521 2.1 0.8 
Operating expenses
Operations and support 42,106 40,681 40,690 3.5 — 
Depreciation and amortization 8,086 8,054 8,263 0.4 (2.5)
Total Operating Expenses 50,192 48,735 48,953 3.0 (0.4)
Operating Income 22,372 22,321 21,568 0.2 3.5 
Equity in Net Income (Loss) of Affiliates — — — — — 
Operating Contribution $ 22,372 $ 22,321 $ 21,568 0.2  % 3.5  %
32
AT&T Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
The following tables highlight other key measures of performance for Mobility:
Subscribers
Percent Change
(in 000s) 2020 2019 20182020 vs.
20192019 vs.
2018
Postpaid 77,154 75,207 76,068 2.6 % (1.1)%
Prepaid 18,102 17,803 16,828 1.7 5.8 
Reseller 6,535 6,893 7,693 (5.2) (10.4)
Connected devices 80,767 65,986 51,332 22.4 28.5 
Total Mobility Subscribers 182,558 165,889 151,921 10.0  % 9.2  %
Includes data-centric devices such as wholesale automobile systems, monitoring devices, fleet management and session-based tablets.
Mobility Net Additions
Percent Change
(in 000s) 2020 2019 20182020 vs.
20192019 vs.
2018
Postpaid Phone Net Additions 1,457 483 194 —  % —  %
Total Phone Net Additions 1,640 989 1,248 65.8 (20.8)
Postpaid 2,183 (435) (90) — — 
Prepaid 379 677 1,301 (44.0) (48.0)
Reseller (449) (928) (1,599) 51.6 42.0 
Connected devices 14,785 14,645 12,324 1.0 18.8 
Mobility Net Subscriber Additions 16,898 13,959 11,936 21.1  % 16.9  %
Postpaid Churn 0.98  % 1.18  % 1.12  % (20) BP 6  BP
Postpaid Phone-Only Churn 0.79  % 0.95  % 0.90  % (16) BP 5  BP
Excludes acquisition-related additions during the period.
In addition to postpaid phones, includes tablets and wearables and other . Tablet net (losses) were (512), (1,487) and (1,200) for the years ended
December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018, respectively . Wearables and other net adds were 1,223, 569 and 916 for the years ended December 31, 2020,
2019 and 2018, respectively .
Includes data-centric devices such as session-based tablets, monitoring devices and primarily wholesale automobile systems. Excludes postpaid
tablets.
Calculated by dividing the aggregate number of wireless subscribers who canceled service during a month by the total number of wireless
subscribers at the beginning of that month. The churn rate for the period is equal to the average of the churn rate for each month of that period.
The year ended December 31, 2020, includes 188 subscriber disconnections resulting from updating our prepaid activation policy .
The year ended December 31, 2020, includes subscribers transferred in connection with business dispositions.
Service revenue increased during 2020 largely due to growth in phone subscribers and connected devices, offset by declines in
international roaming revenue due to reduced travel during the pandemic. Successful offers aimed at customer retention contributed to
subscriber growth and lower churn.
ARPU
Average revenue per subscriber (ARPU) decreased primarily due to the decline in international roaming and waived fees.
Churn
The effective management of subscriber churn is critical to our ability to maximize revenue growth and to maintain and improve
margins. Postpaid churn and postpaid phone-only churn were lower in 2020 due to migrations to unlimited plans, continued network
improvements, subscriber retention offers in the fourth quarter, and lower overall involuntary disconnects.1
1
5
2, 6
5, 6
6
3
1
4
4
1 
2
3 
4
5
6
1
33
AT&T Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
Equipment revenue increased in 2020 primarily due to higher equipment revenue from higher postpaid upgrade volumes, the mix of
sales of higher-priced smartphones, and higher sales of data devices, including wearables, wireless modems and hotspots.
Operations and support expenses increased in 2020, largely driven by higher equipment costs, increased commission deferral
amortization and intercompany content costs associated with plans offering HBO Max, partially offset by lower bad debt expense. The
increase in commission deferral amortization is partly offset by the impacts of our second-quarter 2020 updates to extend the expected
economic life of our Mobility customers.
Depreciation expense increased in 2020, primarily due to ongoing capital spending for network upgrades and expansion partially offset
by fully depreciated assets.
Operating income increased in 2020 and 2019. Our Mobility operating income margin was 30.8% in 2020, 31.4% in 2019 and 30.6% in
2018. Our Mobility EBITDA margin was 42.0% in 2020, 42.7% in 2019 and 42.3% in 2018.
Subscriber Relationships
As the wireless industry has matured, future wireless growth will depend on our ability to offer innovative services, plans and devices
that take advantage of our premier 5G wireless network, which went nationwide in July 2020, and to provide these services in bundled
product offerings. Subscribers that purchase two or more services from us have significantly lower churn than subscribers that purchase
only one service. To support higher mobile data usage, our priority is to best utilize a wireless network that has sufficient spectrum and
capacity to support these innovations on as broad a geographic basis as possible.
To attract and retain subscribers in a mature and highly competitive market, we have launched a wide variety of plans, including our
FirstNet and prepaid products, and arrangements that bundle our video services. Virtually all of our postpaid smartphone subscribers are
on plans that provide for service on multiple devices at reduced rates, and subscribers to such plans tend to have higher retention and
lower churn rates. We offer unlimited data plans and such subscribers also tend to have higher retention and lower churn rates. Our
offerings are intended to encourage existing subscribers to upgrade their current services and/or add devices, attract subscribers from
other providers and/or minimize subscriber churn.
Connected Devices
Connected devices include data-centric devices such as wholesale automobile systems, monitoring devices, fleet management and
session-based tablets. Connected device subscribers increased in 2020, and we added approximately 9.9 million wholesale connected
cars through agreements with various carmakers, and experienced strong growth in other Internet of Things (IoT) connections. These
connected car agreements give us the opportunity to create future retail relationships with the car owners.
Video Results
Percent Change
2020 2019 20182020 vs.
20192019 vs.
2018
Operating revenues
Service $ 28,465 $ 32,123 $ 33,363 (11.4)% (3.7)%
Equipment 145 1 — — — 
Total Operating Revenues 28,610 32,124 33,363 (10.9) (3.7)
Operating expenses
Operations and support 24,619 27,599 29,334 (10.8) (5.9)
Depreciation and amortization 2,262 2,461 2,698 (8.1) (8.8)
Total Operating Expenses 26,881 30,060 32,032 (10.6) (6.2)
Operating Income 1,729 2,064 1,331 (16.2) 55.1 
Equity in Net Income (Loss) of Affiliates — — — — — 
Operating Contribution $ 1,729 $ 2,064 $ 1,331 (16.2) % 55.1 %
34
AT&T Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
The following tables highlight other key measures of performance for Video:
Connections
Percent Change
(in 000s) 2020 2019 20182020 vs.
20192019 vs.
2018
Video Connections
Premium TV 16,505 19,496 22,926 (15.3)% (15.0)%
AT&T TV NOW 656 926 1,591 (29.2) (41.8)
Total Video Connections 17,161 20,422 24,517 (16.0)% (16.7)%
Beginning in January 2021, A T&T TV NOW has been combined with A T&T TV .
Net Additions
Percent Change
(in 000s) 2020 2019 20182020 vs.
20192019 vs.
2018
Video Net Additions
Premium TV (2,991) (3,430) (1,189) 12.8 % — %
AT&T TV NOW (270) (665) 436 59.4 — 
Net Video Additions (3,261) (4,095) (753) 20.4 % — %
Beginning in January 2021, A T&T TV NOW has been combined with A T&T TV .
Service revenues are comprised of video entertainment subscription and advertising revenues. Revenues decreased in 2020 and 2019,
largely driven by a decline in premium TV and OTT subscribers as we continue to focus on retention of existing subscribers with a
particular focus on our high-value subscribers. Partially offsetting video revenue declines was higher advertising revenues during a
general election year. Consistent with the rest of the industry, our customers continue to shift from a premium linear video service to
more economically priced OTT and subscription video on demand offerings, which has impacted our video revenues.
Equipment revenue increased in 2020 primarily due to the nationwide introduction of our IP-based AT&T TV service in early 2020.
Operations and support expenses decreased in 2020 and 2019, largely driven by lower content costs from fewer subscribers, partially
offset by annual content rate increases, including those associated with NFL SUNDAY TICKET and pandemic-related compassion
payments made in the first half of 2020.
Depreciation expense decreased in 2020 and 2019, due to network assets becoming fully depreciated.
Operating income decreased in 2020 and increased in 2019. Our Video operating income margin was 6.0% in 2020, 6.4% in 2019 and
4.0% in 2018. Our Video EBITDA margin was 13.9% in 2020, 14.1% in 2019 and 12.1% in 2018.1
1
1
1
1
1
35
AT&T Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
Broadband Results
Percent Change
2020 2019 20182020 vs.
20192019 vs.
2018
Operating revenues
High-speed internet $ 8,534 $ 8,403 $ 7,956 1.6 % 5.6 %
Legacy voice and data services 2,213 2,573 3,042 (14.0) (15.4)
Other service and equipment 1,571 2,036 2,110 (22.8) (3.5)
Total Operating Revenues 12,318 13,012 13,108 (5.3) (0.7)
Operating expenses
Operations and support 7,582 7,451 7,116 1.8 4.7 
Depreciation and amortization 2,914 2,880 2,623 1.2 9.8 
Total Operating Expenses 10,496 10,331 9,739 1.6 6.1 
Operating Income 1,822 2,681 3,369 (32.0) (20.4)
Equity in Net Income (Loss) of Affiliates — — — — — 
Operating Contribution $ 1,822 $ 2,681 $ 3,369 (32.0) % (20.4)%
The following tables highlight other key measures of performance for Broadband:
Connections
Percent Change
(in 000s) 2020 2019 20182020 vs.
20192019 vs.
2018
Broadband Connections
Total Broadband Connections 14,100 14,119 14,409 (0.1)% (2.0)%
Fiber Broadband Connections 4,951 3,887 2,763 27.4 40.7 
Voice Connections
Retail Consumer Switched Access Lines 2,862 3,329 3,967 (14.0) (16.1)
U-verse Consumer VoIP Connections 3,231 3,794 4,582 (14.8) (17.2)
Total Retail Consumer Voice Connections 6,093 7,123 8,549 (14.5)% (16.7)%
Net Additions
Percent Change
(in 000s) 2020 2019 20182020 vs.
20192019 vs.
2018
Broadband Net Additions
Total Broadband Net Additions (19) (290) 59 93.4 % — %
Fiber Broadband Net Additions 1,064 1,124 1,034 (5.3)% 8.7 %
High-speed internet revenues increased in 2020 and 2019, reflecting higher ARPU resulting from the continued shift of subscribers to
our higher-speed fiber services and pricing actions.
Legacy voice and data service revenues decreased in 2020 and 2019, reflecting the continued decline in the number of customers.
Other service and equipment revenues decreased in 2020 and 2019, reflecting the continued decline in the number of VoIP customers.
36
AT&T Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
Operations and support expenses increased in 2020, largely driven by intercompany content costs associated with plans offering HBO
Max. Expense increases in 2020 and 2019 also reflect higher acquisition and fulfillment cost deferral amortization, including the impact
of updates to decrease the estimated economic life of our subscribers.
Depreciation expense increased in 2020 and 2019, primarily due to ongoing capital spending for network upgrades and expansion.
Operating income decreased in 2020 and 2019. Our Broadband operating income margin was 14.8% in 2020, 20.6% in 2019 and 25.7%
in 2018. Our Broadband EBITDA margin was 38.4% in 2020, 42.7% in 2019 and 45.7% in 2018.
Business Wireline Results
Percent Change
2020 2019 20182020 vs.
20192019 vs.
2018
Operating revenues
Strategic and managed services $ 15,788 $ 15,430 $ 14,649 2.3 % 5.3 %
Legacy voice and data services 8,183 9,180 10,674 (10.9) (14.0)
Other service and equipment 1,387 1,557 1,406 (10.9) 10.7 
Total Operating Revenues 25,358 26,167 26,729 (3.1) (2.1)
Operating expenses
Operations and support 15,534 16,069 16,181 (3.3) (0.7)
Depreciation and amortization 5,226 4,934 4,708 5.9 4.8 
Total Operating Expenses 20,760 21,003 20,889 (1.2) 0.5 
Operating Income 4,598 5,164 5,840 (11.0) (11.6)
Equity in Net Income (Loss) of Affiliates — — — — — 
Operating Contribution $ 4,598 $ 5,164 $ 5,840 (11.0)% (11.6)%
Strategic and managed services revenues increased in 2020. Our strategic services are made up of (1) data services, including our VPN,
dedicated internet ethernet and broadband, (2) voice service, including VoIP and cloud-based voice solutions, (3) security and cloud
solutions, and (4) managed, professional and outsourcing services. Revenue increases were primarily attributable to growth in our
security and cloud solutions, dedicated internet and voice services and the impact of higher demand for connectivity due to the pandemic.
Legacy voice and data service revenues decreased in 2020, primarily due to lower demand as customers continue to shift to our more
advanced IP-based offerings or our competitors.
Other service and equipment revenues decreased in 2020, reflecting higher prior-year licensing of intellectual property assets. Revenue
trends are impacted by the licensing of intellectual property assets, which vary from period-to-period. Other service revenues include
project-based revenue, which is nonrecurring in nature, as well as revenues from customer premises equipment.
Operations and support expenses decreased in 2020, primarily due to our continued efforts to drive efficiencies in our network
operations through automation and reductions in customer support expenses through digitization.
Depreciation expense increased in 2020, reflecting increases in capital spending for network upgrades and expansion.
Operating income decreased in 2020 and 2019. Our Business Wireline operating income margin was 18.1% in 2020, 19.7% in 2019 and
21.8% in 2018. Our Business Wireline EBITDA margin was 38.7% in 2020, 38.6% in 2019 and 39.5% in 2018.
37
AT&T Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
WARNERMEDIA SEGMENT
Percent Change
2020 2019 20182020 vs.
20192019 vs.
2018
Segment Operating Revenues
Turner $ 12,568 $ 13,122 $ 6,979 (4.2)% — %
Home Box Office 6,808 6,749 3,598 0.9 — 
Warner Bros. 12,154 14,358 8,703 (15.4) — 
Eliminations & Other (1,088) 1,030 1,305 — — 
Total Segment Operating Revenues 30,442 35,259 20,585 (13.7) — 
Cost of revenues
Turner 5,330 5,970 2,815 (10.7) — 
Home Box Office 4,356 3,248 1,669 34.1 — 
Warner Bros. 8,236 10,006 6,130 (17.7) — 
Selling, general and administrative 5,803 5,368 2,895 8.1 — 
Eliminations & Other (2,146) (420) (230) — — 
Depreciation and amortization 671 589 311 13.9 — 
Total Operating Expenses 22,250 24,761 13,590 (10.1) — 
Operating Income 8,192 10,498 6,995 (22.0) — 
Equity in Net Income (Loss) of Affiliates 18 161 25 (88.8) — 
Total Segment Operating Contribution $ 8,210 $ 10,659 $ 7,020 (23.0)% — %
Our WarnerMedia segment includes our Turner, Home Box Office (HBO) and Warner Bros. business units. The order of presentation
reflects the consistency of revenue streams, rather than overall magnitude as that is subject to timing and frequency of studio releases.
Historical financial results of the WarnerMedia segment, (Eliminations & Other) have been recast to include Xandr, previously a separate
reportable segment, and to remove the Crunchyroll anime business that is classified as held-for-sale.
The WarnerMedia segment does not include results from Time Warner operations prior to our June 14, 2018 acquisition. For this reason,
2018 results are not comparable to the other two years presented for this segment and therefore percent changes comparing 2018 and
2019 are not shown in the tables. Otter Media and HBO Latin America Group (HBO LAG) are included as equity method investments
prior to our acquiring the remaining interests in each, which occurred in August 2018 and May 2020, respectively. Both are included in
the segment operating results following the dates of acquisition. Consistent with our past practice, many of the impacts of the fair value
adjustments from the application of purchase accounting required under GAAP have not been allocated to the segment, instead they are
reported as acquisition-related items in the reconciliation to consolidated results.
Operating revenues decreased in 2020, primarily due to lower theatrical and television product revenues, reflecting the pandemic-
related postponement of theatrical releases and theatrical and television production delays at Warner Bros. Turner revenues also
decreased due to lower advertising revenues resulting from cancellation and shifting of sporting events, and/or compressed seasons. HBO
revenues partially offset these decreases, driven by growth in international revenues and domestic HBO Max retail subscribers, partially
offset by lower licensing revenues.
Operating contribution decreased in 2020 and increased in 2019. The WarnerMedia segment operating income margin was 26.9% in
2020, 29.8% in 2019 and 34.0% in 2018.
38
AT&T Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
WarnerMedia Business Unit Discussion
Turner Results
Percent Change
2020 2019 20182020 vs.
 20192019 vs.
 2018
Operating revenues
Subscription $ 7,613 $ 7,736 $ 4,207 (1.6)% — %
Advertising 3,941 4,566 2,330 (13.7) — 
Content and other 1,014 820 442 23.7 — 
Total Operating Revenues 12,568 13,122 6,979 (4.2) — 
Operating expenses
Cost of revenues 5,330 5,970 2,815 (10.7) — 
Selling, general and administrative 1,624 1,770 979 (8.2) — 
Depreciation and amortization 277 235 131 17.9 — 
Total Operating Expenses 7,231 7,975 3,925 (9.3) — 
Operating Income 5,337 5,147 3,054 3.7 — 
Equity in Net Income (Loss) of Affiliates (2) 52 54 — — 
Operating Contribution $ 5,335 $ 5,199 $ 3,108 2.6 % — %
Operating revenues decreased in 2020 primarily due to lower advertising revenues resulting from the cancellation of the NCAA
Division I Men’s Basketball Tournament in the first quarter of 2020 and the impacts from shifting sporting event schedules and/or
compressed seasons, such as the delay of the NBA season that historically has started earlier in the fourth quarter. These revenue declines
were partially offset by increased advertising due to news coverage of general elections and COVID-19 developments. Operating
revenue declines were also caused by lower subscription revenues at regional sports networks and unfavorable exchange rates, partially
offset by higher content and other revenue, including internal sales to HBO Max, which are eliminated in consolidation within the
WarnerMedia segment.
Cost of revenues decreased in 2020 primarily due to lower sports programming costs as a result of the previously mentioned
cancellations and modifications to the timing and/or duration of various sporting events.
Selling, general and administrative decreased in 2020 driven by cost-saving initiatives.
Operating income increased in 2020 and 2019. Our Turner operating income margin was 42.5% in 2020, 39.2% in 2019 and 43.8% in
2018.
39
AT&T Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
Home Box Office Results
Percent Change
2020 2019 20182020 vs.
20192019 vs.
2018
Operating revenues
Subscription $ 6,090 $ 5,814 $ 3,201 4.7 % — %
Content and other 718 935 397 (23.2) — 
Total Operating Revenues 6,808 6,749 3,598 0.9 — 
Operating expenses
Cost of revenues 4,356 3,248 1,669 34.1 — 
Selling, general and administrative 1,672 1,064 518 57.1 — 
Depreciation and amortization 98 102 56 (3.9) — 
Total Operating Expenses 6,126 4,414 2,243 38.8 — 
Operating Income 682 2,335 1,355 (70.8) — 
Equity in Net Income (Loss) of Affiliates 16 30 29 (46.7) — 
Operating Contribution $ 698 $ 2,365 $ 1,384 (70.5)% — %
Operating revenues increased in 2020, primarily due to the May 2020 acquisition of HBO LAG and higher domestic HBO Max retail
subscribers, partially offset by decreases in content and other revenue from lower content licensing. At December 31, 2020, we had 41.5
million U.S. subscribers from HBO and HBO Max, up from 34.6 million at December 31, 2019, including growth from intercompany
relationships with the Communications segment.
Cost of revenues increased in 2020, primarily due to approximately $1,800 of programming investment related to HBO Max.
Selling, general and administrative increased in 2020, primarily due to higher marketing costs associated with HBO Max.
Operating income decreased in 2020 and increased in 2019. Our HBO operating income margin was 10.0% in 2020, 34.6% in 2019 and
37.7% in 2018.
Warner Bros. Results
Percent Change
2020 2019 20182020 vs.
 20192019 vs.
 2018
Operating revenues
Theatrical product $ 4,389 $ 5,978 $ 4,002 (26.6)% — %
Television product 6,171 6,367 3,621 (3.1) — 
Games and other 1,594 2,013 1,080 (20.8) — 
Total Operating Revenues 12,154 14,358 8,703 (15.4) — 
Operating expenses
Cost of revenues 8,236 10,006 6,130 (17.7) — 
Selling, general and administrative 1,681 1,810 1,000 (7.1) — 
Depreciation and amortization 169 162 96 4.3 — 
Total Operating Expenses 10,086 11,978 7,226 (15.8) — 
Operating Income 2,068 2,380 1,477 (13.1) — 
Equity in Net Income (Loss) of Affiliates (70) (30) (28) — — 
Operating Contribution $ 1,998 $ 2,350 $ 1,449 (15.0)% — %
40
AT&T Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
Operating revenues decreased in 2020, primarily due to pandemic-related movie theater closures and television and theatrical
production delays.
Theatrical product revenues were lower due to theaters closing for a significant portion of the year and postponement of theatrical
releases, which also reduced licensing revenues, such as home entertainment licensing. Additionally, unfavorable comparisons to the
prior-year releases, which included, in 2019, Joker and carryover revenues from the theatrical release of Aquaman, compared to the
limited-capacity theater and hybrid HBO Max distribution release of Wonder Woman 1984, in late 2020.
Television product revenues decreased primarily due to lower initial telecast revenues resulting from television production delays,
including delays in the start of the 2020-2021 broadcast season, partially offset by increased licensing, including internal sales to HBO
Max, which are eliminated in consolidation within the WarnerMedia segment.
Games and other revenue declines were primarily due to reduced studio operations and unfavorable games comparison to the prior year,
which included, in 2019, the release of Mortal Kombat 11.
Cost of revenues decreased in 2020, primarily due to the production hiatus and lower marketing of theatrical product, partially offset by
incremental production shutdown costs.
Selling, general and administrative decreased in 2020, primarily due to lower print and advertising expenses from limited theatrical
releases and lower distribution fees.
Operating income decreased in 2020 and increased in 2019. Our Warner Bros. operating income margin was 17.0% in 2020, 16.6% in
2019 and 17.0% in 2018.
LATIN AMERICA SEGMENT
Percent Change
2020 2019 20182020 vs.
20192019 vs.
2018
Segment Operating Revenues
Vrio $ 3,154 $ 4,094 $ 4,784 (23.0)% (14.4)%
Mexico 2,562 2,869 2,868 (10.7) — 
Total Segment Operating Revenues 5,716 6,963 7,652 (17.9) (9.0)
Segment Operating Contribution
Vrio (142) 83 347 — (76.1)
Mexico (587) (718) (1,057) 18.2 32.1 
Total Segment Operating Contribution $ (729)$ (635)$ (710) (14.8)% 10.6 %
Our Latin America operations conduct business in their local currency and operating results are converted to U.S. dollars using official
exchange rates, subjecting results to foreign currency fluctuations. In May 2020, we found it necessary to close our DIRECTV operations
in Venezuela due to political instability in the country and to comply with sanctions of the U.S. government.
Operating revenues decreased in 2020, primarily driven by foreign exchange rates and overall economic impacts.
Operating contribution decreased in 2020, reflecting foreign exchange rates and overall economic impacts, and increased in 2019, due
to improvement in Mexico. Our Latin America segment operating income margin was (13.2)% in 2020, (9.5)% in 2019 and (9.7)% in
2018.
41
AT&T Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
Latin America Business Unit Discussion
Vrio Results
Percent Change
2020 2019 20182020 vs.
20192019 vs.
2018
Operating revenues $ 3,154 $ 4,094 $ 4,784 (23.0)% (14.4)%
Operating expenses
Operations and support 2,800 3,378 3,743 (17.1) (9.8)
Depreciation and amortization 520 660 728 (21.2) (9.3)
Total Operating Expenses 3,320 4,038 4,471 (17.8) (9.7)
Operating Income (Loss) (166) 56 313 — (82.1)
Equity in Net Income of Affiliates 24 27 34 (11.1) (20.6)
Operating Contribution $ (142)$ 83 $ 347 — % (76.1)%
The following tables highlight other key measures of performance for Vrio:
Percent Change
(in 000s) 2020 2019 20182020 vs.
 20192019 vs.
 2018
Vrio Video Subscribers 10,942 13,331 13,838 (17.9)% (3.7)%
Percent Change
(in 000s) 2020 2019 20182020 vs.
20192019 vs.
2018
Vrio Video Net Subscriber Additions (148) (285) 250 48.1 % — %
2020 excludes the impact of 2.2 million subscriber disconnections resulting from the closure of our DIRECTV operations in V enezuela.
Operating revenues decreased in 2020, primarily driven by foreign exchange and overall economic impacts.
Operations and support expenses decreased in 2020, primarily driven by foreign exchange and overall economic impacts.
Approximately 21% of Vrio expenses are U.S. dollar-based, with the remainder in the local currency.
Depreciation expense decreased in 2020, primarily due to changes in foreign exchange rates.
Operating income decreased in 2020 and 2019. Our Vrio operating income margin was (5.3)% in 2020, 1.4% in 2019 and 6.5% in 2018.
Our Vrio EBITDA margin was 11.2% in 2020, 17.5% in 2019 and 21.8% in 2018.1
1
42
AT&T Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
Mexico Results
Percent Change
2020 2019 20182020 vs.
20192019 vs.
2018
Operating revenues
Service $ 1,656 $ 1,863 $ 1,701 (11.1) % 9.5 %
Equipment 906 1,006 1,167 (9.9) (13.8)
Total Operating Revenues 2,562 2,869 2,868 (10.7) — 
Operating expenses
Operations and support 2,636 3,085 3,415 (14.6) (9.7)
Depreciation and amortization 513 502 510 2.2 (1.6)
Total Operating Expenses 3,149 3,587 3,925 (12.2) (8.6)
Operating Income (Loss) (587) (718) (1,057) 18.2 32.1 
Equity in Net Income (Loss) of Affiliates — — — — — 
Operating Contribution $ (587)$ (718)$ (1,057) 18.2  % 32.1 %
The following tables highlight other key measures of performance for Mexico:
Percent Change
(in 000s) 2020 2019 20182020 vs.
20192019 vs.
2018
Mexico Wireless Subscribers
Postpaid 4,696 5,103 5,805 (8.0)% (12.1)%
Prepaid 13,758 13,584 12,264 1.3 10.8 
Reseller 489 472 252 3.6 87.3 
Mexico Wireless Subscribers 18,943 19,159 18,321 (1.1)% 4.6 %
Percent Change
(in 000s) 2020 2019 20182020 vs.
20192019 vs.
2018
Mexico Wireless Net Additions
Postpaid (407) (608) 307 33.1 % — %
Prepaid 174 1,919 2,867 (90.9) (33.1)
Reseller 118 219 48 (46.1) — 
Mexico Wireless Net Additions (115) 1,530 3,222 — % (52.5)%
2020 excludes the impact of 101 subscriber disconnections resulting from conforming our policy on reporting of fixed wireless resellers.
Service revenues decreased in 2020, primarily due to foreign exchange rates, as well as lower volumes and store traffic related to
COVID-19.
Equipment revenues decreased in 2020, primarily due to lower equipment sales volumes related to COVID-19 and changes in foreign
exchange rates.
Operations and support expenses decreased in 2020, primarily due to lower equipment sales and changes in foreign exchange rates.
Approximately 7% of Mexico expenses are U.S. dollar-based, with the remainder in the local currency.
Depreciation expense increased in 2020, primarily due to amortization of spectrum licenses and higher in-service assets. These increases
were partially offset by changes in foreign exchange rates.
Operating income increased in 2020 and 2019. Our Mexico operating income margin was (22.9)% in 2020, (25.0)% in 2019 and
(36.9)% in 2018. Our Mexico EBITDA margin was (2.9)% in 2020, (7.5)% in 2019 and (19.1)% in 2018.1
1
1
43
AT&T Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
SUPPLEMENTAL TOTAL ADVERTISING REVENUE INFORMATION
As a supplemental presentation, we are providing a view of total advertising revenues generated by AT&T. See revenue categories tables
in Note 5 for a reconciliation.
Total Advertising Revenues
Percent Change
2020 2019 20182020 vs.
20192019 vs.
2018
Operating Revenues
Turner $ 3,941 $ 4,566 $ 2,330 (13.7)% 96.0 %
Video 1,718 1,672 1,595 2.8 4.8 
Xandr 2,089 2,022 1,740 3.3 16.2 
Other 386 382 352 1.0 8.5 
Eliminations (1,718) (1,672) (1,595) (2.8) (4.8)
Total Advertising Revenues $ 6,416 $ 6,970 $ 4,422 (7.9)% 57.6 %
SUPPLEMENTAL COMMUNICATIONS OPERATING INFORMATION
As a supplemental presentation to our Communications segment operating results, we are providing a view of our AT&T Business
Solutions results which includes both wireless and wireline operations. This combined view presents a complete profile of the entire
business customer relationship and underscores the importance of mobile solutions for our business customers. Results have been recast
to conform to the current period’s classification of consumer and business wireless subscribers. See “Discussion and Reconciliation of
Non-GAAP Measure” for a reconciliation of these supplemental measures to the most directly comparable financial measures calculated
and presented in accordance with GAAP.
Business Solutions Results
Percent Change
2020 2019 20182020 vs.
20192019 vs.
2018
Operating revenues
Wireless service $ 7,732 $ 7,444 $ 6,893 3.9  % 8.0 %
Strategic and managed services 15,788 15,430 14,649 2.3 5.3 
Legacy voice and data services 8,183 9,180 10,674 (10.9) (14.0)
Other service and equipment 1,387 1,557 1,406 (10.9) 10.7 
Wireless equipment 2,882 2,754 2,508 4.6 9.8 
Total Operating Revenues 35,972 36,365 36,130 (1.1) 0.7 
Operating expenses
Operations and support 22,713 22,714 22,586 — 0.6 
Depreciation and amortization 6,509 6,148 5,894 5.9 4.3 
Total Operating Expenses 29,222 28,862 28,480 1.2 1.3 
Operating Income 6,750 7,503 7,650 (10.0) (1.9)
Equity in Net Income (Loss) of Affiliates — — — — — 
Operating Contribution $ 6,750 $ 7,503 $ 7,650 (10.0)% (1.9)%
44
AT&T Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
OPERATING ENVIRONMENT AND TRENDS OF THE BUSINESS
2021 Revenue Trends We expect revenue growth in our wireless and broadband businesses as customers demand premium content,
instant connectivity and higher speeds made possible by our fiber network expansion and wireless network enhancements through 5G
deployment.
In our Communications segment, we expect that our network quality and First Responder Network Authority (FirstNet) deployment will
continue to contribute to wireless subscriber and service revenue growth, that 5G handsets will continue to drive wireless equipment
revenue growth, and that applications like video streaming will also continue to drive greater demand for broadband services. The
reluctance of consumers to travel at levels prior to the pandemic is expected to continue to contribute to uncertainty in international
roaming wireless service revenues.
In our WarnerMedia segment, we expect our video streaming platform, HBO Max, and premium content will continue to drive revenue
growth. The pandemic-related partial closure of movie theaters is expected to continue to pressure revenues and higher costs are
anticipated based on our decision to distribute our 2021 films on HBO Max in the U.S. simultaneous with theaters for 31 days.
Across AT&T, we expect to provide consumers with a broad variety of video entertainment services, from mobile-centric and OTT
streaming packages, to traditional full-size linear video. Revenue from business customers is expected to continue to grow for mobile and
IP-based services but decline for legacy wireline services. Overall, we believe growth in wireless, broadband and WarnerMedia’s
premium content should offset pressure from our linear video and legacy voice and data services.
2021 Expense Trends We expect the spending required to support growth initiatives, primarily our continued deployment of fiber, 5G,
and FirstNet build, as well as continued investment into the HBO Max platform, to pressure expense trends in 2021. To the extent 5G
handset introductions continue in 2021, and as anticipated, the expenses associated with those device sales are expected to contribute to
higher costs. During 2021, we will also continue to transition our hardware-based network technology to more efficient and less
expensive software-based technology. These investments will help prepare us to meet increased customer demand for enhanced wireless
and broadband services, including video streaming, augmented reality and “smart” technologies. The software benefits of our 5G
wireless technology and new video delivery platforms should result in a more efficient use of capital and lower network-related expenses
in the coming years.
We continue to transform our operations to be more efficient and effective, reinvesting savings into growth areas of the business. We are
restructuring businesses, sunsetting legacy networks, improving customer service and ordering functions through digital transformation,
sizing our support costs and staffing with current activity levels, and reassessing overall benefit costs. We expect continued savings from
these initiatives and through our WarnerMedia merger synergy program. Cost savings and non-strategic asset sales aligns with our focus
on debt reduction.
Market Conditions The U.S. stock market experienced significant volatility in 2020 due to several factors, including the global
pandemic, and thus general business investment remained modest, which had impact on our business services. The global pandemic has
caused, and could again cause, delays in the development, manufacturing (including the sourcing of key components) and shipment of
products. As the labor market has not returned to pre-pandemic levels of unemployment, our residential customers continue to be price
sensitive in selecting offerings, especially in the video area, and continue to focus on products that give them efficient access to video
and broadcast services. Most of our products and services are not directly affected by the imposition of tariffs on Chinese goods.
However, we expect ongoing pressure on pricing during 2021 as we respond to the competitive marketplace, especially in wireless and
video services.
Included on our consolidated balance sheets are assets held by benefit plans for the payment of future benefits. Our pension plans are
subject to funding requirements of the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, as amended (ERISA). We expect only
minimal ERISA contribution requirements to our pension plans for 2021. Investment returns on these assets depend largely on trends in
the economy, and a weakness in the equity, fixed income and real asset markets could require us to make future contributions to the
pension plans. In addition, our policy of recognizing actuarial gains and losses related to our pension and other postretirement plans in
the period in which they arise subjects us to earnings volatility caused by changes in market conditions; however, these actuarial gains
and losses do not impact segment performance as they are required to be recorded in “Other income (expense) – net.” Changes in our
discount rate, which are tied to changes in the bond market, and changes in the performance of equity markets, may have significant
impacts on the valuation of our pension and other postretirement obligations at the end of 2021 (see “Critical Accounting Policies and
Estimates”).
45
AT&T Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
OPERATING ENVIRONMENT OVERVIEW
AT&T subsidiaries operating within the United States are subject to federal and state regulatory authorities. AT&T subsidiaries operating
outside the United States are subject to the jurisdiction of national and supranational regulatory authorities in the markets where service
is provided.
In the Telecommunications Act of 1996 (Telecom Act), Congress established a national policy framework intended to bring the benefits
of competition and investment in advanced telecommunications facilities and services to all Americans by opening all
telecommunications markets to competition and reducing or eliminating regulatory burdens that harm consumer welfare. Nonetheless,
over the ensuing two decades, the Federal Communications Commission (FCC) and some state regulatory commissions have maintained
or expanded certain regulatory requirements that were imposed decades ago on our traditional wireline subsidiaries when they operated
as legal monopolies. More recently, the FCC has pursued a more deregulatory agenda, eliminating a variety of antiquated and
unnecessary regulations and streamlining its processes in a number of areas. We continue to support regulatory and legislative measures
and efforts, at both the state and federal levels, to reduce inappropriate regulatory burdens that inhibit our ability to compete effectively
and offer needed services to our customers, including initiatives to transition services from traditional networks to all IP-based networks.
At the same time, we also seek to ensure that legacy regulations are not further extended to broadband or wireless services, which are
subject to vigorous competition.
Communications Segment
Internet The FCC currently classifies fixed and mobile consumer broadband services as information services, subject to light-touch
regulation. The D.C. Circuit upheld the FCC’s current classification, although it remanded three discrete issues to the FCC for further
consideration. These issues related to the effect of the FCC’s decision to classify broadband services as information services on public
safety, the regulation of pole attachments, and universal service support for low-income consumers through the Lifeline program.
Because no party sought Supreme Court review of the D.C. Circuit’s decision to uphold the FCC’s classification of broadband as an
information service, that decision is final.
In October 2020, the FCC adopted an order addressing the three issues remanded by the D.C. Circuit for further consideration. After
considering those issues, the FCC concluded they provided no grounds to depart from its determination that fixed and mobile consumer
broadband services should be classified as information services. An appeal of the FCC’s remand order is pending.
Some states have adopted legislation or issued executive orders that would reimpose net neutrality rules repealed by the FCC. Suits have
been filed concerning such laws in two states.
Privacy-related legislation continues to be adopted or considered in a number of jurisdictions. Legislative, regulatory and litigation
actions could result in increased costs of compliance, further regulation or claims against broadband internet access service providers and
others, and increased uncertainty in the value and availability of data.
Wireless The industry-wide deployment of 5G technology, which is needed to satisfy extensive demand for video and internet access,
will involve significant deployment of “small cell” equipment and therefore increase the need for local permitting processes that allow
for the placement of small cell equipment on reasonable timelines and terms. Between 2018 and 2019, the FCC streamlined multiple
federal wireless structure review processes with the potential to delay and impede deployment of infrastructure used to provide
telecommunications and broadband services, including small cell equipment. Recognizing that state and local regulations have the same
potential, in November 2020 the FCC adopted an order tightening the limits on state and local authority to deny requests to use existing
structures for wireless facilities. These orders were appealed to the 9 Circuit Court of Appeals, where the appeals remain pending.
In December 2018, we introduced the nation’s first commercial mobile 5G service, and in July 2020, we announced nationwide 5G
coverage. We anticipate the introduction of 5G handsets and devices will contribute to a renewed interest in equipment upgrades.
As the U.S. wireless industry has matured, we believe future wireless growth will depend on our ability to offer innovative services,
plans and devices. We will need a network with sufficient spectrum and capacity and sufficiently broad coverage to support the growth of
these services. We continue to invest significant capital in expanding our network capacity, as well as to secure and utilize spectrum that
meets our long-term needs.th
46
AT&T Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
Video We provide domestic satellite video service through our subsidiary DIRECTV, whose satellites are licensed by the FCC. The
Communications Act of 1934 and other related acts give the FCC broad authority to regulate the U.S. operations of DIRECTV, and some
of WarnerMedia’s businesses are also subject to obligations under the Communications Act and related FCC regulations.
WarnerMedia Segment
We create, own and distribute intellectual property, including copyrights, trademarks and licenses of intellectual property. To protect our
intellectual property, we rely on a combination of laws and license agreements. Outside of the U.S., laws and regulations relating to
intellectual property protection and the effective enforcement of these laws and regulations vary greatly from country to country. The
European Union Commission is pursuing legislative and regulatory initiatives which could impact WarnerMedia’s activities in the EU.
Piracy, particularly of digital content, continues to threaten WarnerMedia’s revenues from products and services, and we work to limit
that threat through a combination of approaches, including technological and legislative solutions. Outside the U.S., various laws and
regulations, as well as trade agreements with the U.S., also apply to the distribution or licensing of feature films for exhibition in movie
theaters and on broadcast and cable networks. For example, in certain countries, including China, laws and regulations limit the number
of foreign films exhibited in such countries in a calendar year.
EXPECTED GROWTH AREAS
Over the next few years, we expect our growth to come from wireless, software-based video offerings like HBO Max, and IP-based fiber
broadband services. We provide integrated services to diverse groups of customers in the U.S. on an integrated telecommunications
network utilizing different technological platforms. In 2021, our key initiatives include:
•Continuing expansion of 5G service on our premier wireless network.
•Generating mobile subscriber growth from FirstNet and our premier network quality.
•Increasing subscriber base for HBO Max, our platform for premium content and video offered directly to consumers, as well as
through other distributors.
•Improving fiber penetration and growing broadband revenues.
•Continuing to develop a competitive advantage through our corporate cost structure.
•Improving profitability in our Mexico business unit.
Wireless We expect to continue to deliver revenue growth in the coming years. We are in a period of rapid growth in wireless video
usage and believe that there are substantial opportunities available for next-generation converged services that combine technologies and
services.
As of December 31, 2020, we served 202 million wireless subscribers in North America, with more than 182 million in the United
States. Our LTE technology covers over 440 million people in North America, and in the United States, we cover all major metropolitan
areas and over 330 million people. We also provide 4G coverage using another technology (HSPA+), and when combined with our
upgraded backhaul network, we provide enhanced network capabilities and superior mobile broadband speeds for data and video
services. In December 2018, we introduced the nation’s first commercial mobile 5G service and expanded that deployment nationwide in
July 2020.
Our networks covering both the U.S. and Mexico have enabled our customers to use wireless services without roaming on other
companies’ networks. We believe this seamless access will prove attractive to customers and provide a significant growth opportunity.
As of the end of 2020, we provided LTE coverage to over 110 million people in Mexico.
Integration of Data/Broadband and Entertainment Services As the communications industry has evolved into internet-based
technologies capable of blending wireline and wireless services, we plan to focus on expanding our wireless network capabilities and
provide high-speed internet and video offerings that allow customers to integrate their home or business fixed services with their mobile
service. During 2021, we will continue to develop and provide unique integrated video, mobile and broadband solutions. The launch of
the HBO Max platform has facilitated our customers’ desire to view video anywhere on demand and has encouraged customer retention.
47
AT&T Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
REGULATORY DEVELOPMENTS
Set forth below is a summary of the most significant regulatory proceedings that directly affected our operations during 2020. Industry-
wide regulatory developments are discussed above in Operating Environment Overview. While these issues may apply only to certain
subsidiaries, the words “we,” “AT&T” and “our” are used to simplify the discussion. The following discussions are intended as a
condensed summary of the issues rather than as a comprehensive legal analysis and description of all of these specific issues.
International Regulation Our subsidiaries operating outside the United States are subject to the jurisdiction of regulatory authorities in
the territories in which the subsidiaries operate. Our licensing, compliance and advocacy initiatives in foreign countries primarily enable
the provision of enterprise (i.e., large business), wireless and satellite television services. AT&T is engaged in multiple efforts with
foreign regulators to open markets to competition, foster conditions favorable to investment and increase our scope of services and
products.
The General Data Protection Regulation went into effect in Europe in May of 2018. AT&T processes and handles personal data of its
customers and subscribers, employees of its enterprise customers and its employees. This regulation created a range of new compliance
obligations and significantly increased financial penalties for noncompliance.
Federal Regulation We have organized our following discussion by service impacted.
Internet In February 2015, the FCC released an order classifying both fixed and mobile consumer broadband internet access services as
telecommunications services, subject to Title II of the Communications Act. The Order, which represented a departure from longstanding
bipartisan precedent, significantly expanded the FCC’s authority to regulate broadband internet access services, as well as internet
interconnection arrangements. In December 2017, the FCC reversed its 2015 decision by reclassifying fixed and mobile consumer
broadband services as information services and repealing most of the rules that were adopted in 2015. In lieu of broad conduct
prohibitions, the order requires internet service providers to disclose information about their network practices and terms of service,
including whether they block or throttle internet traffic or offer paid prioritization. On October 1, 2019, the D.C. Circuit issued a
unanimous opinion upholding the FCC’s reclassification of broadband as an information service, and its reliance on transparency
requirements and competitive marketplace dynamics to safeguard net neutrality. While the court vacated the FCC’s express preemption
of any state regulation of net neutrality, it stressed that its ruling did not prevent the FCC or ISPs from relying on conflict preemption to
invalidate particular state laws that are inconsistent with the FCC’s regulatory objectives and framework. The court also remanded the
matter to the FCC for further consideration of the impact of reclassifying broadband services as information services on public safety, the
Lifeline program, and pole attachment regulation. In October 2020, the FCC adopted an order concluding that those issues did not justify
reversing its decision to reclassify broadband services as information services. An appeal of the FCC’s remand decision is pending.
Following the FCC’s 2017 decision to reclassify broadband as information services, a number of states adopted legislation to reimpose
the very rules the FCC repealed. In some cases, state legislation imposes requirements that go beyond the FCC’s February 2015 order.
Additionally, some state governors have issued executive orders that effectively reimpose the repealed requirements. Suits have been
filed concerning laws in California and Vermont. Both lawsuits were stayed pursuant to agreements by those states not to enforce their
laws pending final resolution of all appeals of the FCC’s December 2017 order. Because that order is now final, the California suit has
returned to active status. Nonetheless, enforcement of both the California and Vermont laws remains stayed pending a ruling by a U.S.
District Court in California on motions for a preliminary injunction against enforcement of the California law. Argument on those
motions is now scheduled for February 2021. We expect that going forward additional states may seek to impose net neutrality
requirements. We will continue to support congressional action to codify a set of standard consumer rules for the internet.
Wireless and Broadband In June and November 2020, the FCC issued a Declaratory Ruling clarifying the limits on state and local
authority to deny applications to modify existing structures to accommodate wireless facilities. Appeals of the November 2020 order
remain pending in the 9 Circuit Court of Appeals. If sustained on appeal, these FCC decisions will remove state and local regulatory
barriers and reduce the costs of the infrastructure needed for 5G and FirstNet deployments, which will enhance our ability to place small
cell facilities on utility poles, expand existing facilities to accommodate public safety services, and replace legacy facilities and services
with advanced broadband infrastructure and services.th
48
AT&T Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
In 2020, the FCC took several actions to make spectrum available for 5G services. First, the FCC completed the auction of the 39 GHz
band in large, contiguous blocks of spectrum that will support 5G. AT&T obtained spectrum in this auction, which also included
spectrum in the 37 GHz and 47 GHz bands (see “Other Business Matters”). The FCC also made 150 MHz of mid-band CBRS spectrum
available, to be shared with Federal incumbents, who enjoy priority. Furthermore, the FCC began the auction of 280 MHz of mid-band
spectrum presently used for satellite service (the “C Band” auction). This auction is expected to conclude by June of 2021. Other mid-
band spectrum auctions are planned for later in 2021.
Following enactment in December 2019 of the Pallone-Thune Telephone Robocall Abuse Criminal Enforcement and Deterrence Act
(TRACED Act) by Congress, the FCC adopted new rules requiring voice service providers to implement caller ID authentication
protocols (known as STIR/SHAKEN) and adopt robocall mitigation measures. These measures apply to portions of their networks where
STIR/SHAKEN is not enabled, in addition to other anti-robocall measures. The new rules contemplate ongoing FCC oversight and
review of efforts related to STIR/SHAKEN implementation. Among other goals, the FCC has stated its intention to promote the IP
transition through its rules.
In September 2019, the FCC released reformed aspects of its intercarrier compensation regime related to tandem switching and transport
charges, with the goal of reducing the prevalence of telephone access arbitrage schemes. In October 2020, the FCC further reformed
aspects of its intercarrier compensation regime by greatly reducing, and in some cases eliminating, the charges long distance carriers
must pay to originating carriers for toll-free calls. Appeals of both orders are pending at the D.C. Circuit Court of Appeals.
ACCOUNTING POLICIES AND STANDARDS
Critical Accounting Policies and Estimates Because of the size of the financial statement line items they relate to or the extent of
judgment required by our management, some of our accounting policies and estimates have a more significant impact on our
consolidated financial statements than others. The following policies are presented in the order in which the topics appear in our
consolidated statements of income.
Pension and Postretirement Benefits Our actuarial estimates of retiree benefit expense and the associated significant weighted-average
assumptions are discussed in Note 15. Our assumed weighted-average discount rates for pension and postretirement benefits of 2.70%
and 2.40%, respectively, at December 31, 2020, reflect the hypothetical rate at which the projected benefit obligations could be
effectively settled or paid out to participants. We determined our discount rate based on a range of factors, including a yield curve
composed of the rates of return on several hundred high-quality, fixed income corporate bonds available at the measurement date and
corresponding to the related expected durations of future cash outflows for the obligations. These bonds were all rated at least Aa3 or
AA- by one of the nationally recognized statistical rating organizations, denominated in U.S. dollars, and neither callable, convertible nor
index linked. For the year ended December 31, 2020, when compared to the year ended December 31, 2019, we decreased our pension
discount rate by 0.70%, resulting in an increase in our pension plan benefit obligation of $5,594 and decreased our postretirement
discount rate by 0.80%, resulting in an increase in our postretirement benefit obligation of $1,311.
Our expected long-term rate of return on pension plan assets is 6.75% for 2021 and 7.00% for 2020. Our expected long-term rate of
return on postretirement plan assets is 4.50% for 2021 and 4.75% for 2020. Our expected return on plan assets is calculated using the
actual fair value of plan assets. If all other factors were to remain unchanged, we expect that a 0.50% decrease in the expected long-term
rate of return would cause 2021 combined pension and postretirement cost to increase $277, which under our accounting policy would be
adjusted to actual returns in the current year as part of our fourth-quarter remeasurement of our retiree benefit plans.
We recognize gains and losses on pension and postretirement plan assets and obligations immediately in “Other income (expense) – net”
in our consolidated statements of income. These gains and losses are generally measured annually as of December 31, and accordingly,
will normally be recorded during the fourth quarter, unless an earlier remeasurement is required. Should actual experience differ from
actuarial assumptions, the projected pension benefit obligation and net pension cost and accumulated postretirement benefit obligation
and postretirement benefit cost would be affected in future years. See Note 15 for additional discussions regarding our assumptions.
Depreciation Our depreciation of assets, including use of composite group depreciation for certain subsidiaries and estimates of useful
lives, is described in Notes 1 and 7.
49
AT&T Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
If all other factors were to remain unchanged, we expect that a one-year increase in the useful lives of our plant in service would have
resulted in a decrease of approximately $3,128 in our 2020 depreciation expense and that a one-year decrease would have resulted in an
increase of approximately $4,353 in our 2020 depreciation expense. See Notes 7 and 8 for depreciation and amortization expense
applicable to property, plant and equipment, including our finance lease right-of-use assets.
Asset Valuations and Impairments
Goodwill and other indefinite-lived intangible assets are not amortized but tested at least annually on October 1 for impairment. For
impairment testing, we estimate fair values using models that predominantly rely on the expected cash flows to be derived from the
reporting unit or use of the asset. Long-lived assets are reviewed for impairment whenever events or circumstances indicated that the
book value may not be recoverable over the remaining life. Inputs underlying the expected cash flows include, but are not limited to,
subscriber counts, revenues from subscriptions, advertising and content, revenue per user, capital investment and acquisition costs per
subscriber, production and content costs, and ongoing operating costs. We based our assumptions on a combination of our historical
results, trends, business plans and marketplace participant data.
Annual Goodwill Testing
Goodwill is tested on a reporting unit basis by comparing the estimated fair value of each reporting unit to its book value. If the fair value
exceeds the book value, then no impairment is measured. We estimate fair values using an income approach (also known as a discounted
cash flow model) and a market multiple approach. The income approach utilizes our future cash flow projections with a perpetuity value
discounted at an appropriate weighted average cost of capital. The market multiple approach uses the multiples of publicly traded
companies whose services are comparable to those offered by the reporting units. As of October 1, 2020, the calculated fair values of the
reporting units exceeded their book values in all circumstances; however, the Turner, HBO and Entertainment Group (prior to our
December reporting unit change discussed below) fair values exceed their book values by less than 10% with COVID-19 impacts,
industry trends and our content distribution strategy affecting fair value. For the reporting units with fair value in excess of 10% of book
value, if either the projected rate of long-term growth of cash flows or revenues declined by 0.5%, or if the weighted average cost of
capital increased by 0.5%, the fair values would still be higher than the book value of the goodwill. In the event of a 10% drop in the fair
values of the reporting units, the fair values still would have exceeded the book values of the reporting units. For the Turner and HBO
reporting units as of October 1, 2020, if the projected rate of longer-term growth of cash flows or revenues declined by 1% and more than
2%, respectively, or if the weighted average cost of capital increased by 0.5%, it would result in impairment of the goodwill. Carrying
values of the reporting units in the WarnerMedia segment (Turner, HBO and Warner Bros.) decrease as intangibles identified in the
acquisition are amortized.
Domestic Video Business
In December 2020, we changed our management strategy and reevaluated our domestic video business, allowing us to maximize value in
our domestic video business and further accelerate our ability to innovate and execute in our fast-growing broadband and fiber business.
The strategy change required us to reassess the grouping and recoverability of the video business long-lived assets. In conjunction with
the strategy change, we separated the former Entertainment Group into two business units, Video and Broadband, which includes legacy
telephony operations. These changes required us to identify a separate Video reporting unit, which required evaluating assigned goodwill
for impairment, while first assessing any impairment of goodwill at the historical Entertainment Group level.
The fair value of long-lived assets was determined primarily using the present value approach of probability-weighted expected cash
flow. We determined that these assets were no longer recoverable and recognized an impairment to their estimated fair value. A pre-tax
impairment of $7,255 ($4,373 orbital slots, $1,201 customer lists and $1,681 in property, plant and equipment) was assigned to the long-
lived assets of the video business (see Notes 7 and 9). Upon updating the carrying value of the video business, we were then required to
reperform our goodwill impairment testing of the historical Entertainment Group reporting unit, as of December 31, 2020, and before
separation into the two reporting units, where we again concluded that no impairment was required, consistent with the testing as of
October 1, 2020. GAAP requires ongoing fair value assessments for recoverability upon defined triggering events.
We further concluded that our video business should be identified as a separate reporting unit within the Communications segment. The
change in reporting unit required the historical Entertainment Group goodwill to be assigned to the separate Video and Broadband
reporting units, for which we used the relative fair value allocation methodology. The affected reporting units were then tested for
goodwill impairment. We recorded an impairment of the entire $8,253 of goodwill allocated to the Video reporting unit. No goodwill
impairment was required in the Broadband reporting unit. (See Note 9).
50
AT&T Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
In total, we recorded an impairment charge of $15,508 ($7,255 for long-lived assets and $8,253 of assigned goodwill) in December 2020
results.
U.S. Wireless Licenses
The fair value of U.S. wireless licenses is assessed using a discounted cash flow model (the Greenfield Approach) and a corroborative
market approach based on auction prices, depending upon auction activity. The Greenfield Approach assumes a company initially owns
only the wireless licenses and makes investments required to build an operation comparable to current use. These licenses are tested
annually for impairment on an aggregated basis, consistent with their use on a national scope for the United States. For impairment
testing, we assume subscriber and revenue growth will trend up to projected levels, with a long-term growth rate reflecting expected
long-term inflation trends. We assume churn rates will initially exceed our current experience but decline to rates that are in line with
industry-leading churn. We used a discount rate of 9.25%, based on the optimal long-term capital structure of a market participant and its
associated cost of debt and equity for the licenses, to calculate the present value of the projected cash flows. If either the projected rate of
long-term growth of cash flows or revenues declined by 0.5%, or if the discount rate increased by 0.5%, the fair values of these wireless
licenses would still be higher than the book value of the licenses. The fair value of these wireless licenses exceeded their book values by
more than 10%.
Other Finite-Lived Intangibles
Customer relationships, licenses in Mexico, certain trade names in our Latin America business and other finite-lived intangible assets are
reviewed for impairment whenever events or circumstances indicate that the book value may not be recoverable over their remaining life.
For this analysis, we compare the expected undiscounted future cash flows attributable to the asset to its book value. When the asset’s
book value exceeds undiscounted future cash flows, an impairment is recorded to reduce the book value of the asset to its estimated fair
value (see Notes 7 and 9).
Vrio Goodwill
In the second quarter of 2020, driven by significant and adverse economic and political environments in Latin America, including the
impact of the COVID-19 pandemic, we experienced accelerated subscriber losses and revenue decline in the region, as well as closure of
our operations in Venezuela. When combining these business trends and higher weighted-average cost of capital resulting from the
increase in country-risk premiums in the region, we concluded that it was more likely than not that the fair value of the Vrio reporting
unit, estimated using discounted cash flow and market multiple approaches, is less than its carrying amount. We recorded a $2,212
goodwill impairment, the entire amount of goodwill allocated to the Vrio reporting unit, with $105 attributable to noncontrolling interest
(see Note 9).
Orbital Slots
During the first quarter of 2020, in conjunction with the nationwide launch of AT&T TV and our customers’ continued shift from linear
to streaming video services, we reassessed the estimated economic lives and renewal assumptions for our orbital slot licenses. As a
result, we changed the estimated lives of these licenses from indefinite to finite-lived, effective January 1, 2020, and amortized $1,504 of
the orbital slots in 2020. (See Note 1)
Income Taxes Our estimates of income taxes and the significant items giving rise to the deferred assets and liabilities are shown in Note
14 and reflect our assessment of actual future taxes to be paid on items reflected in the financial statements, giving consideration to both
timing and probability of these estimates. Actual income taxes could vary from these estimates due to future changes in income tax law
or the final review of our tax returns by federal, state or foreign tax authorities.
We use our judgment to determine whether it is more likely than not that we will sustain positions that we have taken on tax returns and,
if so, the amount of benefit to initially recognize within our financial statements. We regularly review our uncertain tax positions and
adjust our unrecognized tax benefits (UTBs) in light of changes in facts and circumstances, such as changes in tax law, interactions with
taxing authorities and developments in case law. These adjustments to our UTBs may affect our income tax expense. Settlement of
uncertain tax positions may require use of our cash.
New Accounting Standards
Beginning with 2020 interim and annual reporting periods, we adopted the FASB’s new accounting guidance related to the measurement
of credit losses on trade receivables, loans, contract assets and certain other assets not subject fair value measurement existing at January
1, 2020. We adopted the standard using a modified retrospective approach as of the beginning of the period of adoption, which did not
require us to adjust the balance for prior periods, therefore affecting the comparability of our financial statements. Upon adoption, we
recorded an increase to our allowances for credit losses, primarily for trade and loan receivables. See Note 1 for discussion of the impact
of the standard.
51
AT&T Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
See Note 1 for discussion of the expected impact of new standards.
OTHER BUSINESS MATTERS
Video Business On February 25, 2021, we signed an agreement to form a new company named DIRECTV (New DTV) with TPG
Capital, which will be jointly governed by a board with representation from both AT&T and TPG. Under the agreement, we will
contribute our Video business unit to New DTV for $4,250 of junior preferred units, an additional distribution preference of $4,200 and a
70% economic interest in common units. We expect to receive $7,600 in cash from New DTV at closing. TPG will contribute
approximately $1,800 in cash to New DTV for $1,800 of senior preferred units and a 30% economic interest in common units. The
remaining $5,800 will be funded by debt taken on by New DTV. As part of this transaction, we agreed to pay net losses under the NFL
SUNDAY TICKET contract up to a cap of $2,500 over the remaining period of the contract.
The transaction is expected to close in the second half of 2021, pending customary closing conditions. The total of $7,600 of proceeds
from the transaction are expected to reduce our total and net debt positions.
In the first quarter of 2021, we expect to apply held-for-sale accounting treatment to the assets and liabilities of the U.S. video business,
and accordingly will include the assets in “Other current assets,” and the related liabilities in “Accounts payable and accrued liabilities,”
on our consolidated balance sheet at March 31, 2021. The carrying amounts at December 31, 2020 of these assets and liabilities were
approximately $16,150 and $4,900, respectively.
Spectrum Auction In March 2020, we were the winning bidder of high-frequency 37/39 GHz licenses in FCC Auction 103 covering an
average of 786 MHz nationwide for approximately $2,400. Prior to the auction, we exchanged the 39 GHz licenses with a book value of
approximately $300 that were previously acquired through FiberTower Corporation for vouchers to be applied against the winning bids
and recorded a $900 gain in the first quarter of 2020. These vouchers yielded a value of approximately $1,200 which was applied toward
our $2,400 gross bids. We made our final payment of approximately $950 for the Auction 103 payment in April 2020. The FCC granted
the licenses in June 2020.
On February 24, 2021, the FCC announced that AT&T was the winning bidder for 1,621 C-Band licenses, comprised of a total of 80
MHz nationwide, including 40 MHz in Phase I. We must provide to the FCC an initial down payment of $4,681 on March 10, 2021, of
which $550 was paid as an upfront payment prior to the start of the auction, and to pay a remaining $18,725 on or before March 24,
2021. We estimate that AT&T will be responsible for $955 of Incentive Payments upon clearing of Phase I spectrum and $2,112 upon
clearing of Phase II spectrum. Additionally, we will be responsible for a portion of compensable relocation costs over the next several
years as the spectrum is being cleared. Satellite operators have provided the FCC with relocation cost estimates totaling $3,400. AT&T
intends to fund the purchase price using a combination of cash and short-term investments, funds from operations and either short-term
or long-term debt, depending upon market conditions.
Labor Contracts As of December 31, 2020, we employed approximately 231,000 persons. Approximately 37% of our employees are
represented by the Communications Workers of America (CWA), the International Brotherhood of Electrical Workers (IBEW) or other
unions. After expiration of the collective bargaining agreements, work stoppages or labor disruptions may occur in the absence of new
contracts or other agreements being reached. There are no significant contracts expiring in 2021. A contract covering approximately
14,000 Mobility employees in 36 states and the District of Columbia that was set to expire in February 2021 was extended until February
2022. A contract covering approximately 10,000 Mobility employees in nine Southeast states that was set to expire in February 2022 was
extended until February 2023.
Pension Diversification In 2013, we made a voluntary contribution of 320 million Series A Cumulative Perpetual Preferred Membership
Interests in AT&T Mobility II LLC (Mobility preferred interests), the primary holding company for our wireless business, to the trust
used to pay pension benefits under certain of our qualified pension plans (see Note 17). Since their contribution, the Mobility preferred
interests are plan assets under ERISA, and have been recognized as such in the plan’s separate financial statements. On September 28,
2020, the trust, through the independent investment manager/fiduciary, sold 106.7 million of the Mobility preferred interests to unrelated
third parties. The aggregate purchase price was $2,885, which includes accrued distributions through the date of sale (see Note 15).
Environmental We are subject from time to time to judicial and administrative proceedings brought by various governmental authorities
under federal, state or local environmental laws. We reference in our Forms 10-Q and 10-K certain environmental proceedings that could
result in monetary sanctions (exclusive of interest and costs) of three hundred thousand dollars or more. However, we do not believe that
any of those currently pending will have a material adverse effect on our results of operations.
52
AT&T Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
LIQUIDITY AND CAPITAL RESOURCES
We had $9,740 in cash and cash equivalents available at December 31, 2020. Cash and cash equivalents included cash of $2,842 and
money market funds and other cash equivalents of $6,898. Approximately $2,205 of our cash and cash equivalents were held by our
foreign entities in accounts predominantly outside of the U.S. and may be subject to restrictions on repatriation.
The Company's liquidity and capital resources were not materially impacted by COVID-19 and related economic conditions during 2020.
We will continue to monitor impacts of the COVID-19 pandemic on our liquidity and capital resources.
Cash and cash equivalents decreased $2,390 since December 31, 2019. In 2020, cash inflows were primarily provided by cash receipts
from operations, including cash from our sale and transfer of our receivables to third parties and the issuances of long-term debt,
cumulative preferred stock and cumulative preferred interests in a subsidiary. These inflows were offset by cash used to meet the needs
of the business, including, but not limited to, payment of operating expenses, debt repayments, funding capital expenditures and vendor
financing payments, dividends to stockholders, share repurchases and spectrum acquisitions.
Cash Provided by or Used in Operating Activities
During 2020, cash provided by operating activities was $43,130 compared to $48,668 in 2019, impacted by the timing of working capital
payments.
We actively manage the timing of our supplier payments for operating items to optimize the use of our cash. Among other things, we
seek to make payments on 90-day or greater terms, while providing the suppliers with access to bank facilities that permit earlier
payments at their cost. In addition, for payments to a key supplier, as part of our working capital initiatives, we have arrangements that
allow us to extend payment terms up to 90 days at an additional cost to us (referred to as supplier financing). The net impact of supplier
financing was to improve cash from operating activities $432 in 2020 and $909 in 2019. All supplier financing payments are due within
one year.
Cash Used in or Provided by Investing Activities
During 2020, cash used in investing activities totaled $13,548, and consisted primarily of $15,675 (including interest during
construction) for capital expenditures, final payment of approximately $950 for wireless spectrum licenses won in Auction 103 and $141
of net cash paid to acquire the remaining interest in HBO LAG. Investing activities also included cash receipts of $1,928 from the sale of
our operations in Puerto Rico, which were used to redeem the preferred interests secured by the sales proceeds (see Notes 6 and 17),
$1,100 from the sale of our investment in Central European Media Enterprises, Ltd. (see Note 6) and $400 from corporate owned life
insurance investments.
For capital improvements, we have negotiated favorable vendor payment terms of 120 days or more (referred to as vendor financing)
with some of our vendors, which are excluded from capital expenditures and reported as financing activities. Vendor financing payments
were $2,966 in 2020, compared to $3,050 in 2019. Capital expenditures in 2020 were $15,675, and when including $2,966 cash paid for
vendor financing and excluding $1,063 of FirstNet reimbursements, gross capital investment was $19,704 ($3,986 lower than the prior
year).
The vast majority of our capital expenditures are spent on our networks, including product development and related support systems. In
2020, we placed $4,664 of equipment in service under vendor financing arrangements (compared to $2,632 in 2019) and approximately
$1,230 of assets related to the FirstNet build (compared to $1,116 in 2019). Total reimbursements from the government for FirstNet were
$1,626 for 2020 and $1,374 for 2019, predominately for capital expenditures.
The amount of capital expenditures is influenced by demand for services and products, capacity needs and network enhancements. In
2021, we expect that our gross capital investment, which includes capital expenditures and cash paid for vendor financing and excludes
expected FirstNet reimbursement of approximately $1,000, will be in the $21,000 range (including capital expenditures in the $18,000
range).
Cash Used in or Provided by Financing Activities
For the year, cash used in financing activities totaled $32,007 and was comprised of issuances and repayments of debt, issuances of
preferred stock, issuances and redemptions of preferred interests in subsidiaries, payments of dividends and share repurchases.
53
AT&T Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
During 2020, debt issuances included proceeds of $9,440 in short-term borrowings (including approximately $3,950 of commercial
paper) and $31,988 of net proceeds from long-term debt. Borrowing activity included the following issuances:
Issued and redeemed in 2020:
•March draw of $750 on a private financing agreement (repaid in the second quarter).
•April draw of $5,500 on a term loan credit agreement with certain commercial banks and Bank of America, N.A., as lead agent
(repaid in the second quarter).
Issued and outstanding in 2020:
•February issuance of $2,995 of 4.000% global notes due 2049.
•March borrowings of $665 from loan programs with export agencies of foreign governments to support network equipment
purchases in those countries.
•May issuances totaling $12,500 in global notes, comprised of $2,500 of 2.300% global notes due 2027, $3,000 of 2.750% global
notes due 2031, $2,500 of 3.500% global notes due 2041, $3,000 of 3.650% global notes due 2051 and $1,500 of 3.850% global
notes due 2060.
•May issuances totaling €3,000 million in global notes (approximately $3,281 at issuance), comprised of €1,750 million of 1.600%
global notes due 2028, €750 million of 2.050% global notes due 2032 and €500 million of 2.600% global notes due 2038.
•June issuance of $1,050 of 3.750% global notes due 2050.
•August issuances totaling $11,000 in global notes, comprised of $2,250 of 1.650% global notes due 2028, $2,500 of 2.250% global
notes due 2032, $2,500 of 3.100% global notes due 2043, $2,250 of 3.300% global notes due 2052 and $1,500 of 3.500% global
notes due 2061.
During 2020, repayments of debt included $9,467 of short-term borrowings (including $3,967 of commercial paper) and $39,964 of
long-term debt. Repayments included:
Notes redeemed at maturity:
•$800 of AT&T floating-rate notes in the first quarter.
•$687 of AT&T floating-rate notes in the second quarter.
•€2,250 million of AT&T floating-rate notes in the third quarter (approximately $2,637 at maturity).
•€1,000 million of 1.875% AT&T global notes in the fourth quarter ($1,290 at maturity).
•CAD$1,000 million of 3.825% AT&T global notes in the fourth quarter (approximately $954 at maturity).
Notes redeemed or repurchased prior to maturity:
•$2,619 of 4.600% AT&T global notes with original maturity in 2045, in the first quarter.
•$2,750 of 2.450% AT&T global notes with original maturity in 2020, in the second quarter.
•$1,000 of annual put reset securities issued by BellSouth, in the second quarter.
•$683 of 4.600% AT&T global notes with original maturity in 2021, in the second quarter.
•$1,695 of 2.800% AT&T global notes with original maturity in 2021, in the second quarter.
•$853 of 4.450% AT&T global notes with original maturity in 2021, in the second quarter.
•$1,172 of 3.875% AT&T global notes with original maturity in 2021, in the second quarter.
•$1,430 of 5.500% AT&T global notes with original maturity in 2047, in the second quarter.
•$1,457 of 3.000% AT&T global notes with original maturity in 2022, in the third quarter.
•$1,250 of 3.200% AT&T global notes with original maturity in 2022, in the third quarter.
•$1,012 of 3.800% AT&T global notes with original maturity in 2022, in the third quarter.
•$422 of 4.000% AT&T global notes with original maturity in 2022, in the third quarter.
•$60 of 3.800% DIRECTV senior notes with original maturity in 2022, in the third quarter.
•$63 of 4.000% Warner Media, LLC notes with original maturity in 2022, in the third quarter.
•$11,384 of AT&T global notes and subsidiary notes that were tendered for cash in the third quarter. The notes had floating and fixed
interest rates. The fixed rates ranged from 3.400% to 7.850% and original maturities ranging from 2021 to 2025.
•$53 of 3.400% Warner Media, LLC notes with original maturity in 2022, in the third quarter.
•$177 of 3.400% AT&T global notes with original maturity in 2022, in the third quarter.
•$928 of 3.600% AT&T global notes with original maturity in 2023, in the third quarter.
54
AT&T Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
Credit facilities repaid and other redemptions:
•$750 of borrowings under a private financing agreement, in the first quarter.
•$750 of borrowings under a private financing agreement, in the second quarter.
•$5,500 under our April 2020 term loan credit agreement with certain commercial banks and Bank of America, in the second quarter.
•$1,300 under our term loan credit agreement with Bank of America, in the second quarter.
•$500 under our term loan credit agreement with Bank of Communications Co., in the second quarter.
•R$3,381 million of Sky Serviços de Banda Larga Ltda. floating-rate loan in the third quarter (approximately $1,000 when issued in
April 2018 and $638 at redemption due to strengthening of the U.S. dollar against Brazilian real).
Debt Exchanges:
•During the third quarter of 2020, we exchanged $17,677 of AT&T and subsidiary notes, with interest rates ranging from 4.350% to
8.750% and original maturities ranging from 2031 to 2058 for $1,459 of cash and $21,500 of three new series of AT&T global notes,
with interest rates ranging from 3.500% to 3.650% and maturities ranging from 2053 to 2059.
•During the fourth quarter of 2020, we exchanged $8,280 of AT&T and subsidiary notes, with interest rates ranging from 2.950% to
7.125% and original maturities ranging from 2026 to 2048 for $8 of cash and $9,678 of two new series of AT&T global notes, with
interest rates of 2.550% and 3.800% and maturities of 2033 and 2057, respectively.
Our weighted average interest rate of our entire long-term debt portfolio, including the impact of derivatives, was approximately 4.1% as
of December 31, 2020 and 4.4% as of December 31, 2019. We had $155,209 of total notes and debentures outstanding at December 31,
2020, which included Euro, British pound sterling, Canadian dollar, Mexican peso, Australian dollar, Swiss franc and Brazilian real
denominated debt that totaled approximately $43,399.
At December 31, 2020, we had $3,470 of debt maturing within one year, consisting entirely of long-term debt issuances. Debt maturing
within one year includes an accreting zero-coupon note that may be redeemed each May until maturity in 2022. If the remainder of the
zero-coupon note (issued for principal of $500 in 2007 and partially exchanged in the 2017 debt exchange offers) is held to maturity, the
redemption amount will be $592.
During 2020, we paid $2,966 of cash under our vendor financing program, compared to $3,050 in 2019. Total vendor financing payables
included in our December 31, 2020 consolidated balance sheet were approximately $3,761, with $3,563 due within one year (in
“Accounts payable and accrued liabilities”) and the remainder predominantly due within two to three years (in “Other noncurrent
liabilities”).
Financing activities in 2020 also included $1,979 from the September issuance of preferred interests in a subsidiary and $3,869 for the
February issuance of Series B and Series C preferred stock (see Note 17).
We repurchased approximately 142 million shares of common stock at a cost of $5,278, predominantly in the first quarter, and completed
the share repurchase authorization approved by the Board of Directors in 2013. In March 2020, we cancelled an accelerated share
repurchase agreement that was planned for the second quarter and other repurchases to maintain flexibility and focus on continued
investment in serving our customers, taking care of our employees and enhancing our network, including 5G. At December 31, 2020, we
had approximately 178 million shares remaining from our share repurchase authorizations approved by the Board of Directors in 2014.
We paid dividends on common shares and preferred shares of $14,956 in 2020, compared with $14,888 in 2019. Dividends were higher
in 2020, primarily due to dividend payments to preferred stockholders and the increase in our quarterly dividend on common stock
approved by our Board of Directors in December 2019, partially offset by fewer shares outstanding.
Dividends on common stock declared by our Board of Directors totaled $2.08 per share in 2020 and $2.05 per share in 2019. Our
dividend policy considers the expectations and requirements of stockholders, capital funding requirements of AT&T and long-term
growth opportunities.
Our 2021 financing activities will focus on managing our debt level and paying dividends, subject to approval by our Board of Directors.
We plan to fund our financing uses of cash through a combination of cash from operations, issuance of debt, and asset sales. The timing
and mix of any debt issuance and/or refinancing will be guided by credit market conditions and interest rate trends.
55
AT&T Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
Credit Facilities
The following summary of our various credit and loan agreements does not purport to be complete and is qualified in its entirety by
reference to each agreement filed as exhibits to our Annual Report on Form 10-K.
We use credit facilities as a tool in managing our liquidity status. In November 2020, we amended one of our $7,500 revolving credit
agreements by extending the termination date. In total, we have two $7,500 revolving credit agreements, totaling $15,000, with one
terminating on December 11, 2023 and the other terminating on November 17, 2025. No amounts were outstanding under either
agreement as of December 31, 2020.
In September 2019, we entered into and drew on a $1,300 term loan credit agreement containing (i) a 1.25 year $400 facility due in 2020,
(ii) a 2.25 year $400 facility due in 2021, and (iii) a 3.25 year $500 facility due in 2022, with Bank of America, N.A., as agent. These
facilities were repaid and terminated in the second quarter of 2020.
On April 6, 2020, we entered into and drew on a $5,500 Term Loan Credit Agreement (Term Loan) with 11 commercial banks and Bank
of America, N.A. as lead agent. We repaid and terminated the Term Loan in May 2020.
On January 29, 2021, we entered into a $14,700 Term Loan Credit Agreement (Term Loan), with Bank of America, N.A., as agent. The
Term Loan is available for a single draw at any time before May 29, 2021. The proceeds will be used for general corporate purposes,
which may include among other things, financing acquisitions of additional spectrum. The entire principal amount of the Term Loan will
be due and payable 364 days after the date on which the borrowing is made. At January 31, 2021, we had approximately $6,100 of
commercial paper outstanding.
We also utilize other external financing sources, which include various credit arrangements supported by government agencies to support
network equipment purchases, as well as a commercial paper program.
Each of our credit and loan agreements contains covenants that are customary for an issuer with an investment grade senior debt credit
rating as well as a net debt-to-EBITDA financial ratio covenant requiring us to maintain, as of the last day of each fiscal quarter, a ratio
of not more than 3.5-to-1. As of December 31, 2020, we were in compliance with the covenants for our credit facilities.
Collateral Arrangements
During 2019 and 2020, we amended collateral arrangements with counterparties to require cash collateral posting by AT&T only when
derivative market values exceed certain thresholds. Under these arrangements, which cover over 90% of our approximate $41,000
derivative portfolio, counterparties are still required to post collateral. During 2020, we received approximately $800 of cash collateral,
on a net basis. Cash postings under these arrangements vary with changes in credit ratings and netting agreements. (See Note 13)
Other
Our total capital consists of debt (long-term debt and debt maturing within one year) and stockholders’ equity. Our capital structure does
not include debt issued by our equity method investment. At December 31, 2020, our debt ratio was 46.7%, compared to 44.7% at
December 31, 2019 and 47.7% at December 31, 2018. Our net debt ratio was 43.8% at December 31, 2020, compared to 41.4% at
December 31, 2019 and 46.2% at December 31, 2018. The debt ratio is affected by the same factors that affect total capital, and reflects
our recent debt issuances and repayments and debt acquired in business combinations.
A significant amount of our cash outflows is related to tax items, acquisition of spectrum through FCC auctions and benefits paid for
current and former employees:
•Total taxes incurred, collected and remitted by AT&T during 2020 and 2019, were $21,967 and $24,170. These taxes include
income, franchise, property, sales, excise, payroll, gross receipts and various other taxes and fees.
•Total domestic spectrum acquired primarily through FCC auctions, including cash, exchanged spectrum and auction deposits was
approximately $2,800 in 2020, $1,300 in 2019 and $450 in 2018.
•Total health and welfare benefits provided to certain active and retired employees and their dependents totaled $3,656 in 2020, with
$1,029 paid from plan assets. Of those benefits, $3,293 related to medical and prescription drug benefits. In addition, in 2020 we
prefunded $745 for future benefit payments. During 2020, we paid $5,124 of pension benefits out of plan assets.
56
AT&T Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
During 2020, we have received $3,641 from the disposition of assets, and when combined with working capital monetization initiatives,
which include the sale of receivables, total cash received from monetization efforts, net of $1,613 of spectrum acquisitions, was
approximately $1,100. We plan to continue to explore similar opportunities.
CONTRACTUAL OBLIGATIONS, COMMITMENTS AND CONTINGENCIES
Our contractual obligations as of December 31, 2020 are in the following table:
Payments Due By Period
Contractual ObligationsTotalLess than
1 Year1-3
Years3-5
YearsMore than
5 Years
Long-term debt obligations $ 165,654 $ 3,418 $ 13,730 $ 14,238 $ 134,268 
Interest payments on long-term debt 123,582 6,627 12,851 11,817 92,287 
Purchase obligations 70,610 20,274 21,275 11,142 17,919 
Operating lease obligations 31,123 4,808 8,621 6,464 11,230 
FirstNet sustainability payments 17,520 120 390 390 16,620 
Unrecognized tax benefits 10,560 463 — — 10,097 
Other finance obligations 12,437 4,236 2,232 1,602 4,367 
Total Contractual Obligations $ 431,486 $ 39,946 $ 59,099 $ 45,653 $ 286,788 
Represents principal or payof f amounts of notes and debentures at maturity or , for putable debt, the next put opportunity (see Note 12). Foreign debt
includes the impact from hedges, when applicable.
We expect to fund the purchase obligations with cash provided by operations or through incremental borrowings. The minimum commitment for
certain obligations is based on termination penalties that could be paid to exit the contracts. If we elect to exit these contracts, termination fees for all
such contracts in the year of termination could be approximately $259 in 2021, $257 in the aggregate for 2022 and 2023 and $64 in the aggregate for
2024 and 2025 and $1,987 in the aggregate thereafter . Certain termination fees are excluded from the above table, as the fees would not be paid every
year and the timing of such payments, if any , is uncertain. (See Note 21)
Represents operating lease payments (see Note 8).
Represents contractual commitment to make sustainability payments over the 25-year contract. These sustainability payments represent our
commitment to fund FirstNet’ s operating expenses and future reinvestment in the network, which we own and operate. FirstNet has a statutory
requirement to reinvest funds that exceed the agency’ s operating expenses, which we anticipate to be $15,000. (See Note 20)
The noncurrent portion of the UTBs is included in the “More than 5 Y ears” column, as we cannot reasonably estimate the timing or amounts of
additional cash payments, if any , at this time (see Note 14).
Represents future minimum payments under the Crown Castle and other arrangements (see Note 19), payables subject to extended payment terms
(see Note 22) and finance lease payments (see Note 8).
Certain items were excluded from this table, as the year of payment is unknown and could not be reliably estimated since past trends
were not deemed to be an indicator of future payment, we believe the obligations are immaterial or because the settlement of the
obligation will not require the use of cash. These items include: deferred income tax liability of $60,472 (see Note 14); net
postemployment benefit obligations of $19,690; expected pension and postretirement payments (see Note 15); and other noncurrent
liabilities of $11,829.1
2
3
4
5
6
1
2
3
4
5
6
57
AT&T Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
DISCUSSION AND RECONCILIATION OF NON-GAAP MEASURE
We believe the following measure is relevant and useful information to investors as it is used by management as a method of comparing
performance with that of many of our competitors. This supplemental measure should be considered in addition to, but not as a substitute
of, our consolidated and segment financial information.
Business Solutions Reconciliation
We provide a supplemental discussion of our Business Solutions operations that is calculated by combining our Mobility and Business
Wireline business units, and then adjusting to remove non-business operations. The following table presents a reconciliation of our
supplemental Business Solutions results. Results have been recast to conform to the current period's classification.
Year Ended December 31, 2020
MobilityBusiness
Wireline AdjustmentsBusiness
Solutions
Operating revenues
Wireless service $ 55,542 $ — $ (47,810)$ 7,732 
Strategic and managed services — 15,788 — 15,788 
Legacy voice and data services — 8,183 — 8,183 
Other service and equipment — 1,387 — 1,387 
Wireless equipment 17,022 — (14,140) 2,882 
Total Operating Revenues 72,564 25,358 (61,950) 35,972 
Operating expenses
Operations and support 42,106 15,534 (34,927) 22,713 
EBITDA 30,458 9,824 (27,023) 13,259 
Depreciation and amortization 8,086 5,226 (6,803) 6,509 
Total Operating Expenses 50,192 20,760 (41,730) 29,222 
Operating Income $ 22,372 $ 4,598 $ (20,220)$ 6,750 
Non-business wireless reported in the Communications segment under the Mobility business unit.
Year Ended December 31, 2019
MobilityBusiness
Wireline AdjustmentsBusiness
Solutions
Operating revenues
Wireless service $ 55,331 $ — $ (47,887)$ 7,444 
Strategic and managed services — 15,430 — 15,430 
Legacy voice and data services — 9,180 — 9,180 
Other service and equipment — 1,557 — 1,557 
Wireless equipment 15,725 — (12,971) 2,754 
Total Operating Revenues 71,056 26,167 (60,858) 36,365 
Operating expenses
Operations and support 40,681 16,069 (34,036) 22,714 
EBITDA 30,375 10,098 (26,822) 13,651 
Depreciation and amortization 8,054 4,934 (6,840) 6,148 
Total Operating Expenses 48,735 21,003 (40,876) 28,862 
Operating Income $ 22,321 $ 5,164 $ (19,982)$ 7,503 
Non-business wireless reported in the Communications segment under the Mobility business unit.1
1
1
1
58
AT&T Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
Year Ended December 31, 2018
MobilityBusiness
Wireline AdjustmentsBusiness
Solutions
Operating revenues
Wireless service $ 54,295 $ — $ (47,402)$ 6,893 
Strategic and managed services — 14,649 — 14,649 
Legacy voice and data services — 10,674 — 10,674 
Other service and equipment — 1,406 — 1,406 
Wireless equipment 16,226 — (13,718) 2,508 
Total Operating Revenues 70,521 26,729 (61,120) 36,130 
Operating expenses
Operations and support 40,690 16,181 (34,285) 22,586 
EBITDA 29,831 10,548 (26,835) 13,544 
Depreciation and amortization 8,263 4,708 (7,077) 5,894 
Total Operating Expenses 48,953 20,889 (41,362) 28,480 
Operating Income $ 21,568 $ 5,840 $ (19,758)$ 7,650 
Non-business wireless reported in the Communications segment under the Mobility business unit.1
1
59
AT&T Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
ITEM 7A. QUANTITATIVE AND QUALITATIVE DISCLOSURES ABOUT MARKET RISK
We are exposed to market risks primarily from changes in interest rates and foreign currency exchange rates. These risks, along with
other business risks, impact our cost of capital. It is our policy to manage our debt structure and foreign exchange exposure in order to
manage capital costs, control financial risks and maintain financial flexibility over the long term. In managing market risks, we employ
derivatives according to documented policies and procedures, including interest rate swaps, interest rate locks, foreign currency exchange
contracts and combined interest rate foreign currency contracts (cross-currency swaps). We do not use derivatives for trading or
speculative purposes. We do not foresee significant changes in the strategies we use to manage market risk in the near future.
One of the most significant assumptions used in estimating our postretirement benefit obligations is the assumed weighted-average
discount rate, which is the hypothetical rate at which the projected benefit obligations could be effectively settled or paid out to
participants. We determined our discount rate based on a range of factors, including a yield curve composed of the rates of return on
several hundred high-quality, fixed income corporate bonds available at the measurement date and corresponding to the related expected
durations of future cash outflows for the obligations. In recent years, the discount rates have been increasingly volatile, and on average
have been lower than in historical periods. Lower discount rates used to measure our pension and postretirement plans result in higher
obligations. Future increases in these rates could result in lower obligations, improved funded status and actuarial gains.
Interest Rate Risk
The majority of our financial instruments are medium- and long-term fixed-rate notes and debentures. Changes in interest rates can lead
to significant fluctuations in the fair value of these instruments. The principal amounts by expected maturity, average interest rate and
fair value of our liabilities that are exposed to interest rate risk are described in Notes 12 and 13. In managing interest expense, we
control our mix of fixed and floating rate debt through term loans, floating rate notes, and interest rate swaps. We have established
interest rate risk limits that we closely monitor by measuring interest rate sensitivities in our debt and interest rate derivatives portfolios.
Most of our foreign-denominated long-term debt has been swapped from fixed-rate or floating-rate foreign currencies to fixed-rate U.S.
dollars at issuance through cross-currency swaps, removing interest rate risk and foreign currency exchange risk associated with the
underlying interest and principal payments. Likewise, periodically we enter into interest rate locks to partially hedge the risk of increases
in the benchmark interest rate during the period leading up to the probable issuance of fixed-rate debt. We expect gains or losses in our
cross-currency swaps and interest rate locks to offset the losses and gains in the financial instruments they hedge.
We had no interest rate swaps and no interest rate locks at December 31, 2020.
Foreign Exchange Risk
We principally use foreign exchange contracts to hedge certain film production costs denominated in foreign currencies. We are also
exposed to foreign currency exchange risk through our foreign affiliates and equity investments in foreign companies. We have
designated €1,450 million aggregate principal amount of debt as a hedge of the variability of certain Euro-denominated net investments
of our subsidiaries. The gain or loss on the debt that is designated as, and is effective as, an economic hedge of the net investment in a
foreign operation is recorded as a currency translation adjustment within accumulated other comprehensive income, net on the
consolidated balance sheet.
Through cross-currency swaps, most of our foreign-denominated debt has been swapped from fixed-rate or floating-rate foreign
currencies to fixed-rate U.S. dollars at issuance, removing interest rate and foreign currency exchange risk associated with the underlying
interest and principal payments. We expect gains or losses in our cross-currency swaps to offset the gains and losses in the financial
instruments they hedge. We had cross-currency swaps with a notional value of $40,745 and a fair value of $(93) outstanding at
December 31, 2020.
For the purpose of assessing specific risks, we use a sensitivity analysis to determine the effects that market risk exposures may have on
the fair value of our financial instruments and results of operations. We had foreign exchange forward contracts with a notional value of
$90 and a fair value of $(3) outstanding at December 31, 2020.
60
AT&T Inc.
Report of Management
The consolidated financial statements have been prepared in conformity with U.S. generally accepted accounting principles. The
integrity and objectivity of the data in these financial statements, including estimates and judgments relating to matters not concluded by
year end, are the responsibility of management, as is all other information included in the Annual Report, unless otherwise indicated.
The financial statements of AT&T Inc. (AT&T) have been audited by Ernst & Young LLP, Independent Registered Public Accounting
Firm. Management has made available to Ernst & Young LLP all of AT&T’s financial records and related data, as well as the minutes of
stockholders’ and directors’ meetings. Furthermore, management believes that all representations made to Ernst & Young LLP during its
audit were valid and appropriate.
Management maintains disclosure controls and procedures that are designed to ensure that information required to be disclosed by AT&T
is recorded, processed, summarized, accumulated and communicated to its management, including its principal executive and principal
financial officers, to allow timely decisions regarding required disclosure, and reported within the time periods specified by the
Securities and Exchange Commission’s rules and forms.
Management also seeks to ensure the objectivity and integrity of its financial data by the careful selection of its managers, by
organizational arrangements that provide an appropriate division of responsibility and by communication programs aimed at ensuring
that its policies, standards and managerial authorities are understood throughout the organization.
The Audit Committee of the Board of Directors meets periodically with management, the internal auditors and the independent auditors
to review the manner in which they are performing their respective responsibilities and to discuss auditing, internal accounting controls
and financial reporting matters. Both the internal auditors and the independent auditors periodically meet alone with the Audit
Committee and have access to the Audit Committee at any time.
Assessment of Internal Control
The management of AT&T is responsible for establishing and maintaining adequate internal control over financial reporting, as defined
in Rule 13a-15(f) or 15d-15(f) under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934. AT&T’s internal control system was designed to provide
reasonable assurance to the company’s management and Board of Directors regarding the preparation and fair presentation of published
financial statements.
AT&T management assessed the effectiveness of the company’s internal control over financial reporting as of December 31, 2020. In
making this assessment, it used the criteria set forth by the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway Commission
(COSO) in Internal Control – Integrated Framework (2013 framework). Based on its assessment, AT&T management believes that, as of
December 31, 2020, the company’s internal control over financial reporting is effective based on those criteria.
Ernst & Young LLP, the independent registered public accounting firm that audited the financial statements included in this Annual
Report, has issued an attestation report on the company’s internal control over financial reporting.
/s/John T. Stankey /s/John J. Stephens .
John T. Stankey John J. Stephens
Chief Executive Officer
 and PresidentSenior Executive Vice President 
 and Chief Financial Officer
61
AT&T Inc.
Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm
To the Stockholders and the Board of Directors of AT&T Inc.
Opinion on the Financial Statements
We have audited the accompanying consolidated balance sheets of AT&T Inc. (the Company) as of December 31, 2020 and 2019, the
related consolidated statements of income, comprehensive income, cash flows and changes in stockholders’ equity for each of the three
years in the period ended December 31, 2020, and the related notes and financial statement schedule listed in Item 15(a) (collectively
referred to as the “consolidated financial statements”). In our opinion, the consolidated financial statements present fairly, in all material
respects, the financial position of the Company at December 31, 2020 and 2019, and the results of its operations and its cash flows for
each of the three years in the period ended December 31, 2020, in conformity with U.S. generally accepted accounting principles.
We also have audited, in accordance with the standards of the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board (United States) (PCAOB),
the Company’s internal control over financial reporting as of December 31, 2020, based on criteria established in Internal Control—
Integrated Framework issued by the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway Commission (2013 framework) and our
report dated February 25, 2021 expressed an unqualified opinion thereon.
Basis for Opinion
These financial statements are the responsibility of the Company’s management. Our responsibility is to express an opinion on the
Company’s financial statements based on our audits. We are a public accounting firm registered with the PCAOB and are required to be
independent with respect to the Company in accordance with the U.S. federal securities laws and the applicable rules and regulations of
the Securities and Exchange Commission and the PCAOB.
We conducted our audits in accordance with the standards of the PCAOB. Those standards require that we plan and perform the audit to
obtain reasonable assurance about whether the financial statements are free of material misstatement, whether due to error or fraud. Our
audits included performing procedures to assess the risks of material misstatement of the financial statements, whether due to error or
fraud, and performing procedures that respond to those risks. Such procedures included examining, on a test basis, evidence regarding
the amounts and disclosures in the financial statements. Our audits also included evaluating the accounting principles used and
significant estimates made by management, as well as evaluating the overall presentation of the financial statements. We believe that our
audits provide a reasonable basis for our opinion.
Critical Audit Matters
The critical audit matters communicated below are matters arising from the current period audit of the financial statements that were
communicated or required to be communicated to the audit committee and that: (1) relate to accounts or disclosures that are material to
the financial statements and (2) involved our especially challenging, subjective or complex judgments. The communication of critical
audit matters does not alter in any way our opinion on the consolidatedfinancial statements, taken as a whole, and we are not, by
communicating the critical audit matters below, providing separate opinions on the critical audit matters or on the accounts or disclosures
to which they relate.
Discount rates used in determining pension and postretirement benefit obligations
Description of the
MatterAt December 31, 2020, the Company’s pension benefit obligation was $62,158 million and exceeded the fair value
of defined benefit pension plan assets of $54,606 million, resulting in an unfunded benefit obligation of $7,552
million. Additionally, at December 31, 2020, the Company’s postretirement benefit obligation was $13,928 million
and exceeded the fair value of postretirement plan assets of $3,843 million, resulting in an unfunded benefit
obligation of $10,085 million. As explained in Note 15 to the consolidated financial statements, the Company
updates the assumptions used to measure the defined benefit pension and postretirement benefit obligations,
including discount rates, at December 31 or upon a remeasurement event. The Company determines the discount
rates used to measure the obligations based on the development of a yield curve using high-quality corporate bonds
selected to yield cash flows that correspond to the expected timing and amount of the expected future benefit
payments. The selected discount rate has a significant effect on the measurement of the defined benefit pension and
postretirement benefit obligations. 
62
AT&T Inc.
Auditing the defined benefit pension and postretirement benefit obligations was complex due to the need to
evaluate the highly judgmental nature of the actuarial assumptions made by management, primarily the discount
rate, used in the Company’s measurement process. Auditing the discount rates associated with the measurement of
the defined benefit pension and postretirement benefit obligations was complex because it required an evaluation
of the credit quality of the corporate bonds used to develop the discount rate and the correlation of those bonds’
cash inflows to the timing and amount of future expected benefit payments.
How We 
 Addressed the
Matter in Our 
 Audit
 We obtained an understanding, evaluated the design and tested the operating effectiveness of certain controls over
management’s review of the determination of the discount rates used in the defined benefit pension and
postretirement benefit obligations calculations.
 
To test the determination of the discount rate used in the calculation of the defined benefit pension and
postretirement benefit obligations, we performed audit procedures that focused on evaluating, with the assistance
of our actuarial specialists, the determination of the discount rates, among other procedures. For example, we
evaluated the selected yield curve used to determine the discount rates applied in measuring the defined benefit
pension and postretirement benefit obligations. As part of this assessment, we considered the credit quality of the
corporate bonds that comprise the yield curve and compared the timing and amount of cash flows at maturity with
the expected amounts and duration of the related benefit payments. As part of this assessment, we compared the
Company’s current projections to historical projected defined benefit pension and postretirement benefit
obligations cash flows and compared the current-year benefits paid to the prior-year projected cash flows.
Uncertain tax positions
Description of the
MatterAs discussed in Note 14 to the consolidated financial statements, at December 31, 2020, the Company had
recorded unrecognized tax benefits of $12,451 million for uncertain tax positions. Uncertainty in a tax position
may arise as tax laws are subject to interpretation. The Company uses judgment to (1) determine whether, based on
the technical merits, a tax position is more likely than not to be sustained and (2) measure the amount of tax
benefit that qualifies for recognition within the financial statements. Changes in facts and circumstances, such as
changes in tax laws, new regulations issued by taxing authorities and communications with taxing authorities may
affect the amount of uncertain tax positions and, in turn, income tax expense. Estimated tax benefits related to
uncertain tax positions that are not more likely than not to be sustained are reported as unrecognized income tax
benefits.
 
Auditing the measurement of uncertain tax positions was challenging because the measurement is based on
interpretations of tax laws and legal rulings. Each tax position involves unique facts and circumstances that must
be evaluated, and there may be many uncertainties around initial recognition and de-recognition of tax positions,
including regulatory changes, litigation and examination activity.
How We Addressed
the
 Matter in Our 
 AuditWe obtained an understanding, evaluated the design and tested the operating effectiveness of controls over the
Company’s accounting process for uncertain tax positions. This included controls over identification and
measurement of the benefits of the uncertain tax positions, including management’s review of the inputs and
calculations of unrecognized income tax benefits, both initially and on an ongoing basis. 
  
We involved our tax professionals to assist us in assessing significant uncertain tax positions, including an
evaluation of the technical merits of individual positions, the determination of whether a tax position was more-
likely-than-not to be sustained, and the Company’s measurement of its uncertain tax positions, including the
computation of interest and penalties, among other procedures. For significant new positions, we assessed the
Company’s filing position, correspondence with the relevant tax authorities and third-party advice obtained by the
Company, as appropriate. For existing positions, we assessed changes in facts and law, as well as settlements of
similar positions for any impact to the recognized liability for the positions. We analyzed the Company’s
assumptions and data used to determine the amount of tax benefit to recognize and tested the accuracy of the
calculations. We also evaluated the adequacy of the Company’s financial statement disclosures related to uncertain
tax positions included in Note 14.
63
AT&T Inc.
Impairment of goodwill and long-lived assets
Description of the
Matter
 For the year ended December 31, 2020, the Company recorded asset impairments of $18,880 million, consisting
primarily of $10,465 million of goodwill and $7,255 million of long-lived assets. As discussed in Note 1 to the
consolidated financial statements, reporting unit goodwill is tested at least annually for impairment, and long-lived
assets, including definite-lived intangible assets, are evaluated for impairment whenever events or circumstances
indicate that the carrying amount may not be recoverable over the remaining life of the asset or asset group.
Estimating fair values in connection with these impairment evaluations involves the utilization of discounted cash
flow models, and, in the case of reporting units, market multiples valuation approaches. As disclosed in Note 9 to
the consolidated financial statements, the October 1, 2020 estimated fair values of the Turner, HBO, and
Entertainment Group reporting units exceeded their carrying values by less than 10%. The Company’s later
separation of the Entertainment Group reporting unit into the Video and Broadband reporting units required
additional impairment evaluations prior to and after the separation, pursuant to which the Company recorded a
goodwill impairment charge of $8,253 million, representing the entire amount of goodwill allocated for the Video
reporting unit. The Company also recorded a $2,212 million goodwill impairment charge for the Vrio reporting
unit, representing the entire amount of goodwill for that reporting unit. Furthermore, as disclosed in Notes 7 and 9
to the consolidated financial statements, the Company identified impairment indicators for its Video asset group
and was required to evaluate its recoverability utilizing probability-weighted expected cash flows, resulting in the
aforementioned $7,255 million impairment charge.
 
Auditing management’s impairment evaluations for the reporting unit goodwill and long-lived assets discussed
above was complex because the determination of expected cash flows used in the evaluation of recoverability and
the estimation of fair values involve subjective management assumptions, such as estimates of subscriber counts,
cash flow probabilities, changes in average revenue per user, discount rate, capital investment and content costs.
These assumptions are forward-looking and could be affected by shifts in long-term strategy and the evolving
market landscape. Changes in these assumptions can have a material effect on the determination of fair value.
How We Addressed
the
 Matter in Our 
 Audit
 We obtained an understanding, evaluated the design and tested the operating effectiveness of controls over the
Company’s impairment evaluation processes. Our procedures included testing controls over management’s review
of the valuation models and the significant assumptions described above.
 
Our audit procedures to test management’s impairment evaluations included, among others, assessing the valuation
methodologies and significant assumptions discussed above and the underlying data used to develop such
assumptions. For example, we compared the significant assumptions to current industry, market and economic
trends, and other guideline companies in the same industry. Where appropriate, we evaluated whether changes to
the Company’s business model, customer base and other factors would affect the significant assumptions. We also
assessed the historical accuracy of management’s estimates and performed independent sensitivity analyses. We
involved our valuation specialists to assist us in performing our audit procedures to test the estimated fair values of
the Company’s reporting units and long-lived assets. Our procedures to test management’s impairment evaluation
of its Video asset group also included challenging the reasonableness of the assigned probabilities discussed above
and the underlying factors considered by management to develop such probabilities.
/s/ Ernst & Young LLP
We have served as the Company’s auditor since 1999.
Dallas, Texas
February 25, 2021
64
AT&T Inc.
Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm
To the Stockholders and the Board of Directors of AT&T Inc.
Opinion on Internal Control Over Financial Reporting
We have audited AT&T Inc.’s internal control over financial reporting as of December 31, 2020, based on criteria established in Internal
Control—Integrated Framework issued by the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway Commission (2013 framework)
(the COSO criteria). In our opinion, AT&T Inc. (the Company) maintained, in all material respects, effective internal control over
financial reporting as of December 31, 2020, based on the COSO criteria.
We also have audited, in accordance with the standards of the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board (United States) (PCAOB),
the 2020 consolidated financial statements of the Company and our report dated February 25, 2021 expressed an unqualified opinion
thereon.
Basis for Opinion
The Company’s management is responsible for maintaining effective internal control over financial reporting and for its assessment of
the effectiveness of internal control over financial reporting included in the accompanying Report of Management. Our responsibility is
to express an opinion on the Company’s internal control over financial reporting based on our audit. We are a public accounting firm
registered with the PCAOB and are required to be independent with respect to the Company in accordance with the U.S. federal
securities laws and the applicable rules and regulations of the Securities and Exchange Commission and the PCAOB.
We conducted our audit in accordance with the standards of the PCAOB. Those standards require that we plan and perform the audit to
obtain reasonable assurance about whether effective internal control over financial reporting was maintained in all material respects.
Our audit included obtaining an understanding of internal control over financial reporting, assessing the risk that a material weakness
exists, testing and evaluating the design and operating effectiveness of internal control based on the assessed risk, and performing such
other procedures as we considered necessary in the circumstances. We believe that our audit provides a reasonable basis for our opinion.
Definition and Limitations of Internal Control Over Financial Reporting
A company’s internal control over financial reporting is a process designed to provide reasonable assurance regarding the reliability of
financial reporting and the preparation of financial statements for external purposes in accordance with generally accepted accounting
principles. A company’s internal control over financial reporting includes those policies and procedures that (1) pertain to the
maintenance of records that, in reasonable detail, accurately and fairly reflect the transactions and dispositions of the assets of the
company; (2) provide reasonable assurance that transactions are recorded as necessary to permit preparation of financial statements in
accordance with generally accepted accounting principles, and that receipts and expenditures of the company are being made only in
accordance with authorizations of management and directors of the company; and (3) provide reasonable assurance regarding prevention
or timely detection of unauthorized acquisition, use, or disposition of the company’s assets that could have a material effect on the
financial statements.
Because of its inherent limitations, internal control over financial reporting may not prevent or detect misstatements. Also, projections of
any evaluation of effectiveness to future periods are subject to the risk that controls may become inadequate because of changes in
conditions, or that the degree of compliance with the policies or procedures may deteriorate.
/s/ Ernst & Young LLP
Dallas, Texas
February 25, 2021
65
AT&T Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
ITEM 8. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA
Consolidated Statements of Income
2020 2019 2018
Operating Revenues
Service $ 152,767 $ 163,499 $ 152,345 
Equipment 18,993 17,694 18,411 
Total operating revenues 171,760 181,193 170,756 
Operating Expenses
Cost of revenues
Equipment 19,706 18,653 19,786 
Broadcast, programming and operations 27,305 31,132 26,727 
Other cost of revenues (exclusive of depreciation
and amortization shown separately below) 32,909 34,356 32,906 
Selling, general and administrative 38,039 39,422 36,765 
Asset impairments and abandonments 18,880 1,458 46 
Depreciation and amortization 28,516 28,217 28,430 
Total operating expenses 165,355 153,238 144,660 
Operating Income 6,405 27,955 26,096 
Other Income (Expense)
Interest expense (7,925) (8,422) (7,957)
Equity in net income (loss) of affiliates 95 6 (48)
Other income (expense) – net (1,431) (1,071) 6,782 
Total other income (expense) (9,261) (9,487) (1,223)
Income (Loss) Before Income Taxes (2,856) 18,468 24,873 
Income tax expense 965 3,493 4,920 
Net Income (Loss) (3,821) 14,975 19,953 
Less: Net Income Attributable to Noncontrolling Interest (1,355) (1,072) (583)
Net Income (Loss) Attributable to AT&T $ (5,176)$ 13,903 $ 19,370 
Less: Preferred Stock Dividends (193) (3) — 
Net Income (Loss) Attributable to Common Stock $ (5,369)$ 13,900 $ 19,370 
Basic Earnings Per Share Attributable to Common Stock $ (0.75)$ 1.90 $ 2.85 
Diluted Earnings Per Share Attributable to Common Stock $ (0.75)$ 1.89 $ 2.85 
The accompanying notes are an integral part of the consolidated financial statements.
66
AT&T Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
Consolidated Statements of Comprehensive Income
2020 2019 2018
Net income (loss) $ (3,821)$ 14,975 $ 19,953 
Other comprehensive income (loss), net of tax:
Foreign Currency:
Translation adjustment (includes $(59), $(9) and $(32) attributable to
noncontrolling interest), net of taxes of $(42), $18 and $(45) (929) 19 (1,062)
Securities:
Net unrealized gains (losses), net of taxes of $27, $17 and $(1) 78 50 (4)
Reclassification adjustment included in net income, net of taxes of $(5),
$0 and $0 (15) — — 
Derivative Instruments:
Net unrealized gains (losses), net of taxes of $(212), $(240) and $(156) (811) (900) (597)
Reclassification adjustment included in net income, net of taxes of $18,
$12 and $6 69 45 13 
Defined benefit postretirement plans:
Net prior service credit arising during period, net of taxes of $735,
$1,134 and $271 2,250 3,457 830 
Amortization of net prior service credit included in net income, net of
taxes of $(601), $(475) and $(431) (1,841) (1,459) (1,322)
Other comprehensive income (loss) (1,199) 1,212 (2,142)
Total comprehensive income (loss) (5,020) 16,187 17,811 
Less: Total comprehensive income attributable to noncontrolling interest (1,296) (1,063) (551)
Total Comprehensive Income (Loss) Attributable to AT&T $ (6,316)$ 15,124 $ 17,260 
The accompanying notes are an integral part of the consolidated financial statements.
67
AT&T Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
Consolidated Balance Sheets
December 31,
2020 2019
Assets
Current Assets
Cash and cash equivalents $ 9,740 $ 12,130 
Accounts receivable - net of related allowance for credit loss of $1,221 and $1,235 20,215 22,636 
Prepaid expenses 1,822 1,631 
Other current assets 20,231 18,364 
Total current assets 52,008 54,761 
Noncurrent Inventories and Theatrical Film and Television Production Costs 14,752 12,434 
Property, Plant and Equipment – Net 127,315 130,128 
Goodwill 135,259 146,241 
Licenses – Net 93,840 97,907 
Trademarks and Trade Names – Net 23,297 23,567 
Distribution Networks – Net 13,793 15,345 
Other Intangible Assets – Net 15,386 20,798 
Investments in and Advances to Equity Affiliates 1,780 3,695 
Operating Lease Right-Of-Use Assets 24,714 24,039 
Other Assets 23,617 22,754 
Total Assets $ 525,761 $ 551,669 
Liabilities and Stockholders’ Equity
Current Liabilities
Debt maturing within one year $ 3,470 $ 11,838 
Accounts payable and accrued liabilities 49,032 45,956 
Advanced billings and customer deposits 6,176 6,124 
Accrued taxes 1,019 1,212 
Dividends payable 3,741 3,781 
Total current liabilities 63,438 68,911 
Long-Term Debt 153,775 151,309 
Deferred Credits and Other Noncurrent Liabilities
Deferred income taxes 60,472 59,502 
Postemployment benefit obligation 18,276 18,788 
Operating lease liabilities 22,202 21,804 
Other noncurrent liabilities 28,358 29,421 
Total deferred credits and other noncurrent liabilities 129,308 129,515 
Stockholders’ Equity
Preferred stock ($1 par value, 10,000,000 authorized):
Series A (48,000 issued and outstanding at December 31, 2020 and December 31, 2019) — — 
Series B (20,000 issued and outstanding at December 31, 2020 and 0 issued and
outstanding at December 31, 2019) — — 
Series C (70,000 issued and outstanding at December 31, 2020 and 0 issued and
outstanding at December 31, 2019) — — 
Common stock ($1 par value, 14,000,000,000 authorized at December 31, 2020 and
December 31, 2019: issued 7,620,748,598 at December 31, 2020 and December 31, 2019) 7,621 7,621 
Additional paid-in capital 130,175 126,279 
Retained earnings 37,457 57,936 
Treasury stock (494,826,583 at December 31, 2020
and 366,193,458 at December 31, 2019, at cost) (17,910) (13,085)
Accumulated other comprehensive income 4,330 5,470 
Noncontrolling interest 17,567 17,713 
Total stockholders’ equity 179,240 201,934 
Total Liabilities and Stockholders’ Equity $ 525,761 $ 551,669 
The accompanying notes are an integral part of the consolidated financial statements.
68
AT&T Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows
2020 2019 2018
Operating Activities
Net income (loss) $ (3,821)$ 14,975 $ 19,953 
Adjustments to reconcile net income (loss) to net cash provided by
operating activities:
Depreciation and amortization 28,516 28,217 28,430 
Amortization of film and television costs 8,603 9,587 3,772 
Undistributed earnings from investments in equity affiliates 38 295 292 
Provision for uncollectible accounts 1,972 2,575 1,791 
Deferred income tax expense 1,675 1,806 4,931 
Net (gain) loss on investments, net of impairments (742) (1,218) (739)
Pension and postretirement benefit expense (credit) (2,992) (2,002) (1,148)
Actuarial (gain) loss on pension and postretirement benefits 4,169 5,171 (3,412)
Asset impairments and abandonments 18,880 1,458 46 
Changes in operating assets and liabilities:
Receivables 2,216 2,812 (1,580)
Other current assets, inventories and theatrical film and television
production costs (13,070) (12,852) (6,442)
Accounts payable and other accrued liabilities (1,410) (1,524) 1,602 
Equipment installment receivables and related sales (1,429) 548 (490)
Deferred customer contract acquisition and fulfillment costs 376 (910) (3,458)
Postretirement claims and contributions (985) (1,008) (936)
Other - net 1,134 738 990 
Total adjustments 46,951 33,693 23,649 
Net Cash Provided by Operating Activities 43,130 48,668 43,602 
Investing Activities
Capital expenditures, including $(123), $(200) and $(493) of
interest during construction (15,675) (19,635) (21,251)
Acquisitions, net of cash acquired (1,851) (1,809) (43,309)
Dispositions 3,641 4,684 2,148 
(Purchases), sales and settlement of securities and investments, net 497 435 (183)
Advances to and investments in equity affiliates, net (160) (365) (1,050)
Cash collections of deferred purchase price — — 500 
Net Cash Used in Investing Activities (13,548) (16,690) (63,145)
Financing Activities
Net change in short-term borrowings with original maturities of
three months or less (17) (276) (821)
Issuance of other short-term borrowings 9,440 4,012 4,898 
Repayment of other short-term borrowings (9,467) (6,904) (2,098)
Issuance of long-term debt 31,988 17,039 41,875 
Repayment of long-term debt (39,964) (27,592) (52,643)
Payment of vendor financing (2,966) (3,050) (560)
Issuance of preferred stock 3,869 1,164 — 
Purchase of treasury stock (5,498) (2,417) (609)
Issuance of treasury stock 105 631 745 
Issuance of preferred interests in subsidiaries 1,979 7,876 — 
Redemption of preferred interest in subsidiary (1,950) — — 
Dividends paid (14,956) (14,888) (13,410)
Other - net (4,570) (678) (3,366)
Net Cash Used in Financing Activities (32,007) (25,083) (25,989)
Net (decrease) increase in cash and cash equivalents and restricted cash (2,425) 6,895 (45,532)
Cash and cash equivalents and restricted cash beginning of year 12,295 5,400 50,932 
Cash and Cash Equivalents and Restricted Cash End of Year $ 9,870 $ 12,295 $ 5,400 
The accompanying notes are an integral part of the consolidated financial statements.
69
AT&T Inc.
Dollars and shares in millions except per share amounts
Consolidated Statements of Changes in Stockholders’ Equity
2020 2019 2018
Shares Amount Shares Amount Shares Amount
Preferred Stock – Series A
Balance at beginning of year — $ — — $ — — $ — 
Issuance of stock — — — — — — 
Balance at end of year — $ — — $ — — $ — 
Preferred Stock – Series B
Balance at beginning of year — $ — — $ — — $ — 
Issuance of stock — — — — — — 
Balance at end of year — $ — — $ — — $ — 
Preferred Stock – Series C
Balance at beginning of year — $ — — $ — — $ — 
Issuance of stock — — — — — — 
Balance at end of year — $ — — $ — — $ — 
Common Stock
Balance at beginning of year 7,621 $ 7,621 7,621 $ 7,621 6,495 $ 6,495 
Issuance of stock — — — — 1,126 1,126 
Balance at end of year 7,621 $ 7,621 7,621 $ 7,621 7,621 $ 7,621 
Additional Paid-In Capital
Balance at beginning of year $ 126,279 $ 125,525 $ 89,563 
Repurchase and acquisition of
common stock 67 — — 
Issuance of preferred stock 3,869 1,164 — 
Issuance of common stock — — 35,473 
Issuance of treasury stock (62) (125) (115)
Share-based payments 18 (271) 604 
Changes related to acquisition of
interests held by noncontrolling
owners 4 (14) — 
Balance at end of year $ 130,175 $ 126,279 $ 125,525 
Retained Earnings
Balance at beginning of year $ 57,936 $ 58,753 $ 50,500 
Cumulative effect of accounting
changes and other adjustments (293) 316 3,000 
Adjusted beginning balance 57,643 59,069 53,500 
Net income (loss) attributable to AT&T (5,176) 13,903 19,370 
Preferred stock dividends (139) (8) — 
Common stock dividends ($2.08, $2.05,
and $2.01 per share) (14,871) (15,028) (14,117)
Balance at end of year $ 37,457 $ 57,936 $ 58,753 
The accompanying notes are an integral part of the consolidated financial statements.
70
AT&T Inc.
Dollars and shares in millions except per share amounts
Consolidated Statements of Changes in Stockholders’ Equity - continued
2020 2019 2018
Shares Amount Shares Amount Shares Amount
Treasury Stock
Balance at beginning of year (366)$ (13,085) (339)$ (12,059) (356)$ (12,714)
Repurchase and acquisition of
common stock (150) (5,631) (67) (2,492) (20) (692)
Issuance of treasury stock 21 806 40 1,466 37 1,347 
Balance at end of year (495)$ (17,910) (366)$ (13,085) (339)$ (12,059)
Accumulated Other Comprehensive Income
Attributable to AT&T, net of tax:
Balance at beginning of year $ 5,470 $ 4,249 $ 7,017 
Cumulative effect of accounting
changes and other adjustments — — (658)
Adjusted beginning balance 5,470 4,249 6,359 
Other comprehensive income (loss)
attributable to AT&T (1,140) 1,221 (2,110)
Balance at end of year $ 4,330 $ 5,470 $ 4,249 
Noncontrolling Interest:
Balance at beginning of year $ 17,713 $ 9,795 $ 1,146 
Cumulative effect of accounting
changes and other adjustments (7) 29 35 
Adjusted beginning balance 17,706 9,824 1,181 
Net income attributable to
noncontrolling interest 1,355 1,072 583 
Issuance and acquisition of
noncontrolling owners 1,979 7,881 8,804 
Redemption of noncontrolling interest (1,950) — — 
Distributions (1,464) (1,055) (732)
Acquisition of interests held by
noncontrolling owners — — (9)
Translation adjustments attributable to
noncontrolling interest, net of taxes (59) (9) (32)
Balance at end of year $ 17,567 $ 17,713 $ 9,795 
Total Stockholders’ Equity at
beginning of year $ 201,934 $ 193,884 $ 142,007 
Total Stockholders’ Equity at
end of year $ 179,240 $ 201,934 $ 193,884 
The accompanying notes are an integral part of the consolidated financial statements.
71
AT&T Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
NOTE 1. SUMMARY OF SIGNIFICANT ACCOUNTING POLICIES
Basis of Presentation Throughout this document, AT&T Inc. is referred to as “AT&T,” “we” or the “Company.” The consolidated
financial statements include the accounts of the Company and subsidiaries and affiliates which we control, including the results of Time
Warner Inc. (referred to as “Time Warner” or “WarnerMedia”), which was acquired on June 14, 2018 (see Note 6). AT&T is a holding
company whose subsidiaries and affiliates operate worldwide in the telecommunications, media and technology industries.
All significant intercompany transactions are eliminated in the consolidation process. Investments in subsidiaries and partnerships which
we do not control but have significant influence are accounted for under the equity method. Earnings from certain investments accounted
for using the equity method are included for periods ended within up to one quarter of our period end. We also record our proportionate
share of our equity method investees’ other comprehensive income (OCI) items, including translation adjustments. We treat distributions
received from equity method investees as returns on investment and classify them as cash flows from operating activities until those
distributions exceed our cumulative equity in the earnings of that investment. We treat the excess amount as a return of investment and
classify it as cash flows from investing activities.
The preparation of financial statements in conformity with U.S. generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) requires management
to make estimates and assumptions, including potential impacts arising from the COVID-19 pandemic and other estimates of probable
losses and expenses, that affect the amounts reported in the financial statements and accompanying notes. Actual results could differ
from those estimates. Certain prior-period amounts have been conformed to the current period’s presentation. See Note 4 for a discussion
on the recast of our segment results and Note 9 for a discussion of the separation of our former Entertainment Group into two reporting
units, Video and Broadband.
Accounting Policies and Adopted Accounting Standards
Credit Losses As of January 1, 2020, we adopted, through modified retrospective application, the Financial Accounting Standards
Board’s (FASB) Accounting Standards Update (ASU) No. 2016-13, “Financial Instruments—Credit Losses (Topic 326): Measurement of
Credit Losses on Financial Instruments,” or Accounting Standards Codification (ASC) 326 (ASC 326), which replaces the incurred loss
impairment methodology under prior GAAP with an expected credit loss model. ASC 326 affects trade receivables, loans, contract
assets, certain beneficial interests, off-balance-sheet credit exposures not accounted for as insurance and other financial assets that are not
subject to fair value through net income, as defined by the standard. Under the expected credit loss model, we are required to consider
future economic trends to estimate expected credit losses over the lifetime of the asset. Upon adoption on January 1, 2020, we recorded a
$293 reduction to “Retained earnings,” $395 increase to “Allowances for credit losses” applicable to our trade and loan receivables, $10
reduction of contract assets, $105 reduction of net deferred income tax liability and $7 reduction of “Noncontrolling interest.” Our
adoption of ASC 326 did not have a material impact on our financial statements.
Leases As of January 1, 2019, we adopted, with modified retrospective application, the FASB's ASU No. 2016-02, “Leases (Topic 842)”
(ASC 842), which replaces existing leasing rules with a comprehensive lease measurement and recognition standard and expanded
disclosure requirements (see Note 8). ASC 842 requires lessees to recognize most leases on their balance sheets as liabilities, with
corresponding “right-of-use” assets. For income statement recognition purposes, leases are classified as either a finance or an operating
lease without relying upon bright-line tests.
The key change upon adoption of the standard was balance sheet recognition of operating leases, given that the recognition of lease
expense on our income statement is similar to our historical accounting. Using the modified retrospective transition method of adoption,
we did not adjust the balance sheet for comparative periods but recorded a cumulative effect adjustment to retained earnings on January
1, 2019. We elected the package of practical expedients permitted under the transition guidance within the new standard, which, among
other things, allowed us to carry forward our historical lease classification. We also elected the practical expedient related to land
easements, allowing us to carry forward our accounting treatment for land easements on existing agreements that were not accounted for
as leases. We excluded leases with original terms of one year or less. Additionally, we elected to not separate lease and non-lease
components for certain classes of assets. Our accounting for finance leases did not change from our prior accounting for capital leases.
72
AT&T Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
The adoption of ASC 842 resulted in the recognition of an operating lease liability of $22,121 and an operating right-of-use asset of the
same amount. Existing prepaid and deferred rent accruals were recorded as an offset to the right-of-use asset, resulting in a net asset of
$20,960. The cumulative effect of the adoption to retained earnings was an increase of $316 reflecting the reclassification of deferred
gains related to sale/leaseback transactions. The standard did not materially impact our income statements or statements of cash flows,
and had no impact on our debt-covenant compliance under our current agreements.
Deferral of Episodic Television and Film Costs In March 2019, the FASB issued ASU No. 2019-02, “Entertainment—Films—Other
Assets—Film Costs (Subtopic 926-20) and Entertainment—Broadcasters—Intangibles—Goodwill and Other (Subtopic 920-350):
Improvements to Accounting for Costs of Films and License Agreements for Program Materials” (ASU 2019-02), which we early
adopted as of January 1, 2019, with prospective application. The standard eliminates certain revenue-related constraints on capitalization
of inventory costs for episodic television that existed under prior guidance. In addition, the balance sheet classification requirements that
existed in prior guidance for film production costs and programming inventory were eliminated. As of January 1, 2019, we reclassified
$2,274 of our programming inventory costs from “Other current assets” to “Other Assets” in accordance with the guidance (see Note 11).
This change in accounting did not materially impact our income statement.
Revenue Recognition As of January 1, 2018, we adopted ASU No. 2014-09, “Revenue from Contracts with Customers (Topic 606),” as
modified (ASC 606), using the modified retrospective method, which does not allow us to adjust prior periods. We applied the rules to all
open contracts existing as of January 1, 2018, recording an increase of $2,342 to retained earnings for the cumulative effect of the
change, with an offsetting contract asset of $1,737, deferred contract acquisition costs of $1,454, other asset reductions of $239, other
liability reductions of $212, deferred income tax liability of $787 and increase to noncontrolling interest of $35. (See Note 5)
Financial Instruments As of January 1, 2018, we adopted ASU No. 2016-01, “Financial Instruments – Overall (Subtopic 825-10):
Recognition and Measurement of Financial Assets and Financial Liabilities” (ASU 2016-01), which requires us to prospectively record
changes in the fair value of our equity investments, except for those accounted for under the equity method, in net income instead of in
accumulated other comprehensive income (accumulated OCI). As of January 1, 2018, we recorded an increase of $658 in retained
earnings for the cumulative effect of the adoption of ASU 2016-01, with an offset to accumulated OCI.
Income Taxes We record deferred income taxes for temporary differences between the carrying amounts of assets and liabilities for
financial reporting purposes and the computed tax basis of those assets and liabilities. We record valuation allowances against the
deferred tax assets (included, together with our deferred income tax assets, as part of our reportable net deferred income tax liabilities on
our consolidated balance sheets), for which the realization is uncertain. We review these items regularly in light of changes in federal and
state tax laws and changes in our business.
The Tax Cuts and Jobs Act (the Act), which was enacted on December 22, 2017, reduced the U.S. federal corporate income tax rate from
35% to 21% and required companies to pay a one-time transition tax on earnings of certain foreign subsidiaries that were previously tax
deferred. We included the estimated impact of the Act in our financial results at or for the period ended December 31, 2017, with
additional adjustments recorded in 2018, as allowed by the Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC) in Staff Accounting Bulletin
(SAB) 118. (See Note 14)
Cash and Cash Equivalents Cash and cash equivalents include all highly liquid investments with original maturities of three months or
less. The carrying amounts approximate fair value. At December 31, 2020, we held $2,842 in cash and $6,898 in money market funds
and other cash equivalents. Of our total cash and cash equivalents, $2,205 resided in foreign jurisdictions, some of which is subject to
restrictions on repatriation.
Allowance for Credit Losses We record expense to maintain an allowance for credit losses for estimated losses that result from the
failure or inability of our customers to make required payments deemed collectible from the customer when the service was provided or
product was delivered. When determining the allowances for trade receivables and loans, we consider the probability of recoverability of
accounts receivable based on past experience, taking into account current collection trends and general economic factors, including
bankruptcy rates. We also consider future economic trends to estimate expected credit losses over the lifetime of the asset. Credit risks
are assessed based on historical write-offs, net of recoveries, as well as an analysis of the aged accounts receivable balances with
allowances generally increasing as the receivable ages. Accounts receivable may be fully reserved for when specific collection issues are
known to exist, such as catastrophes or pending bankruptcies.
73
AT&T Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
Equipment Inventory Equipment inventories, which primarily consist of wireless devices and accessories, are included in “Other
current assets” on our consolidated balance sheets. Equipment inventories are valued at the lower of cost or net realizable value and were
$3,592 at December 31, 2020 and $2,864 at December 31, 2019.
Licensed Programming Inventory Cost Recognition and Impairment We enter into agreements to license programming exhibition
rights from licensors. A programming inventory asset related to these rights and a corresponding liability payable to the licensor are
recorded (on a discounted basis if the license agreements are long-term) when (i) the cost of the programming is reasonably determined,
(ii) the programming material has been accepted in accordance with the terms of the agreement, (iii) the programming is available for its
first showing or telecast, and (iv) the license period has commenced. There are variations in the amortization methods of these rights,
depending on whether the network is advertising-supported (e.g., TNT and TBS) or not advertising-supported (e.g., HBO and Turner
Classic Movies).
For the advertising-supported networks, our general policy is to amortize each program’s costs on a straight-line basis (or per-play basis,
if greater) over its license period. In circumstances where the initial airing of the program has more value than subsequent airings, an
accelerated method of amortization is used. The accelerated amortization upon the first airing versus subsequent airings is determined
based on a study of historical and estimated future advertising sales for similar programming. For rights fees paid for sports
programming arrangements, such rights fees are amortized using a revenue-forecast model, in which the rights fees are amortized using
the ratio of current period advertising revenue to total estimated remaining advertising revenue over the term of the arrangement.
For premium pay television, streaming and over-the-top (OTT) services that are not advertising-supported, each licensed program’s costs
are amortized on a straight-line basis over its license period or estimated period of use, beginning with the month of initial exhibition.
When we have the right to exhibit feature theatrical programming in multiple windows over a number of years, historical audience
viewership is used as the basis for determining the amount of programming amortization attributable to each window.
Licensed programming inventory is carried at the lower of unamortized cost or fair value. For networks that generate both advertising
and subscription revenues, the net realizable value of unamortized programming costs is generally evaluated based on the network’s
programming taken as a whole. In assessing whether the programming inventory for a particular advertising-supported network is
impaired, the net realizable value for all of the network’s programming inventory is determined based on a projection of the network’s
profitability. This assessment would occur upon the occurrence of certain triggering events. Similarly, for premium pay television,
streaming and OTT services that are not advertising-supported, an evaluation of the fair value of unamortized programming costs is
performed based on services’ licensed programming taken as a whole. Specifically, the fair value for all premium pay television,
streaming and OTT service licensed programming is determined based on projections of estimated subscription revenues less certain
costs of delivering and distributing the licensed programming. Changes in management’s intended usage of a specific program, such as a
decision to no longer exhibit that program and forgo the use of the rights associated with the program license, results in a reassessment of
that program’s fair value, which could result in an impairment (see Note 11).
Film and Television Production Cost Recognition, Participations and Residuals and Impairments Film and television production
costs on our consolidated balance sheets include the unamortized cost of completed theatrical films and television episodes, theatrical
films and television series in production and undeveloped film and television rights. Film and television production costs are stated at the
lower of cost, less accumulated amortization, or fair value. For films and television programs predominantly monetized individually, the
amount of capitalized film and television production costs and the amount of participations and residuals to be recognized as broadcast,
programming and operations expenses for a given film or television series in a particular period are determined using the film forecast
computation method. Under this method, the amortization of capitalized costs and the accrual of participations and residuals are based on
the proportion of the film’s (or television program’s) revenues recognized for such period to the film’s (or television program’s)
estimated remaining ultimate revenues (i.e., the total revenue to be received throughout a film’s (or television program’s) life cycle).
The process of estimating a film’s ultimate revenues requires us to make a series of judgments related to future revenue-generating
activities associated with a particular film. We estimate the ultimate revenues, less additional costs to be incurred (including exploitation
and participation costs), in order to determine whether the value of a film or television series is impaired and requires an immediate
write-off of unrecoverable film and television production costs. To the extent that the ultimate revenues are adjusted, the resulting gross
margin reported on the exploitation of that film or television series in a period is also adjusted. (See Note 11)
74
AT&T Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
Prior to the theatrical release of a film, our estimates are based on factors such as the historical performance of similar films, the star
power of the lead actors, the rating and genre of the film, pre-release market research (including test market screenings), international
distribution plans and the expected number of theaters in which the film will be released. In the absence of revenues directly related to
the exhibition of owned film or television programs on our television networks, premium pay television, streaming or OTT services, we
estimate a portion of the unamortized costs that are representative of the utilization of that film or television program in that exhibition
and expense such costs as the film or television program is exhibited. The period over which ultimate revenues are estimated generally
does not exceed ten years from the initial release of a motion picture or from the date of delivery of the first episode of an episodic
television series. Estimates were updated based on information available during the film’s production and, upon release, the actual results
of each film.
For a film (or television program) predominantly monetized as part of a film (or television program) group, the amount of capitalized
film and television production costs is amortized using a reasonably reliable estimate of the portion of unamortized film costs that is
representative of the use of the film. Production costs are expensed as the film (or television program) is exhibited or exploited.
Property, Plant and Equipment Property, plant and equipment is stated at cost, except for assets acquired using acquisition accounting,
which are initially recorded at fair value (see Note 7). The cost of additions and substantial improvements to property, plant and
equipment is capitalized, and includes internal compensation costs for these projects. The cost of maintenance and repairs of property,
plant and equipment is charged to operating expenses. Property, plant and equipment costs are depreciated using straight-line methods
over their estimated economic lives. Certain subsidiaries follow composite group depreciation methodology. Accordingly, when a portion
of their depreciable property, plant and equipment is retired in the ordinary course of business, the gross book value is reclassified to
accumulated depreciation, and no gain or loss is recognized on the disposition of these assets.
Property, plant and equipment is reviewed for recoverability whenever events or changes in circumstances indicate that the carrying
amount of an asset group may not be recoverable. We recognize an impairment loss when the carrying amount of a long-lived asset is not
recoverable. The carrying amount of a long-lived asset is not recoverable if it exceeds the sum of the undiscounted cash flows expected
to result from the use and eventual disposition of the asset. See Note 7 for a discussion of an impairment of long-lived assets of the video
business and other network asset abandonments.
The liability for the fair value of an asset retirement obligation is recorded in the period in which it is incurred if a reasonable estimate of
fair value can be made. In periods subsequent to initial measurement, we recognize period-to-period changes in the liability resulting
from the passage of time and revisions to either the timing or the amount of the original estimate. The increase in the carrying value of
the associated long-lived asset is depreciated over the corresponding estimated economic life.
Software Costs We capitalize certain costs incurred in connection with developing or obtaining internal-use software. Capitalized
software costs are included in “Property, Plant and Equipment - Net” on our consolidated balance sheets. In addition, there is certain
network software that allows the equipment to provide the features and functions unique to the AT&T network, which we include in the
cost of the equipment categories for financial reporting purposes.
We amortize our capitalized software costs over a three-year to seven-year period, reflecting the estimated period during which these
assets will remain in service.
Goodwill and Other Intangible Assets We have the following major classes of intangible assets: goodwill; licenses, which include
Federal Communications Commission (FCC) and other wireless licenses and orbital slots; distribution networks; film and television
libraries; intellectual properties and franchises; trademarks and trade names; customer lists; and various other finite-lived intangible
assets (see Note 9).
Goodwill represents the excess of consideration paid over the fair value of identifiable net assets acquired in business combinations.
Wireless licenses provide us with the exclusive right to utilize certain radio frequency spectrum to provide wireless communications
services. While wireless licenses are issued for a fixed period of time (generally ten years), renewals of domestic wireless licenses have
occurred routinely and at nominal cost. We have determined that there are currently no legal, regulatory, contractual, competitive,
economic or other factors that limit the useful lives of our FCC wireless licenses.
75
AT&T Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
During 2019, in conjunction with the renewal process of certain wireless licenses in Mexico, we reassessed the estimated economic lives
and renewal assumptions for these licenses. As a result, we have changed the life of these licenses from indefinite to finite-lived. On
January 1, 2019, we began amortizing our wireless licenses in Mexico over their average remaining economic life of 25 years. This
change in accounting does not materially impact our income statement.
During the first quarter of 2020, in conjunction with the nationwide launch of AT&T TV and our customers’ continued shift from linear
to streaming video services, we reassessed the estimated economic lives and renewal assumptions for our orbital slot licenses. As a
result, we have changed the estimated lives of our orbital slot licenses from indefinite to finite-lived, effective January 1, 2020, and
began amortizing these licenses using the sum-of-months-digits method over their average remaining economic life of 15 years at
January 1, 2020. This change in accounting increased amortization expense $1,504, or $0.16 per diluted share available to common stock
for 2020.
We acquired the rights to the AT&T and other trade names in previous acquisitions, classifying certain of those trade names as indefinite-
lived. We have the effective ability to retain these exclusive rights permanently at a nominal cost. During the first quarter of 2020, we
reassessed and changed the estimated economic lives of certain trade names in our Latin America business from indefinite to finite-lived
and began amortizing them using the straight-line method over their average remaining economic life of 15 years. This change had an
insignificant impact on our financial statements.
Goodwill, FCC wireless licenses and other indefinite-lived intangible assets are not amortized but are tested at least annually for
impairment. The testing is performed on the value as of October 1 each year, and compares the book values of the assets to their fair
values. Goodwill is tested by comparing the carrying amount of each reporting unit, deemed to be our principal operating segments or
one level below them, to the fair value using both discounted cash flow as well as market multiple approaches. FCC wireless licenses are
tested on an aggregate basis, consistent with our use of the licenses on a national scope, using a discounted cash flow approach. Prior to
2020, orbital slots were similarly aggregated for purposes of impairment testing and valued using a discounted cash flow approach. Trade
names are tested by comparing their book values to their fair values calculated using a discounted cash flow approach on a presumed
royalty rate derived from the revenues related to each brand name.
Intangible assets that have finite useful lives are amortized over their estimated useful lives (see Note 9). As of January 1, 2020, on a
prospective basis, orbital slots are amortized using the sum-of-the-months-digits method of amortization over their average remaining
economic life. Customer lists and relationships are amortized using primarily the sum-of-the-months-digits method of amortization over
the period in which those relationships are expected to contribute to our future cash flows. Finite-lived trademarks and trade names and
distribution networks are amortized using the straight-line method over the estimated useful life of the assets. Film library is amortized
using the film forecast computation method, as previously disclosed. The remaining finite-lived intangible assets are generally amortized
using the straight-line method. These assets, along with other long-lived assets, are reviewed for recoverability whenever events or
changes in circumstances indicate that the carrying amount of an asset group may not be recoverable.
Advertising Costs We expense advertising costs for products and services or for promoting our corporate image as incurred (see Note
22).
Foreign Currency Translation Our foreign subsidiaries and foreign investments generally report their earnings in their local currencies.
We translate their foreign assets and liabilities at exchange rates in effect at the balance sheet dates. We translate their revenues and
expenses using average rates during the year. The resulting foreign currency translation adjustments are recorded as a separate
component of accumulated OCI in our consolidated balance sheets (see Note 3). Operations in countries with highly inflationary
economies use the U.S. dollar as the functional currency.
We hedge a portion of the foreign currency exchange risk involved in certain foreign currency-denominated transactions, which we
explain further in our discussion of our methods of managing our foreign currency risk (see Note 13).
Pension and Other Postretirement Benefits See Note 15 for a comprehensive discussion of our pension and postretirement benefits,
including a discussion of the actuarial assumptions, our policy for recognizing the associated gains and losses and our method used to
estimate service and interest cost components.
76
AT&T Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
New Accounting Standards
Income Taxes In December 2019, the FASB issued ASU No. 2019-12, “Income Taxes (Topic 740): Simplifying the Accounting for
Income Taxes” (ASU 2019-12), which is expected to simplify income tax accounting requirements in areas deemed costly and complex.
The amendments under ASU 2019-12 will be effective as of January 1, 2021, and interim periods within that year, with early adoption
permitted in its entirety as of the beginning of the year of adoption. At adoption, the guidance allows for modified retrospective
application through a cumulative effect adjustment to retained earnings. We do not expect ASU 2019-12 to have a material impact on our
financial statements.
Reference Rate Reform In March 2020, the FASB issued ASU No. 2020-04, “Reference Rate Reform (Topic 848): Facilitation of the
Effects of Reference Rate Reform on Financial Reporting” (ASU 2020-04, as amended), which provides optional expedients, and allows
for certain exceptions to existing GAAP, for contract modifications triggered by the expected market transition of certain benchmark
interest rates to alternative reference rates. ASU 2020-04 applies to contracts, hedging relationships, certain derivatives and other
arrangements that reference the London Interbank Offering Rate (LIBOR) or any other rates ending after December 31, 2022. ASU
2020-04 became effective immediately. We are evaluating the impact of our adoption of ASU 2020-04, including optional expedients, to
our financial statements.
 
Convertible Instruments In August 2020, the FASB issued ASU No. 2020-06, “Debt—Debt With Conversion and Other Options
(Subtopic 470-20) and Derivatives and Hedging—Contracts in Entity’s Own Equity (Subtopic 815-40): Accounting for Convertible
Instruments and Contracts in an Entity’s Own Equity” (ASU 2020-06), which eliminated certain separation models regarding cash
conversion and beneficial conversion features to simplify reporting for convertible instruments as a single liability or equity, with no
separate accounting for embedded conversion features. ASU 2020-06 will be effective for fiscal years beginning after December 31,
2021, under modified retrospective or full retrospective application, subject to early adoption in 2021. We are evaluating the impact of
our adoption of ASU 2020-06 on our financial statements.
NOTE 2. EARNINGS PER SHARE
A reconciliation of the numerators and denominators of basic and diluted earnings per share is shown in the table below:
Year Ended December 31, 2020 2019 2018
Numerators
Numerator for basic earnings per share:
Net Income (Loss) $ (3,821)$ 14,975 $ 19,953 
Less: Net Income Attributable to Noncontrolling Interest (1,355) (1,072) (583)
Net Income (Loss) Attributable to AT&T (5,176) 13,903 19,370 
Less: Preferred Stock Dividends (193) (3) — 
Net Income (Loss) Attributable to Common Stock (5,369) 13,900 19,370 
Dilutive potential common shares:
Share-based payment 23 21 19 
Numerator for diluted earnings per share $ (5,346)$ 13,921 $ 19,389 
Denominators (000,000)
Denominator for basic earnings per share:
Weighted average number of common shares outstanding 7,157 7,319 6,778 
Dilutive potential common shares:
Share-based payment (in shares) 26 29 28 
Denominator for diluted earnings per share 7,183 7,348 6,806 
Basic Earnings Per Share Attributable to Common Stock $ (0.75)$ 1.90 $ 2.85 
Diluted Earnings Per Share Attributable to Common Stock $ (0.75)$ 1.89 $ 2.85 
For 2020, dilutive potential common shares are not included in the computation of diluted earnings per share because their ef fect is antidilutive as a
result of the net loss.
In the first quarter of 2020, we completed an accelerated share repurchase agreement with a third-party financial institution to repurchase
AT&T common stock (see Note 17). Under the terms of the agreement, we paid the financial institution $4,000 and received
104.8 million shares.1
1
1
1
77
AT&T Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
NOTE 3. OTHER COMPREHENSIVE INCOME
Changes in the balances of each component included in accumulated OCI are presented below. All amounts are net of tax and exclude
noncontrolling interest.
Foreign
Currency
Translation
AdjustmentNet Unrealized
Gains (Losses) on 
Available-for-Sale 
SecuritiesNet Unrealized 
Gains (Losses) on
Cash Flow
HedgesDefined Benefit 
Postretirement 
PlansAccumulated
Other 
Comprehensive 
Income
Balance as of December 31, 2017$ (2,054)$ 660 $ 1,402 $ 7,009 $ 7,017 
Other comprehensive income
(loss) before reclassifications (1,030) (4) (597) 830 (801)
Amounts reclassified from
accumulated OCI — 1— 113 2(1,322)3(1,309)
Net other comprehensive
income (loss) (1,030) (4) (584) (492) (2,110)
Amounts reclassified to
retained earnings — (658) — — (658)
Balance as of December 31, 2018 (3,084) (2) 818 6,517 4,249 
Other comprehensive income
(loss) before reclassifications 28 50 (900) 3,457 2,635 
Amounts reclassified from
accumulated OCI — 1— 145 2(1,459)3(1,414)
Net other comprehensive
income (loss) 28 50 (855) 1,998 1,221 
Balance as of December 31, 2019 (3,056) 48 (37) 8,515 5,470 
Other comprehensive income
(loss) before reclassifications (870) 78 (811) 2,250 647 
Amounts reclassified from
accumulated OCI — 1(15)169 2(1,841)3(1,787)
Net other comprehensive
income (loss) (870) 63 (742) 409 (1,140)
Balance as of December 31, 2020$ (3,926)$ 111 $ (779)$ 8,924 $ 4,330 
(Gains) losses are included in “Other income (expense) – net” in the consolidated statements of income.
(Gains) losses are included in “Interest expense” in the consolidated statements of income (see Note 13).
The amortization of prior service credits associated with postretirement benefits is included in “Other income (expense) – net” in the consolidated
statements of income (see Note 15).
With the adoption of ASU 2016-01, the unrealized (gains) losses on our equity investments are reclassified to retained earnings (see Note 1).
NOTE 4. SEGMENT INFORMATION
Our segments are comprised of strategic business units that offer products and services to different customer segments over various
technology platforms and/or in different geographies that are managed accordingly. We analyze our segments based on segment
operating contribution, which consists of operating income, excluding acquisition-related costs and other significant items (as discussed
below), and equity in net income (loss) of affiliates for investments managed within each segment. We have three reportable segments:
(1) Communications, (2) WarnerMedia and (3) Latin America.
We have recast our segment results for all prior periods to include our prior Xandr segment within our WarnerMedia segment and to
remove the Crunchyroll anime business that is classified as held-for-sale and removed from the WarnerMedia segment, instead including
it in Corporate and Other.
We also evaluate segment and business unit performance based on EBITDA and/or EBITDA margin. EBITDA is defined as operating
contribution excluding equity in net income (loss) of affiliates and depreciation and amortization. We believe EBITDA to be a relevant
and useful measurement to our investors as it is part of our internal management reporting and planning processes and it is an important
metric that management uses to evaluate operating performance. EBITDA does not4
1
2
3
4
78
AT&T Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
give effect to depreciation and amortization expenses incurred in operating contribution nor is it burdened by cash used for debt service
requirements and thus does not reflect available funds for distributions, reinvestment or other discretionary uses. EBITDA margin is
EBITDA divided by total revenues.
The Communications segment provides wireless and wireline telecom, video and broadband services to consumers located in the U.S.
and businesses globally. Our business strategies reflect bundled product offerings that cut across product lines and utilize shared assets.
In December 2020, we changed our management strategy and reevaluated our domestic video business, allowing us to maximize value in
our domestic video business and further accelerate our ability to innovate and execute in our fast-growing broadband and fiber business.
In conjunction with the strategy change, we separated the former Entertainment Group into two business units, Video and Broadband,
which includes legacy telephony operations. We have recast our results for all prior periods to split the Entertainment Group into two
separate business units, Video and Broadband, and removed video operations from Business Wireline, combining all video operations in
the Video business unit. This segment contains the following business units:
•Mobility provides nationwide wireless service and equipment.
•Video provides video, including over-the-top (OTT) services and also sells multiplatform advertising services as video revenues.
•Broadband provides internet, including broadband fiber, and legacy telephony voice communication services to residential
customers.
•Business Wireline provides advanced IP-based services, as well as traditional voice and data services to business customers.
The WarnerMedia segment develops, produces and distributes feature films, television, gaming and other content in various physical
and digital formats globally. Historical financial results of Eliminations & Other included in the WarnerMedia segment have been recast
to include Xandr, previously a separate reportable segment, and to remove the Crunchyroll anime business that was classified as held-for-
sale. This segment contains the following:
•Turner primarily operates multichannel basic television networks and digital properties. Turner also sells advertising on its
networks and digital properties.
•Home Box Office consists of premium pay television and HBO Max domestically and premium pay, basic tier television
internationally, and content licensing and home entertainment.
•Warner Bros. primarily consists of the production, distribution and licensing of television programming and feature films, the
distribution of home entertainment products and the production and distribution of games.
•Eliminations & Other includes the Xandr advertising business, and also removes transactions between the Turner, Home Box
Office and Warner Bros. business units, including internal sales of content to the HBO Max platform that began in the fourth quarter
of 2019 (see Note 5).
The Latin America segment provides entertainment and wireless services outside of the U.S. This segment contains the following
business units:
•Vrio provides video services primarily to residential customers using satellite technology in Latin America and the Caribbean.
•Mexico provides wireless service and equipment to customers in Mexico.
Corporate and Other reconciles our segment results to consolidated operating income and income before income taxes, and includes:
•Corporate, which consists of: (1) businesses no longer integral to our operations or which we no longer actively market, (2)
corporate support functions, (3) impacts of corporate-wide decisions for which the individual operating segments are not being
evaluated, and (4) the reclassification of the amortization of prior service credits, which we continue to report with segment
operating expenses, to consolidated “Other income (expense) – net.”
•Acquisition-related items, which consists of items associated with the merger and integration of acquired businesses, including
amortization of intangible assets.
•Certain significant items, which includes (1) employee separation charges associated with voluntary and/or strategic offers, (2)
losses resulting from asset impairments and abandonments, and (3) other items for which the segments are not being evaluated.
•Eliminations and consolidations, which (1) removes transactions involving dealings between our segments, including channel
distribution between WarnerMedia and Communications, and (2) includes adjustments for our reporting of the advertising business.
“Interest expense” and “Other income (expense) – net” are managed only on a total company basis and are, accordingly, reflected only in
consolidated results.
79
AT&T Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
For the year ended December 31, 2020
RevenuesOperations 
 and Support 
 Expenses EBITDADepreciation
and
AmortizationOperating 
 Income
 (Loss)Equity in
Net 
 Income
(Loss) of 
 AffiliatesSegment 
 Contribution
Communications
Mobility $ 72,564 $ 42,106 $ 30,458 $ 8,086 $ 22,372 $ — $ 22,372 
Video 28,610 24,619 3,991 2,262 1,729 — 1,729 
Broadband 12,318 7,582 4,736 2,914 1,822 — 1,822 
Business Wireline 25,358 15,534 9,824 5,226 4,598 — 4,598 
Total Communications 138,850 89,841 49,009 18,488 30,521 — 30,521 
WarnerMedia
Turner 12,568 6,954 5,614 277 5,337 (2) 5,335 
Home Box Office 6,808 6,028 780 98 682 16 698 
Warner Bros. 12,154 9,917 2,237 169 2,068 (70) 1,998 
Eliminations and other (1,088) (1,320) 232 127 105 74 179 
Total WarnerMedia 30,442 21,579 8,863 671 8,192 18 8,210 
Latin America
Vrio 3,154 2,800 354 520 (166) 24 (142)
Mexico 2,562 2,636 (74) 513 (587) — (587)
Total Latin America 5,716 5,436 280 1,033 (753) 24 (729)
Segment Total 175,008 116,856 58,152 20,192 37,960 $ 42 $ 38,002 
Corporate and Other
Corporate 1,932 3,974 (2,042) 300 (2,342)
Acquisition-related items — 468 (468) 8,012 (8,480)
Certain significant items — 19,156 (19,156) 14 (19,170)
Eliminations and
consolidations (5,180) (3,615) (1,565) (2) (1,563)
AT&T Inc. $171,760 $136,839 $ 34,921 $ 28,516 $ 6,405 
Includes $ 2,442  for the reclassification of prior service credit amortization.1
1
80
AT&T Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
For the year ended December 31, 2019
RevenuesOperations 
 and Support 
 Expenses EBITDADepreciation 
 and 
 AmortizationOperating 
 Income
 (Loss)Equity in
Net 
 Income 
 (Loss) of 
 AffiliatesSegment 
 Contribution
Communications
Mobility $ 71,056 $ 40,681 $ 30,375 $ 8,054 $ 22,321 $ — $ 22,321 
Video 32,124 27,599 4,525 2,461 2,064 — 2,064 
Broadband 13,012 7,451 5,561 2,880 2,681 — 2,681 
Business Wireline 26,167 16,069 10,098 4,934 5,164 — 5,164 
Total Communications 142,359 91,800 50,559 18,329 32,230 — 32,230 
WarnerMedia
Turner 13,122 7,740 5,382 235 5,147 52 5,199 
Home Box Office 6,749 4,312 2,437 102 2,335 30 2,365 
Warner Bros. 14,358 11,816 2,542 162 2,380 (30) 2,350 
Eliminations and other 1,030 304 726 90 636 109 745 
Total WarnerMedia 35,259 24,172 11,087 589 10,498 161 10,659 
Latin America
Vrio 4,094 3,378 716 660 56 27 83 
Mexico 2,869 3,085 (216) 502 (718) — (718)
Total Latin America 6,963 6,463 500 1,162 (662) 27 (635)
Segment Total 184,581 122,435 62,146 20,080 42,066 $ 188 $ 42,254 
Corporate and Other
Corporate 1,937 3,279 (1,342) 636 (1,978)
Acquisition-related items (72) 960 (1,032) 7,460 (8,492)
Certain significant items — 2,082 (2,082) 43 (2,125)
Eliminations and
consolidations (5,253) (3,735) (1,518) (2) (1,516)
AT&T Inc. $181,193 $125,021 $ 56,172 $ 28,217 $ 27,955 
Includes $ 1,934  for the reclassification of prior service credit amortization.1
1
81
AT&T Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
For the year ended December 31, 2018
RevenuesOperations 
 and Support 
 Expenses EBITDADepreciation 
 and 
 AmortizationOperating 
 Income
 (Loss)Equity in
Net 
 Income 
 (Loss) of 
 AffiliatesSegment 
 Contribution
Communications
Mobility $ 70,521 $ 40,690 $ 29,831 $ 8,263 $ 21,568 $ — $ 21,568 
Video 33,363 29,334 4,029 2,698 1,331 — 1,331 
Broadband 13,108 7,116 5,992 2,623 3,369 — 3,369 
Business Wireline 26,729 16,181 10,548 4,708 5,840 — 5,840 
Total Communications 143,721 93,321 50,400 18,292 32,108 — 32,108 
WarnerMedia
Turner 6,979 3,794 3,185 131 3,054 54 3,108 
Home Box Office 3,598 2,187 1,411 56 1,355 29 1,384 
Warner Bros. 8,703 7,130 1,573 96 1,477 (28) 1,449 
Eliminations and other 1,305 168 1,137 28 1,109 (30) 1,079 
Total WarnerMedia 20,585 13,279 7,306 311 6,995 25 7,020 
Latin America
Vrio 4,784 3,743 1,041 728 313 34 347 
Mexico 2,868 3,415 (547) 510 (1,057) — (1,057)
Total Latin America 7,652 7,158 494 1,238 (744) 34 (710)
Segment Total 171,958 113,758 58,200 19,841 38,359 $ 59 $ 38,418 
Corporate and Other
Corporate 2,246 2,335 (89) 1,633 (1,722)
Acquisition-related items (49) 1,185 (1,234) 6,931 (8,165)
Certain significant items — 899 (899) 26 (925)
Eliminations and
consolidations (3,399) (1,947) (1,452) (1) (1,451)
AT&T Inc. $170,756 $116,230 $ 54,526 $ 28,430 $ 26,096 
Includes $ 1,753  for the reclassification of prior service credit amortization.1
1
82
AT&T Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
The following table is a reconciliation of operating income (loss) to “Income Before Income Taxes” reported in our consolidated
statements of income:
2020 2019 2018
Communications $ 30,521 $ 32,230 $ 32,108 
WarnerMedia 8,210 10,659 7,020 
Latin America (729) (635) (710)
Segment Contribution 38,002 42,254 38,418 
Reconciling Items:
Corporate and Other (2,342) (1,978) (1,722)
Merger and integration items (468) (1,032) (1,234)
Amortization of intangibles acquired (8,012) (7,460) (6,931)
Impairments and abandonments (18,880) (1,458) (46)
Gain on spectrum transaction 900 — — 
Employee separation charges and benefit-related (gain) loss (1,177) (624) (587)
Other noncash charges (credits), net (13) (43) (111)
Natural disaster items — — (181)
Segment equity in net income of affiliates (42) (188) (59)
Eliminations and consolidations (1,563) (1,516) (1,451)
AT&T Operating Income 6,405 27,955 26,096 
Interest Expense 7,925 8,422 7,957 
Equity in net income (loss) of affiliates 95 6 (48)
Other income (expense) - net (1,431) (1,071) 6,782 
Income (Loss) Before Income Taxes $ (2,856)$ 18,468 $ 24,873 
Included as a reduction of “Selling, general and administrative expenses” in the consolidated statements of income.
The following table sets forth revenues earned from customers, and property, plant and equipment located in different geographic areas:
2020 2019 2018
RevenuesNet Property,
Plant &
Equipment RevenuesNet Property,
Plant &
Equipment RevenuesNet Property, 
 Plant & 
 Equipment
United States $ 155,899 $ 121,208 $ 161,689 $ 122,567 $ 154,795 $ 123,457 
Europe 5,387 1,152 6,536 1,854 4,073 1,634 
Mexico 2,862 3,530 3,198 3,648 3,100 3,467 
Brazil 1,807 694 2,797 1,057 2,724 1,213 
All other Latin America 2,679 485 3,219 544 3,055 1,217 
Asia/Pacific Rim 2,322 203 2,793 390 2,214 408 
Other 804 43 961 68 795 77 
Total $ 171,760 $ 127,315 $ 181,193 $ 130,128 $ 170,756 $ 131,473 1
1 
83
AT&T Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
The following tables present intersegment revenues, assets, investments in equity affiliates and capital expenditures by segment:
Intersegment Reconciliation
2020 2019 2018
Intersegment revenues
Communications $ 11 $ 26 $ 13 
WarnerMedia 3,183 3,318 1,875 
Latin America — — — 
Total Intersegment Revenues 3,194 3,344 1,888 
Consolidations 1,986 1,909 1,511 
Eliminations and consolidations $ 5,180 $ 5,253 $ 3,399 
At or for the years ended December 31, 2020 2019
AssetsInvestments
in 
 Equity
Method 
 InvesteesCapital 
 Expenditures AssetsInvestments
in 
 Equity
Method
 InvesteesCapital 
 Expenditures
Communications $522,758 $ — $ 14,107 $ 521,252 $ — $ 17,410 
WarnerMedia 150,947 1,123 699 143,492 3,011 1,205 
Latin America 15,811 590 708 20,606 650 757 
Corporate and eliminations (163,755) 67 161 (133,681) 34 263 
Total $525,761 $ 1,780 $ 15,675 $ 551,669 $ 3,695 $ 19,635 
NOTE 5. REVENUE RECOGNITION
We report our revenues net of sales taxes and record certain regulatory fees, primarily Universal Service Fund (USF) fees, on a net basis.
No customer accounted for more than 10% of consolidated revenues in 2020, 2019 or 2018.
Wireless, Advanced Data, Legacy Voice & Data Services and Equipment Revenue
We offer service-only contracts and contracts that bundle equipment used to access the services and/or with other service offerings. Some
contracts have fixed terms and others are cancellable on a short-term basis (i.e., month-to-month arrangements).
Examples of service revenues include wireless, video entertainment (e.g., AT&T U-verse and DIRECTV), strategic services (e.g., virtual
private network service), and legacy voice and data (e.g., traditional local and long-distance). These services represent a series of distinct
services that is considered a separate performance obligation. Service revenue is recognized when services are provided, based upon
either usage (e.g., minutes of traffic/bytes of data processed) or period of time (e.g., monthly service fees).
Some of our services require customer premises equipment that, when combined and integrated with AT&T’s specific network
infrastructure, facilitates the delivery of service to the customer. In evaluating whether the equipment is a separate performance
obligation, we consider the customer’s ability to benefit from the equipment on its own or together with other readily available resources
and if so, whether the service and equipment are separately identifiable (i.e., is the service highly dependent on, or highly interrelated
with the equipment). When the equipment does not meet the criteria to be a separate performance obligation (e.g., equipment associated
with certain video services), we allocate the total transaction price to the related service. When equipment is a separate performance
obligation, we record the sale of equipment when title has passed and the products are accepted by the customer. For devices sold
through indirect channels (e.g., national dealers), revenue is recognized when the dealer accepts the device, not upon activation.
Our equipment and service revenues are predominantly recognized on a gross basis, as most of our services do not involve a third party
and we typically control the equipment that is sold to our customers.
84
AT&T Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
Revenue recognized from fixed term contracts that bundle services and/or equipment is allocated based on the stand-alone selling price
of all required performance obligations of the contract (i.e., each item included in the bundle). Promotional discounts are attributed to
each required component of the arrangement, resulting in recognition over the contract term. Stand-alone selling prices are determined
by assessing prices paid for service-only contracts (e.g., arrangements where customers bring their own devices) and stand-alone device
pricing.
We offer the majority of our customers the option to purchase certain wireless devices in installments over a specified period of time,
and, in many cases, they may be eligible to trade in the original equipment for a new device and have the remaining unpaid balance paid
or settled. For customers that elect these equipment installment payment programs, at the point of sale, we recognize revenue for the
entire amount of revenue allocated to the customer receivable net of fair value of the trade-in right guarantee. The difference between the
revenue recognized and the consideration received is recorded as a note receivable when the devices are not discounted and our right to
consideration is unconditional. When installment sales include promotional discounts (e.g., “buy one get one free”), the difference
between revenue recognized and consideration received is recorded as a contract asset to be amortized over the contract term.
Less commonly, we offer certain customers highly discounted devices when they enter into a minimum service agreement term. For
these contracts, we recognize equipment revenue at the point of sale based on a stand-alone selling price allocation. The difference
between the revenue recognized and the cash received is recorded as a contract asset that will amortize over the contract term.
Our contracts allow for customers to frequently modify their arrangement, without incurring penalties in many cases. When a contract is
modified, we evaluate the change in scope or price of the contract to determine if the modification should be treated as a new contract or
if it should be considered a change of the existing contract. We generally do not have significant impacts from contract modifications.
Revenues from transactions between us and our customers are recorded net of revenue-based regulatory fees and taxes. Cash incentives
given to customers are recorded as a reduction of revenue. Nonrefundable, upfront service activation and setup fees associated with
service arrangements are deferred and recognized over the associated service contract period or customer relationship life.
Subscription Revenue
Subscription revenues from cable networks and premium pay and basic-tier television services are recognized over the license period as
programming is provided to affiliates or digital distributors based on negotiated contractual programming rates. When a distribution
contract with an affiliate has expired and a new distribution contract has not been executed, revenues are based on estimated rates, giving
consideration to factors including the previous contractual rates, inflation, current payments by the affiliate and the status of the
negotiations on a new contract. When the new distribution contract terms are finalized, an adjustment to revenue is recorded, if
necessary, to reflect the new terms.
Subscription revenues from end-user subscribers are recognized when services are provided, based upon either usage or period of time.
Subscription revenues from streaming services are recognized as programming services are provided to customers.
Content Revenue
Feature films typically are produced or acquired for initial exhibition in theaters, followed by distribution, generally commencing within
three years of such initial exhibition. Revenues from film rentals by theaters are recognized as the films are exhibited.
Television programs and series are initially produced for broadcast and may be subsequently licensed or sold in physical format and/or
electronic delivery. Revenues from the distribution of television programming through broadcast networks, cable networks, first-run
syndication and streaming services are recognized when the programs or series are available to the licensee. In certain circumstances,
pursuant to the terms of the applicable contractual arrangements, the availability dates granted to customers may precede the date in
which the customer can be billed for these sales.
Revenues from sales of feature films and television programming in physical format are recognized at the later of the delivery date or the
date when made widely available for sale or rental by retailers based on gross sales less a provision for estimated returns, rebates and
pricing allowances. Revenues from the licensing of television programs and series for electronic sell-through or video-on-demand are
recognized when the product has been purchased by and made available to the consumer to either download or stream.
85
AT&T Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
Upfront or guaranteed payments for the licensing of intellectual property are recognized as revenue at either the inception of the license
term if the intellectual property has significant standalone functionality or over the corresponding license term if the licensee’s ability to
derive utility is dependent on our continued support of the intellectual property throughout the license term.
Revenues from the sales of console games are recognized at the later of the delivery date or the date that the product is made widely
available for sale or rental by retailers based on gross sales less a provision for estimated returns, rebates and pricing allowances.
Advertising Revenue
Advertising revenues are recognized, net of agency commissions, in the period that the advertisements are aired. If there is a targeted
audience guarantee, revenues are recognized for the actual audience delivery and revenues are deferred for any shortfall until the
guaranteed audience delivery is met, typically by providing additional advertisements. Advertising revenues from digital properties are
recognized as impressions are delivered or the services are performed.
86
AT&T Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
Revenue Categories
The following tables set forth reported revenue by category and by business unit. Intercompany transactions between segments and the
dual reporting of certain advertising revenues are included in “Eliminations and consolidations.”Intercompany transactions between
Turner, Home Box Office and Warner Bros., including internal sales to HBO Max that began in the fourth quarter of 2019, are included
in “Eliminations and Other.”
For the year ended December 31, 2020
Service Revenues
WirelessAdvanced
DataLegacy
Voice &
Data SubscriptionContentAdvertising Other Equipment Total
Communications
Mobility $55,251 $ — $ — $ — $ — $ 291 $ — $17,022 $72,564 
Video — — — 26,747 — 1,718 — 145 28,610 
Broadband — 8,534 2,213 — — — 1,564 7 12,318 
Business Wireline — 13,330 8,183 — — — 3,075 770 25,358 
WarnerMedia
Turner — — — 7,613 759 3,941 255 — 12,568 
Home Box Office — — — 6,090 692 — 26 — 6,808 
Warner Bros. — — — 50 11,632 6 466 — 12,154 
Eliminations and
Other — — — 12 (3,264) 2,178 (14) — (1,088)
Latin America
Vrio — — — 3,154 — — — — 3,154 
Mexico 1,656 — — — — — — 906 2,562 
Corporate and Other 528 46 554 — — — 661 143 1,932 
Eliminations and
   consolidations — — — (3,110) — (1,718) (352) — (5,180)
Total Operating
Revenues $57,435 $21,910 $10,950 $ 40,556 $9,819 $ 6,416 $5,681 $18,993 $171,760 
Eliminations and other of $ 3,264  include W arner Bros. content sales of approximately $ 2,250  with HBO Max, $ 600 with HBO linear and $ 300 with
Turner .
Eliminations and consolidations of $ 3,110 include approximately $ 1,500  and $ 950 of T urner and HBO linear channel distribution arrangements with
the V ideo business unit, respectively . HBO customer subscriptions were approximately $ 290 with V ideo and $ 180 with Broadband.1
2
1
2
87
AT&T Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
For the year ended December 31, 2019
Service Revenues
WirelessAdvanced
 DataLegacy
Voice &
Data SubscriptionContentAdvertising Other Equipment Total
Communications
Mobility $55,039 $ — $ — $ — $ — $ 292 $ — $15,725 $71,056 
Video — — — 30,451 — 1,672 — 1 32,124 
Broadband — 8,403 2,573 — — — 2,029 7 13,012 
Business Wireline — 12,916 9,180 — — — 3,286 785 26,167 
WarnerMedia
Turner — — — 7,736 481 4,566 339 — 13,122 
Home Box Office — — — 5,814 925 — 10 — 6,749 
Warner Bros. — — — 88 13,532 41 697 — 14,358 
Eliminations and
Other — — — 13 (1,058) 2,071 4 — 1,030 
Latin America
Vrio — — — 4,094 — — — — 4,094 
Mexico 1,863 — — — — — — 1,006 2,869 
Corporate and Other 628 59 565 — — — 443 170 1,865 
Eliminations and
   consolidations — — — (3,249) — (1,672) (332) — (5,253)
Total Operating
Revenues $57,530 $21,378 $12,318 $ 44,947 $13,880 $ 6,970 $6,476 $17,694 $181,193 
Eliminations and other of $ 1,058  include W arner Bros. content sales of approximately $ 500 with HBO linear and $ 350 with T urner .
Eliminations and consolidations of $ 3,249  include approximately $ 1,740  and $ 1,320  of T urner and HBO linear channel distribution arrangements
with the V ideo business unit, respectively .1
2
1
2
88
AT&T Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
For the year ended December 31, 2018
Service Revenues
WirelessAdvanced
DataLegacy
Voice &
Data SubscriptionContentAdvertising Other Equipment Total
Communications
Mobility $54,063 $ — $ — $ — $ — $ 232 $ — $16,226 $70,521 
Video — — — 31,768 — 1,595 — — 33,363 
Broadband — 7,956 3,042 — — — 2,101 9 13,108 
Business Wireline — 12,234 10,674 — — — 2,998 823 26,729 
WarnerMedia
Turner — — — 4,207 295 2,330 147 — 6,979 
Home Box Office — — — 3,201 391 — 6 — 3,598 
Warner Bros. — — — 47 8,216 53 387 — 8,703 
Eliminations and
Other — — — 6 (518) 1,807 10 — 1,305 
Latin America
Vrio — — — 4,784 — — — — 4,784 
Mexico 1,701 — — — — — — 1,167 2,868 
Corporate and Other 718 160 288 — — — 845 186 2,197 
Eliminations and
   consolidations — — — (1,843) — (1,595) 39 — (3,399)
Total Operating
Revenues $56,482 $20,350 $14,004 $ 42,170 $8,384 $ 4,422 $6,533 $18,411 $170,756 
Eliminations and other of $ 518 include W arner Bros. content sales of approximately $ 225 with HBO linear and $ 225 with T urner .
Eliminations and consolidations of $ 1,843  include approximately $ 1,000  and $ 700 of T urner and HBO linear channel distribution arrangements with
the V ideo business unit, respectively .1
2
1
2
89
AT&T Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
Deferred Customer Contract Acquisition and Fulfillment Costs
Costs to acquire and fulfill customer contracts, including commissions on service activations, for our wireless, business wireline and
video services, are deferred and amortized over the contract period or expected customer relationship life, which typically ranges from
three years to five years. For contracts with an estimated amortization period of less than one year, we expense incremental costs
immediately.
The following table presents the deferred customer contract acquisition and fulfillment costs included on our consolidated balance sheets
at December 31:
Consolidated Balance Sheets 2020 2019
Deferred Acquisition Costs
Other current assets $ 3,087 $ 2,462 
Other Assets 3,198 2,991 
Total deferred customer contract acquisition costs $ 6,285 $ 5,453 
Deferred Fulfillment Costs
Other current assets $ 4,118 $ 4,519 
Other Assets 5,634 6,439 
Total deferred customer contract fulfillment costs $ 9,752 $ 10,958 
The following table presents amortization of deferred customer contract acquisition and fulfillment costs, which are recorded in other
cost of revenues in our consolidated statements of income, for the year ended December 31:
Consolidated Statements of Income 2020 2019
Deferred acquisition cost amortization $ 2,755 $ 2,174 
Deferred fulfillment cost amortization 5,110 4,947 
Contract Assets and Liabilities
A contract asset is recorded when revenue is recognized in advance of our right to bill and receive consideration. The contract asset will
decrease as services are provided and billed. For example, when equipment installment sales include promotional discounts (e.g., “buy
one get one free”) the difference between revenue recognized and consideration received is recorded as a contract asset to be amortized
over the contract term.
When consideration is received in advance of the delivery of goods or services, a contract liability is recorded for deferred revenue.
Reductions in the contract liability will be recorded as revenue as we satisfy the performance obligations.
The following table presents contract assets and liabilities on our consolidated balance sheets at December 31:
Consolidated Balance Sheets 2020 2019
Contract assets $ 3,501 $ 2,472 
Contract liabilities 6,879 6,999 
Our beginning of period contract liabilities recorded as customer contract revenue during 2020 was $5,579.
Our consolidated balance sheets at December 31, 2020 and 2019 included approximately $2,054 and $1,611, respectively, for the current
portion of our contract assets in “Other current assets” and $6,071 and $5,939, respectively, for the current portion of our contract
liabilities in “Advanced billings and customer deposits.”
Remaining Performance Obligations
Remaining performance obligations represent services we are required to provide to customers under bundled or discounted
arrangements, which are satisfied as services are provided over the contract term. In determining the transaction price allocated, we do
not include nonrecurring charges and estimates for usage, nor do we consider arrangements with an original expected duration of less
than one year, which are primarily prepaid wireless, video and residential internet agreements.
90
AT&T Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
Remaining performance obligations associated with business contracts reflect recurring charges billed, adjusted to reflect estimates for
sales incentives and revenue adjustments. Performance obligations associated with wireless contracts are estimated using a portfolio
approach in which we review all relevant promotional activities, calculating the remaining performance obligation using the average
service component for the portfolio and the average device price.
As of December 31, 2020, the aggregate amount of the transaction price allocated to remaining performance obligations was $42,072, of
which we expect to recognize approximately 60% by the end of 2021, with the remaining balance recognized thereafter.
NOTE 6. ACQUISITIONS, DISPOSITIONS AND OTHER ADJUSTMENTS
Acquisitions
HBO Latin America Group (HBO LAG) In May 2020, we acquired the remaining interest in HBO LAG for $141, net of cash
acquired. At acquisition, we remeasured the fair value of the total business, which exceeded the carrying amount of our equity method
investment and resulted in a pre-tax gain of $68. We consolidated that business upon close and recorded those assets at fair value,
including $640 of trade names, $271 of distribution networks and $346 of goodwill that is reported in the WarnerMedia segment. These
estimates are preliminary in nature and subject to adjustments, which will be finalized within one year from the date of acquisition.
Time Warner In June 2018, we completed our acquisition of Time Warner, a leader in media and entertainment whose major businesses
encompass an array of some of the most respected media brands. For accounting purposes, the transaction was valued at $79,358. Our
consolidated balance sheets include the assets and liabilities of Time Warner, which were measured at fair value.
For the 200-day period ended December 31, 2018, our consolidated statement of income included $18,209 of revenues and $1,400 of
operating income, which included $3,296 of intangible amortization, from Time Warner and its affiliates. The following unaudited pro
forma consolidated results of operations assume that the acquisition of Time Warner was completed as of January 1, 2017.
(Unaudited) 
Year Ended 
 December 31,
2018 2017
Total operating revenues $ 183,651 $ 188,769 
Net Income Attributable to AT&T 20,814 31,380 
Basic Earnings Per Share Attributable to Common Stock $ 2.86 $ 4.30 
Diluted Earnings Per Share Attributable to Common Stock $ 2.85 $ 4.26 
Pro forma data may not be indicative of the results that would have been obtained had these events occurred at the beginning of the
periods presented, nor is it intended to be a projection of future results.
Otter Media On August 7, 2018, we acquired the remaining interest in Otter Media Holdings (Otter Media) for $157 in cash and the
conversion to equity of the $1,480 advance made in the first quarter of 2018. At acquisition, we remeasured the fair value of the total
business, which exceeded the carrying amount of our equity method investment and resulted in a pre-tax gain of $395. We consolidated
that business upon close and recorded those assets at fair value, including $1,239 of goodwill that is reported in the WarnerMedia
segment.
AppNexus On August 15, 2018, we purchased AppNexus for $1,432 and recorded $1,220 of goodwill that is reported in the
WarnerMedia segment. Our investment allows us to create a marketplace for TV and digital video advertising.
91
AT&T Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
Spectrum Auctions In June 2020, we completed the acquisition of $2,379 of 37/39 GHz spectrum in a Federal Communications
Commission (FCC) auction. Prior to the auction, we exchanged the 39 GHz licenses with a book value of approximately $300 that were
previously acquired through FiberTower Corporation for vouchers to be applied against the winning bids and recorded a $900 gain in the
first quarter of 2020. These vouchers yielded a value of approximately $1,200, which was applied toward our gross bids. In the second
quarter of 2020, we made the final cash payment of $949, bringing the total cash payment to $1,186.
In December 2019, we acquired $982 of 24 GHz spectrum in an FCC auction.
Dispositions
Central European Media Enterprises Ltd. (CME) On October 13, 2020, we completed the sale of our 65.3% interest in CME, a
European broadcasting company, for approximately $1,100 and recorded a pre-tax gain of $39. Upon close, we received relief from a
debt guarantee originally covering approximately $1,100 that was reduced to $600 at the time of the sale.
Operations in Puerto Rico On October 31, 2020, we completed the sale of our previously held-for-sale wireless and wireline operations
in Puerto Rico and the U.S. Virgin Islands for approximately $1,950 and recorded a pre-tax loss of $82. Upon sale we removed held-for-
sale assets (“Other current assets”) and held-for-sale liabilities (“Accounts payable and accrued liabilities”) that primarily consisted of
FCC licenses (approximately $1,100), allocated goodwill (approximately $250), net property, plant and equipment (approximately $850)
and net tax liabilities (approximately $500), previously reported on our consolidated balance sheets. The proceeds were used to redeem
$1,950 of cumulative preferred interests in a subsidiary that held notes secured by the proceeds of this sale.
Hudson Yards In June 2019, we sold our ownership in Hudson Yards North Tower Holdings LLC under a sale-leaseback arrangement
for cash proceeds of $2,081 and recorded a loss of approximately $100 resulting from transaction costs (primarily real estate transfer
taxes).
Hulu In April 2019, we sold our ownership in Hulu for cash proceeds of $1,430 and recorded a pre-tax gain of $740.
Data Colocation Operations On December 31, 2018, we sold certain data centers to Brookfield Infrastructure Partners for $1,100 and
recorded a pre-tax gain of $432. The sale included assets; primarily consisting of property, plant and equipment, of $298; and goodwill of
$215.
NOTE 7. PROPERTY, PLANT AND EQUIPMENT
Property, plant and equipment is summarized as follows at December 31:
Lives (years) 2020 2019
Land - $ 2,571 $ 2,651 
Buildings and improvements 2-44 39,418 38,924 
Central office equipment 3-10 95,981 96,061 
Cable, wiring and conduit 15-50 75,409 72,042 
Satellites 14-17 908 2,489 
Other equipment 3-20 90,883 94,951 
Software 3-7 18,482 22,244 
Under construction - 4,099 4,176 
327,751 333,538 
Accumulated depreciation and amortization 200,436 203,410 
Property, plant and equipment - net $ 127,315 $ 130,128 
Includes certain network software.
Our depreciation expense was $20,277 in 2020, $20,285 in 2019 and $20,083 in 2018. Depreciation expense included amortization of
software totaling $3,483 in 2020, $3,313 in 2019 and $3,092 in 2018.1
1
92
AT&T Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
In December 2020, we reassessed our grouping of long-lived assets and identified certain impairment indicators, requiring us to evaluate
the recoverability of the long-lived assets of our video business. Based on this evaluation, we determined that these assets were not fully
recoverable and recognized pre-tax impairment charges totaling $7,255, of which $1,681 relates to property, plant and equipment,
including satellites. The reduced carrying amounts of the impaired assets became their new cost basis.
In 2019, we recorded a noncash pre-tax charge of $1,290 to abandon copper assets that we no longer expect will be utilized to support
future network activity. The abandonment was considered outside the ordinary course of business.
NOTE 8. LEASES
We have operating and finance leases for certain facilities and equipment used in our operations. Our leases generally have remaining
lease terms of up to 15 years. Some of our real estate operating leases contain renewal options that may be exercised, and some of our
leases include options to terminate the leases within one year.
We have recognized a right-of-use asset for both operating and finance leases, and a corresponding lease liability that represents the
present value of our obligation to make payments over the lease term. The present value of the lease payments is calculated using the
incremental borrowing rate for operating and finance leases, which was determined using a portfolio approach based on the rate of
interest that we would have to pay to borrow an amount equal to the lease payments on a collateralized basis over a similar term. We use
the unsecured borrowing rate and risk-adjust that rate to approximate a collateralized rate in the currency of the lease, which will be
updated on a quarterly basis for measurement of new lease liabilities.
The components of lease expense were as follows:
2020 2019
Operating lease cost $ 5,896 $ 5,684 
Finance lease cost:
Amortization of right-of-use assets $ 287 $ 271 
Interest on lease obligation 156 169 
Total finance lease cost $ 443 $ 440 
The following table provides supplemental cash flows information related to leases:
2020 2019
Cash Flows from Operating Activities
Cash paid for amounts included in lease obligations:
Operating cash flows from operating leases $ 4,852 $ 4,583 
Supplemental Lease Cash Flow Disclosures
Operating lease right-of-use assets obtained in exchange for new operating lease obligations $ 5,270 $ 7,818 
93
AT&T Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
The following tables set forth supplemental balance sheet information related to leases at December 31:
2020 2019
Operating Leases
Operating lease right-of-use assets $ 24,714$ 24,039
Accounts payable and accrued liabilities $ 3,537 3,451
Operating lease obligation 22,202 21,804
Total operating lease obligation $ 25,739$ 25,255
Finance Leases
Property, plant and equipment, at cost $ 3,586$ 3,534
Accumulated depreciation and amortization (1,361) (1,296)
Property, plant and equipment, net $ 2,225$ 2,238
Current portion of long-term debt $ 189$ 162
Long-term debt 1,847 1,872
Total finance lease obligation $ 2,036$ 2,034
2020 2019
Weighted-Average Remaining Lease Term (years)
Operating leases 8.5 8.4
Finance leases 9.9 10.3
Weighted-Average Discount Rate
Operating leases 4.1 % 4.2  %
Finance leases 8.1 % 8.4  %
The following table provides the expected future minimum maturities of lease obligations:
Operating
LeasesFinance 
 Leases
2021 $ 4,808 $ 350 
2022 4,527 333 
2023 4,094 300 
2024 3,560 276 
2025 2,904 272 
Thereafter 11,230 1,609 
Total lease payments 31,123 3,140 
Less: imputed interest (5,384) (1,104)
Total $ 25,739 $ 2,036 
94
AT&T Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
NOTE 9. GOODWILL AND OTHER INTANGIBLE ASSETS
We test goodwill for impairment at a reporting unit level, which is deemed to be our principal operating segments or one level below.
With our annual impairment testing as of October 1, 2020, the calculated fair values of the reporting units exceeded their book values in
all circumstances; however, the Turner, HBO and Entertainment Group (prior to the reporting unit change) fair values exceeded their
book values by less than 10%, with COVID-19 impacts, industry trends and our content distribution strategy affecting fair value.
In December 2020, we changed our management strategy and reevaluated our domestic video business, allowing us to maximize value in
our domestic video business and further accelerate our ability to innovate and execute in our fast-growing broadband and fiber business.
The strategy change required us to reassess the grouping and recoverability of the video business long-lived assets. In conjunction with
the strategy change, we separated the former Entertainment Group reporting unit into two reporting units, Video and Broadband, which
includes legacy telephony operations. Our recoverability assessment resulted in $7,255 of long-lived asset impairment in the video
business, including $4,373 for orbital slots and $1,201 for customer lists. The change in reporting unit required the historical
Entertainment Group goodwill to be assigned to the separate Video and Broadband reporting units, for which we used the relative fair
value allocation methodology. The affected reporting units were then tested for goodwill impairment. We recorded an impairment of the
entire $8,253 of goodwill allocated to the Video reporting unit. No goodwill impairment was required in the Broadband reporting unit.
In the second quarter of 2020, driven by significant and adverse economic and political environments in Latin America, including the
impact of COVID-19, we experienced accelerated subscriber losses and revenue decline in the region, as well as closure of our
operations in Venezuela. When combining these business trends and higher weighted-average cost of capital resulting from the increase
in country-risk premiums in the region, we concluded that it was more likely than not that the fair value of the Vrio reporting unit,
estimated using discounted cash flow and market multiple approaches, was less than its carrying amount. We recorded a $2,212 goodwill
impairment in the Vrio reporting unit, with $105 attributable to noncontrolling interest.
Other changes to our goodwill in 2020 resulted from foreign currency translation, the held-for-sale treatment of our Crunchyroll anime
business and our acquisition of the remaining interest in HBO LAG (see Note 6). In 2020, the prior Xandr segment was combined with
our WarnerMedia segment.
Changes to our goodwill in 2019 primarily resulted from the held-for-sale treatment of wireless and wireline operations in Puerto Rico
and the U.S. Virgin Islands (see Note 6) and final valuations related to our acquisitions of Time Warner and Otter Media, as well as
changes from foreign currency translation.
At December 31, 2020, our Communications segment has four reporting units: Mobility, Video, Broadband and Business Wireline. Our
WarnerMedia segment has four reporting units: Turner, Home Box Office, Warner Bros. and Xandr. Our Latin America segment has two
reporting units: Vrio and Mexico.
95
AT&T Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
The following table sets forth the changes in the carrying amounts of goodwill by operating segment:
2020 2019
Balance
at
 Jan. 1 AcquisitionsImpairmentsDispositions,
currency 
 exchange 
 and otherBalance
at
 Dec. 31Balance
at
 Jan. 1 AcquisitionsDispositions,
currency 
 exchange 
 and otherBalance
at
 Dec. 31
Communications$100,234 $ — $ (8,253)$ (5)$91,976 $100,551 $ — $ (317)$100,234 
WarnerMedia 42,345 415 — (313) 42,447 42,101 66 178 42,345 
Latin America 3,662 — (2,212) (614) 836 3,718 — (56) 3,662 
Total $146,241 $ 415 $ (10,465)$ (932)$135,259 $146,370 $ 66 $ (195)$146,241 
We review amortized intangible assets for impairment whenever events or circumstances indicate that the carrying amount may not be
recoverable over the remaining life of the asset or asset group, including the video business previously discussed. In 2020, we changed
the estimated lives of our orbital slot licenses from indefinite to finite-lived and began amortizing them over their average remaining
economic life of 15 years (see Note 1).
96
AT&T Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
Our other intangible assets at December 31 are summarized as follows:
2020 2019
Other Intangible AssetsWeighted-
Average LifeGross
Carrying 
 AmountAccumulated
AmortizationCurrency 
 Translation 
 AdjustmentGross
Carrying 
 AmountAccumulated
AmortizationCurrency 
 Translation 
 Adjustment
Amortized intangible assets:
Wireless licenses 24.6 years$ 2,979 $ 271 $ (421)$ 2,981 $ 156 $ (243)
Orbital slots 15.0 years 5,825 — — — — — 
Trademarks and trade names 37.1 years 20,016 1,518 (442) 18,359 853 (6)
Distribution network 10.0 years 18,414 4,621 — 18,138 2,793 — 
Released television and film
content17.5 years 10,940 
6,240 — 10,941 4,974 — 
Customer lists and
relationships9.3 years 4,100 
1,645 (460) 20,304 14,773 (281)
Other 21.3 years 11,311 2,615 (5) 11,427 1,843 (3)
Total 22.3 years$ 73,585 $ 16,910 $ (1,328)$ 82,150 $ 25,392 $ (533)
 Includes $ 1,561  of wireless license renewals in Mexico in 2019.
 Changed from indefinite-lived January 1, 2020.
Indefinite-lived intangible assets not subject to amortization, net of currency translation adjustment:
Licenses:
Wireless licenses $ 85,728 $ 83,623 
Orbital slots — 11,702 
Trade names 5,241 6,067 
Total $ 90,969 $ 101,392 
Changed to amortized January 1, 2020.
Amortized intangible assets are definite-life assets, and, as such, we record amortization expense based on a method that most
appropriately reflects our expected cash flows from these assets. Amortization expense for definite-life intangible assets was $8,239 for
the year ended December 31, 2020, $7,932 for the year ended December 31, 2019 and $8,347 for the year ended December 31, 2018.
Amortization expense is estimated to be $5,987 in 2021, $5,363 in 2022, $4,846 in 2023, $4,302 in 2024 and $4,046 in 2025.1
2
1
2
1
1 
97
AT&T Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
NOTE 10. EQUITY METHOD INVESTMENTS
Investments in partnerships, joint ventures and less than majority-owned subsidiaries in which we have significant influence are
accounted for under the equity method.
In May 2020, we acquired the remaining interest in HBO LAG and fully consolidated that entity. In October 2020, we sold our
ownership interest in CME. (See Note 6)
In 2019, we sold our investments in Hudson Yards and Hulu. (See Note 6)
In 2018, we acquired Time Warner, which included various equity method investments. The difference between the fair values and the
proportional carrying amounts of those investments’ net assets primarily related to investments in CME (sold in 2020) and HBO LAG
(consolidated in 2020). (See Note 6)
Our investments in equity affiliates at December 31, 2020 primarily include our interests in SKY Mexico and The CW Network.
SKY Mexico We hold a 41.3% interest in SKY Mexico, which is a leading pay-TV provider in Mexico.
The CW Network (The CW) We hold a 50.0% interest in The CW, which is an advertising supported broadcasting and licensing joint
venture between Warner Bros. and CBS Corporation.
The following table is a reconciliation of our investments in equity affiliates as presented on our consolidated balance sheets:
2020 2019
Beginning of year $ 3,695 $ 6,245 
Additional investments 178 448 
Acquisition of remaining interest in HBO LAG (1,141) — 
Disposition of CME (749) — 
Disposition of Hudson Yards — (1,681)
Disposition of Hulu — (689)
Disposition of Game Show Network — (288)
Equity in net income (loss) of affiliates 95 6 
Dividends and distributions received (133) (301)
Currency translation adjustments (10) (10)
Impairments (146) — 
Other adjustments (9) (35)
End of year $ 1,780 $ 3,695 
NOTE 11. INVENTORIES AND THEATRICAL FILM AND TELEVISION PRODUCTION COSTS
Film and television production costs are stated at the lower of cost, less accumulated amortization, or fair value and include the
unamortized cost of completed theatrical films and television episodes, theatrical films and television series in production and
undeveloped film and television rights. The amount of capitalized film and television production costs recognized as broadcast,
programming and operations expenses for a given period is determined using the film forecast computation method. As of January 1,
2019, we reclassified $2,274 of our programming inventory costs from “Other current assets” to “Other Assets” in connection with the
adoption of ASU 2019-2 (see Note 1).
In the fourth quarter of 2020, we recognized an impairment of $524 based on a change in these estimates for various film titles. This
change in estimates was driven by the continued shutdown of theaters during the pandemic, including the resurgence of an outbreak in
the fourth quarter and the impact of our decision to release our 2021 movies in theaters and on HBO Max at the same time.
98
AT&T Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
The following table summarizes inventories and theatrical film and television production costs as of December 31:
2020 2019
Inventories:
Programming costs, less amortization $ 6,010 $ 4,151 
Other inventory, primarily DVD and Blu-ray Discs 103 96 
Total inventories 6,113 4,247 
Less: current portion of inventory (103) (96)
Total noncurrent inventories 6,010 4,151 
Theatrical film production costs:
Released, less amortization 487 392 
Completed and not released 616 437 
In production 1,130 1,475 
Development and pre-production 190 171 
Television production costs:
Released, less amortization 2,495 2,199 
Completed and not released 1,381 1,344 
In production 2,353 2,208 
Development and pre-production 90 57 
Total theatrical film and television production costs 8,742 8,283 
Total noncurrent inventories and theatrical film and television production costs $ 14,752 $ 12,434 
Includes the costs of certain programming rights, primarily sports, for which payments have been made prior to the related rights being received.
Does not include $ 4,699  and $ 5,967  of acquired film and television library intangible assets as of December 31, 2020, and 2019, respectively , which
are included in “Other Intangible Assets – Net” on our consolidated balance sheets.
Approximately 90% of unamortized film costs for released theatrical and television content are expected to be amortized within three
years from December 31, 2020. In addition, approximately $3,111 of the total $5,171 film costs of released and completed and not
released theatrical and television product are expected to be amortized during 2021.
NOTE 12. DEBT
Long-term debt of AT&T and its subsidiaries, including interest rates and maturities, is summarized as follows at December 31:
2020 2019
Notes and debentures
Interest Rates Maturities
0.98% -2.99% 2020 - 2039 $ 25,549 $ 17,404 
3.00% -4.99% 2020 - 2050 110,317 102,595 
5.00% -6.99% 2020 - 2095 24,259 34,513 
7.00% -9.15% 2020 - 2097 5,006 5,050 
Credit agreement borrowings 300 4,969 
Fair value of interest rate swaps recorded in debt 20 26 
165,451 164,557 
Unamortized (discount) premium - net (9,710) (2,996)
Unamortized issuance costs (532) (452)
Total notes and debentures 155,209 161,109 
Finance lease obligations 2,036 2,034 
Total long-term debt, including current maturities 157,245 163,143 
Current maturities of long-term debt (3,470) (11,834)
Total long-term debt $ 153,775 $ 151,309 
Maturities assume putable debt is redeemed by the holders at the next opportunity .1
2
2
1
2
1
1
99
AT&T Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
We had outstanding Euro, British pound sterling, Canadian dollar, Mexican peso, Australian dollar, Swiss franc and Brazilian real
denominated debt of approximately $43,399 and $42,485 at December 31, 2020 and 2019, respectively.
The weighted-average interest rate of our entire long-term debt portfolio, including the impact of derivatives, was approximately 4.1% as
of December 31, 2020 and 4.4% as of December 31, 2019.
Current maturities of long-term debt include an accreting zero-coupon note that may be redeemed each May, until maturity in 2022. If
the zero-coupon note (issued for principal of $500 in 2007 and partially exchanged in the 2017 debt exchange offers) is held to maturity,
the redemption amount will be $592.
Debt maturing within one year consisted of the following at December 31:
2020 2019
Current maturities of long-term debt $ 3,470 $ 11,834 
Bank borrowings — 4 
Total $ 3,470 $ 11,838 
Outstanding balance of short-term credit facility of a foreign subsidiary .
Financing Activities
During 2020, we received net proceeds of $31,988 on the issuance of $32,241 in long-term debt in various markets, with an average
weighted maturity of approximately 20 years and a weighted average interest rate of 3.2%. We repaid $39,758 in borrowings of various
notes with a weighted average coupon of 3.2%.
Tender Offers and Debt Exchanges
In August 2020, we repurchased $11,384 of AT&T global notes and subsidiary notes due 2021 to 2025 through cash tender offers.
In September 2020, we exchanged $17,677 of AT&T and subsidiary notes, with interest rates ranging from 4.350% to 8.750% and
original maturities ranging from 2031 to 2058 for $1,459 of cash and $21,500 of three new series of AT&T Inc. global notes, with
interest rates ranging from 3.500% to 3.650% and maturities ranging from 2053 to 2059.
In December 2020, we also exchanged $8,280 of AT&T and subsidiary notes, with interest rates ranging from 2.950% to 7.125% and
original maturities ranging from 2026 to 2048 for $8 of cash and $9,678 of two new series of AT&T global notes, with interest rates of
2.550% and 3.800% and maturities of 2033 and 2057, respectively.
As of December 31, 2020 and 2019, we were in compliance with all covenants and conditions of instruments governing our debt.
Substantially all of our outstanding long-term debt is unsecured. Maturities of outstanding long-term notes and debentures, as of
December 31, 2020, and the corresponding weighted-average interest rate scheduled for repayment are as follows:
2021 2022 2023 2024 2025 Thereafter
Debt repayments $ 3,418 $ 5,951 $ 7,779 $ 7,849 $ 6,389 $134,268 
Weighted-average interest rate 3.8 % 3.3 % 3.4 % 3.3 % 3.9 % 4.2 %
Debt repayments represent maturity value and assume putable debt is redeemed at the next opportunity . Foreign debt includes the impact from
hedges, when applicable.
Credit Facilities
General
In September 2019, we entered into and drew on a $1,300 term loan credit agreement containing (i) a 1.25 year $400 facility due in 2020,
(ii) a 2.25 year $400 facility due in 2021, and (iii) a 3.25 year $500 facility due in 2022, with Bank of America, N.A., as agent. These
facilities were repaid and terminated in the second quarter of 2020.
In April 2020, we entered into and drew on a $5,500 Term Loan Credit Agreement (Term Loan) with 11 commercial banks and Bank of
America, N.A. as lead agent. We repaid and terminated the Term Loan in May 2020.1
1
1
1
100
AT&T Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
On January 29, 2021, we entered into a $14,700 Term Loan Credit Agreement (Term Loan), with Bank of America, N.A., as agent. The
Term Loan is available for a single draw at any time before May 29, 2021. The proceeds will be used for general corporate purposes,
which may include among other things, financing acquisitions of additional spectrum. The entire principal amount of the Term Loan will
be due and payable 364 days after the date on which the borrowing is made. At January 31, 2021, we had approximately $6,100 of
commercial paper outstanding.
Revolving Credit Agreements
In November 2020, we amended one of our $7,500 revolving credit agreements by extending the termination date. In total, we have two
$7,500 revolving credit agreements, totaling $15,000, with one terminating on December 11, 2023 and the other terminating on
November 17, 2025. No amounts were outstanding under either agreement as of December 31, 2020.
Each of the credit agreements contains covenants that are customary for an issuer with an investment grade senior debt credit rating, as
well as a net debt-to-EBITDA (earnings before interest, taxes, depreciation and amortization, and other modifications described in each
agreement) financial ratio covenant requiring AT&T to maintain, as of the last day of each fiscal quarter, a ratio of not more than 3.5-to-
1. The events of default are customary for agreements of this type and such events would result in the acceleration of, or would permit
the lenders to accelerate, as applicable, required payments and would increase each agreement’s relevant Applicable Margin by 2.00%
per annum.
The obligations of the lenders under two revolving credit agreements to provide advances will terminate on December 11, 2023, and
November 17, 2025, unless the commitments are terminated in whole prior to that date. All advances must be repaid no later than the
date on which lenders are no longer obligated to make any advances under the applicable credit agreement.
Each of the credit agreements provides that we and lenders representing more than 50% of the facility amount may agree to extend their
commitments under such Credit Agreement for two one-year periods beyond the initial termination date. We have the right to terminate,
in whole or in part, amounts committed by the lenders under each of the credit agreements in excess of any outstanding advances;
however, any such terminated commitments may not be reinstated.
Advances under these agreements would bear interest, at our option, either:
•at a variable annual rate equal to: (1) the highest of (but not less than zero) (a) the rate of interest announced publicly by Citibank in
New York, New York, from time to time, as Citibank’s base rate, (b) 0.5% per annum above the federal funds rate, and (c) the
London interbank offered rate (or the successor thereto) (“LIBOR”) applicable to dollars for a period of one month plus 1.00%, plus
(2) an applicable margin, as set forth in the applicable Credit Agreement (the “Applicable Margin for Base Advances”); or
•at a rate equal to: (i) LIBOR (adjusted upwards to reflect any bank reserve costs) for a period of one, two, three or six months, as
applicable, plus (ii) an applicable margin, as set forth in the applicable Credit Agreement (the “Applicable Margin for Eurodollar
Rate Advances”).
We pay a facility fee of 0.070%, 0.080%, 0.100% or 0.125% per annum of the amount of the lender commitments, depending on AT&T’s
credit rating.
NOTE 13. FAIR VALUE MEASUREMENTS AND DISCLOSURE
The Fair Value Measurement and Disclosure framework in ASC 820, “Fair Value Measurement,” provides a three-tiered fair value
hierarchy based on the reliability of the inputs used to determine fair value. Level 1 refers to fair values determined based on quoted
prices in active markets for identical assets. Level 2 refers to fair values estimated using significant other observable inputs and Level 3
includes fair values estimated using significant unobservable inputs.
The level of an asset or liability within the fair value hierarchy is based on the lowest level of any input that is significant to the fair value
measurement. Our valuation techniques maximize the use of observable inputs and minimize the use of unobservable inputs.
The valuation methodologies described above may produce a fair value calculation that may not be indicative of future net realizable
value or reflective of future fair values. We believe our valuation methods are appropriate and consistent with other market participants.
The use of different methodologies or assumptions to determine the fair value of certain financial instruments could result in a different
fair value measurement at the reporting date. There have been no changes in the methodologies used since December 31, 2019.
101
AT&T Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
Long-Term Debt and Other Financial Instruments
The carrying amounts and estimated fair values of our long-term debt, including current maturities, and other financial instruments, are
summarized as follows:
December 31, 2020 December 31, 2019
Carrying
 AmountFair
 ValueCarrying
 AmountFair
 Value
Notes and debentures $ 155,209 $ 187,224 $ 161,109 $ 182,124 
Bank borrowings — — 4 4 
Investment securities 3,249 3,249 3,723 3,723 
Includes credit agreement borrowings.
Excludes investments accounted for under the equity method.
The carrying amount of debt with an original maturity of less than one year approximates fair value. The fair value measurements used
for notes and debentures are considered Level 2 and are determined using various methods, including quoted prices for identical or
similar securities in both active and inactive markets.
Following is the fair value leveling for investment securities that are measured at fair value and derivatives as of December 31, 2020, and
December 31, 2019. Derivatives designated as hedging instruments are reflected as “Other assets,” “Other noncurrent liabilities,” “Other
current assets” and “Accounts payable and accrued liabilities” on our consolidated balance sheets.
December 31, 2020
Level 1 Level 2 Level 3 Total
Equity Securities
Domestic equities $ 1,010 $ — $ — $ 1,010 
International equities 180 — — 180 
Fixed income equities 236 — — 236 
Available-for-Sale Debt Securities — 1,479 — 1,479 
Asset Derivatives
Cross-currency swaps — 1,721 — 1,721 
Foreign exchange contracts — 6 — 6 
Liability Derivatives
Cross-currency swaps — (1,814) — (1,814)
Foreign exchange contracts — (9) — (9)
December 31, 2019
Level 1 Level 2 Level 3 Total
Equity Securities
Domestic equities $ 844 $ — $ — $ 844 
International equities 183 — — 183 
Fixed income equities 229 — — 229 
Available-for-Sale Debt Securities — 1,444 — 1,444 
Asset Derivatives
Interest rate swaps — 2 — 2 
Cross-currency swaps — 172 — 172 
Interest rate locks — 11 — 11 
Foreign exchange contracts — 89 — 89 
Liability Derivatives
Cross-currency swaps — (3,187) — (3,187)
Interest rate locks — (95) — (95)1
2
1
2
102
AT&T Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
Investment Securities
Our investment securities include both equity and debt securities that are measured at fair value, as well as equity securities without
readily determinable fair values. A substantial portion of the fair values of our investment securities is estimated based on quoted market
prices. Investments in equity securities not traded on a national securities exchange are valued at cost, less any impairment, and adjusted
for changes resulting from observable, orderly transactions for identical or similar securities. Investments in debt securities not traded on
a national securities exchange are valued using pricing models, quoted prices of securities with similar characteristics or discounted cash
flows.
The components comprising total gains and losses in the period on equity securities are as follows:
For the years ended December 31, 2020 2019 2018
Total gains (losses) recognized on equity securities $ 171 $ 301 $ (130)
Gains (losses) recognized on equity securities sold (25) 100 (10)
Unrealized gains (losses) recognized on equity securities held at end of period $ 196 $ 201 $ (120)
At December 31, 2020, available-for-sale debt securities totaling $1,479 have maturities as follows - less than one year: $29; one to three
years: $159; three to five years: $179; five or more years: $1,112.
Our cash equivalents (money market securities), short-term investments (certificate and time deposits) and nonrefundable customer
deposits are recorded at amortized cost, and the respective carrying amounts approximate fair values. Short-term investments and
nonrefundable customer deposits are recorded in “Other current assets” and our investment securities are recorded in “Other Assets” on
the consolidated balance sheets.
Derivative Financial Instruments
We enter into derivative transactions to manage certain market risks, primarily interest rate risk and foreign currency exchange risk. This
includes the use of interest rate swaps, interest rate locks, foreign exchange forward contracts and combined interest rate foreign
exchange contracts (cross-currency swaps). We do not use derivatives for trading or speculative purposes. We record derivatives on our
consolidated balance sheets at fair value that is derived from observable market data, including yield curves and foreign exchange rates
(all of our derivatives are Level 2). Cash flows associated with derivative instruments are presented in the same category on the
consolidated statements of cash flows as the item being hedged.
Fair Value Hedging Periodically, we enter into and designate fixed-to-floating interest rate swaps as fair value hedges. The purpose of
these swaps is to manage interest rate risk by managing our mix of fixed-rate and floating-rate debt. These swaps involve the receipt of
fixed-rate amounts for floating interest rate payments over the life of the swaps without exchange of the underlying principal amount.
We also designate some of our foreign exchange contracts as fair value hedges. The purpose of these contracts is to hedge currency risk
associated with foreign-currency-denominated operating assets and liabilities.
Unrealized and realized gains or losses from fair value hedges impact the same category on the consolidated statements of income as the
item being hedged. Unrealized gains on derivatives designated as fair value hedges are recorded at fair market value as assets, and
unrealized losses are recorded at fair market value as liabilities. Changes in the fair value of derivative instruments designated as fair
value hedges are offset against the change in fair value of the hedged assets or liabilities through earnings. In the year ended
December 31, 2020 and 2019, no ineffectiveness was measured on fair value hedges.
Cash Flow Hedging We designate our cross-currency swaps as cash flow hedges. We have entered into multiple cross-currency swaps to
hedge our exposure to variability in expected future cash flows that are attributable to foreign currency risk generated from our foreign-
denominated debt. These agreements include initial and final exchanges of principal from fixed foreign currency denominated amounts
to fixed U.S. dollar denominated amounts, to be exchanged at a specified rate that is usually determined by the market spot rate upon
issuance. They also include an interest rate swap of a fixed or floating foreign currency-denominated interest rate to a fixed U.S. dollar
denominated interest rate.
We also designate some of our foreign exchange contracts as cash flow hedges. The purpose of these contracts is to hedge certain
forecasted film production costs and film tax incentives denominated in foreign currencies.
103
AT&T Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
Unrealized gains on derivatives designated as cash flow hedges are recorded at fair value as assets, and unrealized losses are recorded at
fair value as liabilities. For derivative instruments designated as cash flow hedges, changes in fair value are reported as a component of
accumulated OCI and are reclassified into the consolidated statements of income in the same period the hedged transaction affects
earnings.
Periodically, we enter into and designate interest rate locks to partially hedge the risk of changes in interest payments attributable to
increases in the benchmark interest rate during the period leading up to the probable issuance of fixed-rate debt. We designate our interest
rate locks as cash flow hedges. Gains and losses when we settle our interest rate locks are amortized into income over the life of the
related debt. Over the next 12 months, we expect to reclassify $92 from accumulated OCI to “Interest expense” due to the amortization
of net losses on historical interest rate locks.
We settled all interest rate locks in May 2020 in conjunction with the issuance of fixed rate debt obligations that the interest rate locks
were hedging and paid $731 that was largely offset by the return of collateral at the time of settlement. Cash flows from the interest rate
lock settlements and return of collateral were reported as financing activities in our statement of cash flows, consistent with our
accounting policy for these instruments.
Net Investment Hedging We have designated €1,450 million aggregate principal amount of debt as a hedge of the variability of some of
the Euro-denominated net investments of our subsidiaries. The gain or loss on the debt that is designated as, and is effective as, an
economic hedge of the net investment in a foreign operation is recorded as a currency translation adjustment within accumulated OCI,
net on the consolidated balance sheets. Net losses on net investment hedges recognized in accumulated OCI for 2020 were $147.
Collateral and Credit-Risk Contingency We have entered into agreements with our derivative counterparties establishing collateral
thresholds based on respective credit ratings and netting agreements. At December 31, 2020, we had posted collateral of $53 (a deposit
asset) and held collateral of $694 (a receipt liability). Under the agreements, if AT&T’s credit rating had been downgraded one rating
level by Fitch Ratings, before the final collateral exchange in December, we would have been required to post additional collateral of
$33. If AT&T’s credit rating had been downgraded four ratings levels by Fitch Ratings, two levels by S&P, and two levels by Moody’s,
we would have been required to post additional collateral of $676. If DIRECTV Holdings LLC’s credit rating had been downgraded
below BBB- by S&P, we would have been required to post additional collateral of $134. At December 31, 2019, we had posted collateral
of $204 (a deposit asset) and held collateral of $44 (a receipt liability). We do not offset the fair value of collateral, whether the right to
reclaim cash collateral (a receivable) or the obligation to return cash collateral (a payable) exists, against the fair value of the derivative
instruments.
Following are the notional amounts of our outstanding derivative positions at December 31:
2020 2019
Interest rate swaps $ — $ 853 
Cross-currency swaps 40,745 42,325 
Interest rate locks — 3,500 
Foreign exchange contracts 90 269 
Total $ 40,835 $ 46,947 
Following are the related hedged items affecting our financial position and performance:
Effect of Derivatives on the Consolidated Statements of Income
Fair Value Hedging Relationships
For the years ended December 31, 2020 2019 2018
Interest rate swaps (Interest expense):
Gain (Loss) on interest rate swaps $ (6)$ 58 $ (12)
Gain (Loss) on long-term debt 6 (58) 12 
104
AT&T Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
In addition, the net swap settlements that accrued and settled in the periods above were offset against “Interest expense.”
Cash Flow Hedging Relationships
For the years ended December 31, 2020 2019 2018
Cross-currency swaps:
Gain (Loss) recognized in accumulated OCI $ (378)$ (1,066)$ (825)
Foreign exchange contracts:
Gain (Loss) recognized in accumulated OCI 3 10 51 
Other income (expense) - net reclassified from
accumulated OCI into income (3) 6 39 
Interest rate locks:
Gain (Loss) recognized in accumulated OCI (648) (84) — 
Interest income (expense) reclassified from
accumulated OCI into income (84) (63) (58)
Nonrecurring Fair Value Measurements
In addition to assets and liabilities that are recorded at fair value on a recurring basis, impairment indicators may subject goodwill, long-
lived assets and film costs to nonrecurring fair value measurements. The implied fair values of the video and Vrio businesses were
estimated using both the discounted cash flow as well as market multiple approaches. The fair values of long-lived assets in the video
business were determined using a present value approach of probability-weighted expected cash flows. The fair values of film
productions were estimated using a discounted cash flow approach. The inputs to all of these approaches are considered Level 3.
Goodwill amounts related to the Video and Vrio reporting units were fully impaired. At December 31, 2020, nonrecurring fair value
measurements in our Video business unit totaled $9,744 and were comprised of $5,873 for orbital slots, $1,613 for customer lists and
$2,258 for property, plant and equipment (see Notes 7 and 9). Nonrecurring fair value measurements for film costs within our Warner
Bros. business unit totaled $844 (see Note 11). There were no nonrecurring fair value measurements at December 31, 2019.
NOTE 14. INCOME TAXES
Significant components of our deferred tax liabilities (assets) are as follows at December 31:
2020 2019
Depreciation and amortization $ 46,952 $ 44,896 
Licenses and nonamortizable intangibles 13,930 17,355 
Employee benefits (5,279) (5,143)
Deferred fulfillment costs 2,691 3,050 
Net operating loss and other carryforwards (7,355) (7,301)
Other – net 4,562 1,536 
Subtotal 55,501 54,393 
Deferred tax assets valuation allowance 4,773 4,941 
Net deferred tax liabilities $ 60,274 $ 59,334 
Noncurrent deferred tax liabilities $ 60,472 $ 59,502 
Less: Noncurrent deferred tax assets (198) (168)
Net deferred tax liabilities $ 60,274 $ 59,334 
At December 31, 2020, we had combined net operating and capital loss carryforwards (tax effected) for federal income tax purposes of
$585, state of $916 and foreign of $2,763, expiring through 2040. Additionally, we had federal credit carryforwards of $1,080 and state
credit carryforwards of $2,011, expiring primarily through 2040.
105
AT&T Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
We recognize a valuation allowance if, based on the weight of available evidence, it is more likely than not that some portion, or all, of a
deferred tax asset will not be realized. Our valuation allowances at December 31, 2020 and 2019 related primarily to state and foreign net
operating losses and state credit carryforwards.
The Company considers post-1986 unremitted foreign earnings subjected to the one-time transition tax not to be indefinitely reinvested
as such earnings can be repatriated without any significant incremental tax costs. The Company considers other types of unremitted
foreign earnings to be indefinitely reinvested. U.S. income and foreign withholding taxes have not been recorded on temporary
differences related to investments in certain foreign subsidiaries as such differences are considered indefinitely reinvested. Determination
of the amount of unrecognized deferred tax liability is not practicable.
We recognize the financial statement effects of a tax return position when it is more likely than not, based on the technical merits, that the
position will ultimately be sustained. For tax positions that meet this recognition threshold, we apply our judgment, taking into account
applicable tax laws, our experience in managing tax audits and relevant GAAP, to determine the amount of tax benefits to recognize in
our financial statements. For each position, the difference between the benefit realized on our tax return and the benefit reflected in our
financial statements is recorded on our consolidated balance sheets as an unrecognized tax benefit (UTB). We update our UTBs at each
financial statement date to reflect the impacts of audit settlements and other resolutions of audit issues, the expiration of statutes of
limitation, developments in tax law and ongoing discussions with taxing authorities. A reconciliation of the change in our UTB balance
from January 1 to December 31 for 2020 and 2019 is as follows:
Federal, State and Foreign Tax 2020 2019
Balance at beginning of year $ 10,979 $ 10,358 
Increases for tax positions related to the current year 1,580 903 
Increases for tax positions related to prior years 112 1,106 
Decreases for tax positions related to prior years (994) (1,283)
Lapse of statute of limitations (24) (32)
Settlements (1,646) (283)
Current year acquisitions — 205 
Foreign currency effects (6) 5 
Balance at end of year 10,001 10,979 
Accrued interest and penalties 2,450 2,708 
Gross unrecognized income tax benefits 12,451 13,687 
Less: Deferred federal and state income tax benefits (878) (886)
Less: Tax attributable to timing items included above (3,588) (4,320)
Total UTB that, if recognized, would impact the
effective income tax rate as of the end of the year $ 7,985 $ 8,481 
Periodically we make deposits to taxing jurisdictions which reduce our UTB balance but are not included in the reconciliation above. The
amount of deposits that reduced our UTB balance was $702 at December 31, 2020 and $2,584 at December 31, 2019.
Accrued interest and penalties included in UTBs were $2,450 as of December 31, 2020, and $2,708 as of December 31, 2019. We record
interest and penalties related to federal, state and foreign UTBs in income tax expense. The net interest and penalty expense included in
income tax expense was $149 for 2020, $267 for 2019 and $1,290 for 2018.
We file income tax returns in the U.S. federal jurisdiction and various state, local and foreign jurisdictions. As a large taxpayer, our
income tax returns are regularly audited by the Internal Revenue Service (IRS) and other taxing authorities.
The IRS has completed field examinations of our tax returns through 2012. All audit periods prior to 2005 are closed for federal
examination purposes and we have effectively resolved all outstanding audit issues for years through 2010 with the IRS Appeals
Division. Those years will be closed as the final paperwork is processed in the coming months.
106
AT&T Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
While we do not expect material changes, we are generally unable to estimate the range of impacts on the balance of the remaining
uncertain tax positions or the impact on the effective tax rate from the resolution of these issues until each year is closed; and it is
possible that the amount of unrecognized benefit with respect to our uncertain tax positions could increase or decrease within the next 12
months.
The components of income tax (benefit) expense are as follows:
2020 2019 2018
Federal:
Current $ (687)$ 584 $ 3,258 
Deferred 1,039 1,656 277 
352 2,240 3,535 
State and local:
Current (6) 603 513 
Deferred 263 144 473 
257 747 986 
Foreign:
Current 413 605 539 
Deferred (57) (99) (140)
356 506 399 
Total $ 965 $ 3,493 $ 4,920 
“Income Before Income Taxes” in the Consolidated Statements of Income included the following components for the years ended
December 31:
2020 2019 2018
U.S. income (loss) before income taxes $ (452)$ 18,301 $ 25,379 
Foreign income (loss) before income taxes (2,404) 167 (506)
Total $ (2,856)$ 18,468 $ 24,873 
A reconciliation of income tax expense (benefit) and the amount computed by applying the statutory federal income tax rate of 21% to
income from continuing operations before income taxes is as follows:
2020 2019 2018
Taxes computed at federal statutory rate $ (600) $ 3,878 $ 5,223 
Increases (decreases) in income taxes resulting from:
State and local income taxes - net of federal income tax benefit 193 611 738 
Enactment date and measurement period adjustments from the Act — — (718)
Tax on foreign investments (141) (115) (466)
Noncontrolling interest (285) (230) (121)
Permanent items and R&D credit (239) (285) (189)
Audit resolutions (112) (156) 544 
Divestitures 107 — — 
Goodwill impairment 2,120 — — 
Other - net (78) (210) (91)
Total $ 965 $ 3,493 $ 4,920 
Effective Tax Rate (33.8)% 18.9 % 19.8 %
Goodwill impairments are not deductible for tax purposes.1
1 
107
AT&T Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
NOTE 15. PENSION AND POSTRETIREMENT BENEFITS
We offer noncontributory pension programs covering the majority of domestic nonmanagement employees in our Communications
business. Nonmanagement employees’ pension benefits are generally calculated using one of two formulas: a flat dollar amount applied
to years of service according to job classification or a cash balance plan with negotiated annual pension band credits as well as interest
credits. Most employees can elect to receive their pension benefits in either a lump sum payment or an annuity.
Pension programs covering U.S. management employees are closed to new entrants. These programs continue to provide benefits to
participants that were generally hired before January 1, 2015, who receive benefits under either cash balance pension programs that
include annual or monthly credits based on salary as well as interest credits, or a traditional pension formula (i.e., a stated percentage of
employees’ adjusted career income).
We also provide a variety of medical, dental and life insurance benefits to certain retired employees under various plans and accrue
actuarially determined postretirement benefit costs as active employees earn these benefits.
WarnerMedia and certain of its subsidiaries have both funded and unfunded defined benefit pension plans, the substantial majority of
which are noncontributory plans covering domestic employees. WarnerMedia also sponsors unfunded domestic postretirement benefit
plans covering certain retirees and their dependents. At acquisition, the plans were already closed to new entrants and frozen for new
accruals.
During the fourth quarter of 2020, we committed to, and reflected in our results, plan changes impacting retiree life and death coverage
and health and medical subsidy benefits. Changes were also communicated that impact future pension accruals for certain management
employees. These plan changes align our benefit plans to, or above market level.
In 2019, for certain management participants in our pension plan who terminated employment before April 1, 2019, we offered the
option of more favorable 2018 interest rates and mortality basis for determining lump-sum distributions. We recorded special termination
benefits of $81 associated with this offer in “Other income (expense) – net.” We also offered certain terminated vested pension plan
participants the opportunity to receive their benefit as a lump sum.
During the fourth quarter of 2019, we committed to plan changes impacting the cost of postretirement health and welfare benefits, which
were reflected in our results. Future retirees will not receive health retirement subsidies toward post-Medicare coverage but have access
to a new cost-efficient comprehensive plan.
Obligations and Funded Status
For defined benefit pension plans, the benefit obligation is the projected benefit obligation, the actuarial present value, as of our
December 31 measurement date, of all benefits attributed by the pension benefit formula to employee service rendered to that date. The
amount of benefit to be paid depends on a number of future events incorporated into the pension benefit formula, including estimates of
the average life of employees and their beneficiaries and average years of service rendered. It is measured based on assumptions
concerning future interest rates and future employee compensation levels as applicable.
For postretirement benefit plans, the benefit obligation is the accumulated postretirement benefit obligation, the actuarial present value as
of the measurement date of all future benefits attributed under the terms of the postretirement benefit plans to employee service.
108
AT&T Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
The following table presents the change in the projected benefit obligation for the years ended December 31:
Pension Benefits Postretirement Benefits
2020 2019 2020 2019
Benefit obligation at beginning of year $ 59,873 $ 55,439 $ 16,041 $ 19,378 
Service cost - benefits earned during the period 1,029 1,019 53 71 
Interest cost on projected benefit obligation 1,687 1,960 416 675 
Amendments (340) — (2,655) (4,590)
Actuarial (gain) loss 5,054 7,734 1,423 2,050 
Special termination benefits — 81 — — 
Benefits paid (5,124) (6,356) (1,370) (1,543)
Curtailment (1) — — — 
Plan transfers (20) (4) 20 — 
Benefit obligation at end of year $ 62,158 $ 59,873 $ 13,928 $ 16,041 
The following table presents the change in the fair value of plan assets for the years ended December 31 and the plans’ funded status at
December 31:
Pension Benefits Postretirement Benefits
2020 2019 2020 2019
Fair value of plan assets at beginning of year $ 53,530 $ 51,681 $ 4,145 $ 4,277 
Actual return on plan assets 6,199 8,207 302 609 
Benefits paid (5,124) (6,356) (1,029) (941)
Contributions 2 2 425 200 
Plan transfers (1) (4) — — 
Fair value of plan assets at end of year 54,606 53,530 3,843 4,145 
Unfunded status at end of year $ (7,552)$ (6,343)$ (10,085)$ (11,896)
At our discretion, certain postretirement benefits may be paid from our cash accounts, which does not reduce V oluntary Employee Benefit
Association (VEBA) assets. Future benefit payments may be made from VEBA trusts and thus reduce those asset balances.
Funded status is not indicative of our ability to pay ongoing pension benefits or of our obligation to fund retirement trusts. Required pension funding
is determined in accordance with the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, as amended (ERISA) and applicable regulations.
Amounts recognized on our consolidated balance sheets at December 31 are listed below:
Pension BenefitsPostretirement Benefits
2020 2019 2020 2019
Current portion of employee benefit obligation $ — $ — $ (1,213)$ (1,365)
Employee benefit obligation (7,552) (6,343) (8,872) (10,531)
Net amount recognized $ (7,552)$ (6,343)$ (10,085)$ (11,896)
Included in “Accounts payable and accrued liabilities.”
Included in “Postemployment benefit obligation,” combined with international pension obligations and other postemployment obligations of $ 553
and $ 1,299  at December 31, 2020, respectively .
The accumulated benefit obligation for our pension plans represents the actuarial present value of benefits based on employee service
and compensation as of a certain date and does not include an assumption about future compensation levels. The accumulated benefit
obligation for our pension plans was $60,848 at December 31, 2020, and $58,150 at December 31, 2019.1
2
1
2
1
 2
1
2
109
AT&T Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
Net Periodic Benefit Cost and Other Amounts Recognized in Other Comprehensive Income
Periodic Benefit Costs
The service cost component of net periodic pension cost (benefit) is recorded in operating expenses in the consolidated statements of
income while the remaining components are recorded in “Other income (expense) – net.” Our combined net pension and postretirement
cost (credit) recognized in our consolidated statements of income was $711, $2,762 and $(4,251) for the years ended December 31, 2020,
2019 and 2018.
The following table presents the components of net periodic benefit cost (credit):
Pension Benefits Postretirement Benefits
2020 2019 2018 2020 2019 2018
Service cost – benefits earned
during the period $ 1,029 $ 1,019 $ 1,116 $ 53 $ 71 $ 109 
Interest cost on projected benefit
obligation 1,687 1,960 2,092 416 675 778 
Expected return on assets (3,557) (3,561) (3,190) (178) (227) (304)
Amortization of prior service credit (113) (113) (115) (2,329) (1,820) (1,635)
Actuarial (gain) loss 2,404 3,088 (812) 1,299 1,670 (2,290)
Net pension and postretirement
cost (credit) $ 1,450 $ 2,393 $ (909)$ (739)$ 369 $ (3,342)
Net periodic pension cost (credit) excludes immediate cost recognized due to special events: curtailment gain of ($ 1) in 2020 and special termination
benefits of $ 81 in 2019.
Other Changes in Benefit Obligations Recognized in Other Comprehensive Income
The following table presents the after-tax changes in benefit obligations recognized in OCI and the after-tax prior service credits that
were amortized from OCI into net periodic benefit costs:
Pension Benefits Postretirement Benefits
2020 2019 2018 2020 2019 2018
Balance at beginning of year $ 361 $ 447 $ 571 $ 8,171 $ 6,086 $ 6,456 
Prior service (cost) credit 250 — (37) 2,001 3,457 864 
Amortization of prior service credit (86) (86) (87) (1,756) (1,372) (1,234)
Total recognized in other
comprehensive (income) loss 164 (86) (124) 245 2,085 (370)
Balance at end of year $ 525 $ 361 $ 447 $ 8,416 $ 8,171 $ 6,086 1
1
110
AT&T Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
Assumptions
In determining the projected benefit obligation and the net pension and postretirement benefit cost, we used the following significant
weighted-average assumptions:
Pension Benefits Postretirement Benefits
2020 2019 2018 2020 2019 2018
Weighted-average discount rate for
 determining benefit obligation at
 December 31 2.70 % 3.40 % 4.50 % 2.40 % 3.20 % 4.40 %
Discount rate in effect for
determining
service cost 3.60 % 4.10 % 4.20 % 3.50 % 4.40 % 4.30 %
Discount rate in effect for
determining interest cost 2.90 % 3.50 % 3.80 % 2.70 % 3.70 % 3.60 %
Weighted-average interest credit rate
for cash balance pension programs 3.10 % 3.30 % 3.70 % — % — % — %
Long-term rate of return on plan
assets 7.00 % 7.00 % 7.00 % 4.75 % 5.75 % 5.75 %
Composite rate of compensation
increase for determining benefit
obligation 3.00 % 3.00 % 3.00 % 3.00 % 3.00 % 3.00 %
Composite rate of compensation
increase for determining net cost
(benefit) 3.00 % 3.00 % 3.00 % 3.00 % 3.00 % 3.00 %
Weighted-average discount rate for pension benefits in ef fect from January 1, 2019 through March 31, 2019 was 4.60% for service cost and 4.20%
for interest cost, from April 1, 2019 through June 30, 2019 was 4.30% for service cost and 3.70% for interest cost, from July 1, 2019 through
September 30, 2019 was 3.90% for service cost and 3.20% for interest cost, and, from October 1, 2019 through December 31, 2019 was 3.50% for
service cost and 3.00% for interest cost.
Weighted-average discount rate for postretirement benefits in ef fect from January 1, 2019 through October 1, 2019 was 4.70% for service cost and
4.00% for interest cost, and, from October 2, 2019 through December 31, 2019 was 3.40% for service cost and 2.70% for interest cost.
Weighted-average interest crediting rates for cash balance pension programs relate only to the cash balance portion of total pension benefits. A 0.50%
increase in the weighted-average interest crediting rate would increase the pension benefit obligation by $ 130.
We recognize gains and losses on pension and postretirement plan assets and obligations immediately in “Other income (expense) – net”
in our consolidated statements of income. These gains and losses are generally measured annually as of December 31 and accordingly,
will normally be recorded during the fourth quarter, unless an earlier remeasurement is required. Should actual experience differ from
actuarial assumptions, the projected pension benefit obligation and net pension cost and accumulated postretirement benefit obligation
and postretirement benefit cost would be affected in future years.
Discount Rate Our assumed weighted-average discount rate for pension and postretirement benefits of 2.70% and 2.40% respectively, at
December 31, 2020, reflects the hypothetical rate at which the projected benefit obligation could be effectively settled or paid out to
participants. We determined our discount rate based on a range of factors, including a yield curve composed of the rates of return on
several hundred high-quality, fixed income corporate bonds available at the measurement date and corresponding to the related expected
durations of future cash outflows. These bonds were all rated at least Aa3 or AA- by one of the nationally recognized statistical rating
organizations, denominated in U.S. dollars, and neither callable, convertible nor index linked. For the year ended December 31, 2020,
when compared to the year ended December 31, 2019, we decreased our pension discount rate by 0.70%, resulting in an increase in our
pension plan benefit obligation of $5,594 and decreased our postretirement discount rate by 0.80%, resulting in an increase in our
postretirement benefit obligation of $1,311. For the year ended December 31, 2019, we decreased our pension discount rate by 1.10%,
resulting in an increase in our pension plan benefit obligation of $8,018 and decreased our postretirement discount rates by 1.20%,
resulting in an increase in our postretirement benefit obligation of $2,399.1, 2
1,2
3
1
2
3
111
AT&T Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
We utilize a full yield curve approach in the estimation of the service and interest components of net periodic benefit costs for pension
and other postretirement benefits. Under this approach, we apply discounting using individual spot rates from a yield curve composed of
the rates of return on several hundred high-quality, fixed income corporate bonds available at the measurement date. These spot rates
align to each of the projected benefit obligations and service cost cash flows. The service cost component relates to the active
participants in the plan, so the relevant cash flows on which to apply the yield curve are considerably longer in duration on average than
the total projected benefit obligation cash flows, which also include benefit payments to retirees. Interest cost is computed by multiplying
each spot rate by the corresponding discounted projected benefit obligation cash flows. The full yield curve approach reduces any
actuarial gains and losses based upon interest rate expectations (e.g., built-in gains in interest cost in an upward sloping yield curve
scenario), or gains and losses merely resulting from the timing and magnitude of cash outflows associated with our benefit obligations.
Neither the annual measurement of our total benefit obligations nor annual net benefit cost is affected by the full yield curve approach.
Expected Long-Term Rate of Return In 2021, our expected long-term rate of return is 6.75% on pension plan assets and 4.50% on
postretirement plan assets. Our expected long-term rates of return on plan assets were adjusted downward by 0.25% for 2021, with
pension reducing from 7.00% to 6.75% and postretirement from 4.75% to 4.50%. This update to our asset return assumptions was due to
economic forecasts, a change in the asset mix, and holding more fixed income securities in the pension plan and more cash and short-
term securities in our VEBA trusts. Our long-term rates of return reflect the average rate of earnings expected on the funds invested, or to
be invested, to provide for the benefits included in the projected benefit obligations. In setting the long-term assumed rate of return,
management considers capital markets’ future expectations, the asset mix of the plans’ investment and average historical asset return.
Actual long-term returns can, in relatively stable markets, also serve as a factor in determining future expectations. We consider many
factors that include, but are not limited to, historical returns on plan assets, current market information on long-term returns (e.g., long-
term bond rates) and current and target asset allocations between asset categories. The target asset allocation is determined based on
consultations with external investment advisers. If all other factors were to remain unchanged, we expect that a 0.50% decrease in the
expected long-term rate of return would cause 2021 combined pension and postretirement cost to increase $277. However, any
differences in the rate and actual returns will be included with the actuarial gain or loss recorded in the fourth quarter when our plans are
remeasured.
Composite Rate of Compensation Increase Our expected composite rate of compensation increase cost of 3.00% in 2020 and 2019
reflects the long-term average rate of salary increases.
Healthcare Cost Trend Our healthcare cost trend assumptions are developed based on historical cost data, the near-term outlook and an
assessment of likely long-term trends. Based on our assessment of historical experience, expectations of healthcare industry inflation and
recent prescription drug cost experience, our 2021 assumed annual healthcare prescription drug cost trend and medical cost trend for
eligible participants will remain at 4.00% annual and ultimate rate. For 2020, our assumed annual healthcare prescription drug cost trend
and medical cost trend for eligible participants was decreased from an annual and ultimate trend rate of 4.50% to an annual and ultimate
trend rate of 4.00%. This change in assumption decreased our obligation by $102 at December 31, 2019. In addition to the healthcare
cost trend, we assumed an annual 2.50% growth in administrative expenses and an annual 3.00% growth in dental claims.
Plan Assets
Plan assets consist primarily of private and public equity, government and corporate bonds, and real assets (real estate and natural
resources). The asset allocations of the pension plans are maintained to meet ERISA requirements. Any plan contributions, as determined
by ERISA regulations, are made to a pension trust for the benefit of plan participants. We do not have significant ERISA required
contributions to our pension plans for 2021.
We maintain VEBA trusts to partially fund postretirement benefits; however, there are no ERISA or regulatory requirements that these
postretirement benefit plans be funded annually. We made discretionary contributions of $425 in December 2020 and $200 in December
2019 to our postretirement plan.
112
AT&T Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
The principal investment objectives are to ensure the availability of funds to pay pension and postretirement benefits as they become due
under a broad range of future economic scenarios, maximize long-term investment return with an acceptable level of risk based on our
pension and postretirement obligations, and diversify broadly across and within the capital markets to insulate asset values against
adverse experience in any one market. Each asset class has broadly diversified characteristics. Substantial biases toward any particular
investing style or type of security are sought to be avoided by managing the aggregation of all accounts with portfolio benchmarks. Asset
and benefit obligation forecasting studies are conducted periodically, generally every two to three years, or when significant changes
have occurred in market conditions, benefits, participant demographics or funded status. Decisions regarding investment policy are made
with an understanding of the effect of asset allocation on funded status, future contributions and projected expenses.
The plans’ weighted-average asset targets and actual allocations as a percentage of plan assets, including the notional exposure of future
contracts by asset categories at December 31 are as follows:
Pension Assets Postretirement (VEBA) Assets
Target 2020 2019 Target 2020 2019
Equity securities:
Domestic 16  %- 26  % 19  % 17  % 14  %- 24  % 19  % 20  %
International 10  %- 20  % 15 12 9  %- 19  % 14 12 
Fixed income
securities 37  %- 47  % 35 35 40  %- 50  % 45 52 
Real assets 8  %- 18  % 8 9 — %- 6  % 1 1 
Private equity 5  %- 15  % 9 8 — %- 6  % 1 2 
Preferred interest 6 %- 16  % 10 17 — %- — % — — 
Other — %- 5  % 4 2 15  %- 25  % 20 13 
Total 100  % 100  % 100  % 100  %
The pension trust holds a preferred equity interest valued at $5,771 in AT&T Mobility II LLC (Mobility II), the primary holding
company for our wireless business (see Note 17). During 2020, the trust sold a portion of this preferred interest valued at $2,885 to third
party investors. The preferred equity interest was valued at $8,806 as of December 31, 2019.
At December 31, 2020, AT&T securities represented 11% of assets held by our pension trust, including the preferred interest in Mobility
II, and 1% of assets (primarily common stock) held by our VEBA trusts included in these financial statements.
Investment Valuation
Investments are stated at fair value. Fair value is the price that would be received to sell an asset or paid to transfer a liability at the
measurement date.
Investments in securities traded on a national securities exchange are valued at the last reported sales price on the final business day of
the year. If no sale was reported on that date, they are valued at the last reported bid price. Investments in securities not traded on a
national securities exchange are valued using pricing models, quoted prices of securities with similar characteristics or discounted cash
flows. Shares of registered investment companies are valued based on quoted market prices, which represent the net asset value of shares
held at year-end.
Other commingled investment entities are valued at quoted redemption values that represent the net asset values of units held at year-end
which management has determined approximates fair value.
Real estate and natural resource direct investments are valued at amounts based upon appraisal reports. Fixed income securities valuation
is based upon observable prices for comparable assets, broker/dealer quotes (spreads or prices), or a pricing matrix that derives spreads
for each bond based on external market data, including the current credit rating for the bonds, credit spreads to Treasuries for each credit
rating, sector add-ons or credits, issue-specific add-ons or credits as well as call or other options.
The preferred interest in Mobility II is valued using an income approach by an independent fiduciary.
Purchases and sales of securities are recorded as of the trade date. Realized gains and losses on sales of securities are determined on the
basis of average cost. Interest income is recognized on the accrual basis. Dividend income is recognized on the ex-dividend date.
113
AT&T Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
Non-interest bearing cash and overdrafts are valued at cost, which approximates fair value.
Fair Value Measurements
See Note 13 for a discussion of the fair value hierarchy that prioritizes the inputs to valuation techniques used to measure fair value.
The following tables set forth by level, within the fair value hierarchy, the pension and postretirement assets and liabilities at fair value as
of December 31, 2020:
Pension Assets and Liabilities at Fair Value as of December 31, 2020
Level 1 Level 2 Level 3Total
Non-interest bearing cash $ 173 $ — $ — $ 173 
Interest bearing cash 7 — — 7 
Foreign currency contracts — 3 — 3 
Equity securities:
Domestic equities 9,784 — 11 9,795 
International equities 4,821 11 12 4,844 
Preferred interest — — 5,771 5,771 
Fixed income securities:
Corporate bonds and other investments — 11,043 52 11,095 
Government and municipal bonds — 6,039 — 6,039 
Mortgage-backed securities — 442 1 443 
Real estate and real assets — — 2,544 2,544 
Securities lending collateral 621 1,435 — 2,056 
Receivable for variation margin 23 — — 23 
Assets at fair value 15,429 18,973 8,391 42,793 
Investments sold short and other liabilities at fair value (450) (8) (1) (459)
Total plan net assets at fair value $ 14,979 $ 18,965 $ 8,390 $ 42,334 
Assets held at net asset value practical expedient
Private equity funds 5,154 
Real estate funds 1,694 
Commingled funds 7,706 
Total assets held at net asset value practical expedient 14,554 
Other assets (liabilities) (2,282)
Total Plan Net Assets $ 54,606 
Other assets (liabilities) include amounts receivable, accounts payable and net adjustment for securities lending payable.1
1
114
AT&T Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
Postretirement Assets and Liabilities at Fair Value as of December 31, 2020
Level 1 Level 2 Level 3 Total
Interest bearing cash $ 497 $ 302 $ — $ 799 
Equity securities:
Domestic equities 363 — — 363 
International equities 282 — — 282 
Fixed income securities:
Corporate bonds and other investments 5 307 3 315 
Government and municipal bonds 6 132 1 139 
Mortgage-backed securities — 94 — 94 
Securities lending collateral — 28 — 28 
Assets at fair value 1,153 863 4 2,020 
Securities lending payable and other liabilities (1) (29) — (30)
Total plan net assets at fair value $ 1,152 $ 834 $ 4 $ 1,990  
Assets held at net asset value practical expedient
Commingled funds 1,843 
Private equity 24 
Real estate funds 22 
Total assets held at net asset value practical expedient 1,889 
Other assets (liabilities) (36)
Total Plan Net Assets $ 3,843 
Other assets (liabilities) include amounts receivable and accounts payable.
The tables below set forth a summary of changes in the fair value of the Level 3 pension and postretirement assets for the year ended
December 31, 2020:
Pension Assets EquitiesFixed Income
FundsReal Estate and
Real Assets Total
Balance at beginning of year $ 8,816 $ 6 $ 2,817 $ 11,639 
Realized gains (losses) (150) — 255 105 
Unrealized gains (losses) 3 — (178) (175)
Transfers in 4 51 36 91 
Transfers out — (3) — (3)
Purchases 9,114 1 223 9,338 
Sales (11,994) (2) (609) (12,605)
Balance at end of year $ 5,793 $ 53 $ 2,544 $ 8,390 
Postretirement Assets EquitiesFixed Income
FundsReal Estate and
Real Assets Total
Balance at beginning of year $ — $ 32 $ — $ 32 
Transfers in — 3 — 3 
Transfers out — (11) — (11)
Sales — (20) — (20)
Balance at end of year $ — $ 4 $ — $ 4 1
1
115
AT&T Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
The following tables set forth by level, within the fair value hierarchy, the pension and postretirement assets and liabilities at fair value as
of December 31, 2019:
Pension Assets and Liabilities at Fair Value as of December 31, 2019
Level 1Level 2 Level 3Total
Non-interest bearing cash $ 85 $ — $ — $ 85 
Interest bearing cash 529 — — 529 
Foreign currency contracts — 5 — 5 
Equity securities:
Domestic equities 8,068 — 4 8,072 
International equities 3,929 11 6 3,946 
Preferred interest — — 8,806 8,806 
Fixed income securities:
Corporate bonds and other investments — 10,469 4 10,473 
Government and municipal bonds 49 6,123 — 6,172 
Mortgage-backed securities — 522 2 524 
Real estate and real assets — — 2,817 2,817 
Securities lending collateral 103 1,658 — 1,761 
Receivable for variation margin 5 — — 5 
Assets at fair value 12,768 18,788 11,639 43,195 
Investments sold short and other liabilities at fair value (513) (2) — (515)
Total plan net assets at fair value $ 12,255 $ 18,786 $ 11,639 $ 42,680 
Assets held at net asset value practical expedient
Private equity funds 4,544 
Real estate funds 2,062 
Commingled funds 5,710 
Total assets held at net asset value practical expedient 12,316 
Other assets (liabilities) (1,466)
Total Plan Net Assets $ 53,530 
Other assets (liabilities) include amounts receivable, accounts payable and net adjustment for securities lending payable.1
1
116
AT&T Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
Postretirement Assets and Liabilities at Fair Value as of December 31, 2019
Level 1 Level 2 Level 3Total
Interest bearing cash$ 248 $ 301 $ — $ 549 
Equity securities:
Domestic equities 438 — — 438 
International equities 265 — — 265 
Fixed income securities:
Corporate bonds and other investments 7 492 31 530 
Government and municipal bonds 6 182 1 189 
Mortgage-backed securities — 294 — 294 
Securities lending collateral — 36 — 36 
Assets at fair value 964 1,305 32 2,301 
Securities lending payable and other liabilities — (36) — (36)
Total plan net assets at fair value $ 964 $ 1,269 $ 32 $ 2,265 
Assets held at net asset value practical expedient
Private equity funds 66 
Real estate funds 27 
Commingled funds 1,797 
Total assets held at net asset value practical expedient 1,890 
Other assets (liabilities) (10)
Total Plan Net Assets $ 4,145 
Other assets (liabilities) include amounts receivable and accounts payable.
The tables below set forth a summary of changes in the fair value of the Level 3 pension and postretirement assets for the year ended
December 31, 2019:
Pension Assets EquitiesFixed Income
FundsReal Estate and
Real Assets Total
Balance at beginning of year $ 8,750 $ 4 $ 2,579 $ 11,333 
Realized gains (losses) — — 64 64 
Unrealized gains (losses) 58 — 45 103 
Transfers in 8 5 134 147 
Transfers out — (6) — (6)
Purchases — 7 228 235 
Sales — (4) (233) (237)
Balance at end of year $ 8,816 $ 6 $ 2,817 $ 11,639 
Postretirement Assets EquitiesFixed Income
FundsReal Estate and
Real Assets Total
Balance at beginning of year $ 1 $ 12 $ — $ 13 
Transfers in — 28 — 28 
Transfers out — (1) — (1)
Sales (1) (7) — (8)
Balance at end of year $ — $ 32 $ — $ 32 1
1
117
AT&T Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
Estimated Future Benefit Payments
Expected benefit payments are estimated using the same assumptions used in determining our benefit obligation at December 31, 2020.
Because benefit payments will depend on future employment and compensation levels; average years employed; average life spans; and
payment elections, among other factors, changes in any of these assumptions could significantly affect these expected amounts. The
following table provides expected benefit payments under our pension and postretirement plans:
Pension BenefitsPostretirement
Benefits
2021 $ 5,391 $ 1,392 
2022 4,597 1,231 
2023 4,428 1,159 
2024 4,323 879 
2025 4,234 832 
Years 2026 - 2030 19,646 3,651 
Supplemental Retirement Plans
We also provide certain senior- and middle-management employees with nonqualified, unfunded supplemental retirement and savings
plans. While these plans are unfunded, we have assets in a designated non-bankruptcy remote trust that are independently managed and
used to provide for certain of these benefits. These plans include supplemental pension benefits as well as compensation-deferral plans,
some of which include a corresponding match by us based on a percentage of the compensation deferral. For our supplemental retirement
plans, the projected benefit obligation was $2,687 and the net supplemental retirement pension cost was $330 at and for the year ended
December 31, 2020. The projected benefit obligation was $2,605 and the net supplemental retirement pension credit was $438 at and for
the year ended December 31, 2019.
We use the same significant assumptions for the composite rate of compensation increase in determining our projected benefit obligation
and the net pension and postemployment benefit cost. Our discount rates of 2.30% at December 31, 2020 and 3.20% at December 31,
2019 were calculated using the same methodologies used in calculating the discount rate for our qualified pension and postretirement
benefit plans.
Deferred compensation expense was $183 in 2020, $199 in 2019 and $128 in 2018.
Contributory Savings Plans
We maintain contributory savings plans that cover substantially all employees. Under the savings plans, we match in cash or company
stock a stated percentage of eligible employee contributions, subject to a specified ceiling. There are no debt-financed shares held by the
Employee Stock Ownership Plans, allocated or unallocated.
Our match of employee contributions to the savings plans is fulfilled with purchases of our stock on the open market or company cash.
Benefit cost, which is based on the cost of shares or units allocated to participating employees’ accounts or the cash contributed to
participant accounts, was $814, $793 and $724 for the years ended December 31, 2020, 2019 and 2018.
NOTE 16. SHARE-BASED PAYMENTS
Under our various plans, senior and other management employees and nonemployee directors have received nonvested stock and stock
units. In conjunction with the acquisition of Time Warner, restricted stock units issued under Time Warner plans were converted to
AT&T share units that will be distributed in the form of AT&T common stock and cash. The shares will vest over a period of one to four
years in accordance with the terms of those plans. In addition, outstanding Time Warner stock options were converted to AT&T stock
options that vested within one year. We do not intend to issue any additional grants under the Time Warner Inc. plans. Future grants to
eligible employees will be issued under AT&T plans.
118
AT&T Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
We grant performance stock units, which are nonvested stock units, based upon our stock price at the date of grant and award them in the
form of AT&T common stock and cash at the end of a three-year period, subject to the achievement of certain performance goals. We
treat the cash settled portion of these awards as a liability. We grant forfeitable restricted stock and stock units, which are valued at the
market price of our common stock at the date of grant and predominantly vest over a four- or five-year period. We also grant other
nonvested stock units and award them in cash at the end of a three-year period, subject to the achievement of certain market based
conditions. As of December 31, 2020, we were authorized to issue up to approximately 183 million shares of common stock (in addition
to shares that may be issued upon exercise of outstanding options or upon vesting of performance stock units or other nonvested stock
units) to officers, employees and directors pursuant to these various plans.
We account for our share-based payment arrangements based on the fair value of the awards on their respective grant date, which may
affect our ability to fully realize the value shown on our consolidated balance sheets of deferred tax assets associated with compensation
expense. We record a valuation allowance when our future taxable income is not expected to be sufficient to recover the asset.
Accordingly, there can be no assurance that the current stock price of our common shares will rise to levels sufficient to realize the entire
tax benefit currently reflected on our consolidated balance sheets. However, to the extent we generate excess tax benefits (i.e., those
additional tax benefits in excess of the deferred taxes associated with compensation expense previously recognized) the potential future
impact on income would be reduced.
Our consolidated statements of income include the compensation cost recognized for those plans as operating expenses, as well as the
associated tax benefits, which are reflected in the table below:
2020 2019 2018
Performance stock units $ 348 $ 544 $ 301 
Restricted stock and stock units 290 273 153 
Other nonvested stock units — 7 4 
Stock options — (5) 5 
Total $ 638 $ 819 $ 463 
Income tax benefit $ 157 $ 202 $ 114 
A summary of the status of our nonvested stock units as of December 31, 2020, and changes during the year then ended is presented as
follows (shares in millions):
 
Nonvested Stock Units SharesWeighted-
Average Grant-
 Date Fair Value
Nonvested at January 1, 2020 42$ 33.80 
Granted 23 36.90 
Vested (18) 35.87 
Forfeited (4) 34.48 
Nonvested at December 31, 2020 43$ 34.50 
As of December 31, 2020, there was $709 of total unrecognized compensation cost related to nonvested share-based payment
arrangements granted. That cost is expected to be recognized over a weighted-average period of 2.09 years. The total fair value of shares
vested during the year was $647 for 2020, compared to $798 for 2019 and $766 for 2018.
It is our intent to satisfy share option exercises using our treasury stock. Cash received from stock option exercises was $65 for 2020,
$446 for 2019 and $361 for 2018.
119
AT&T Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
NOTE 17. STOCKHOLDERS’ EQUITY
Authorized Shares We have authorized 14 billion common shares of AT&T stock and 10 million preferred shares of AT&T stock, each
with a par value of $1.00 per share. Cumulative perpetual preferred shares consist of the following:
•Series A: 48 thousand shares outstanding at December 31, 2020 and December 31, 2019, with a $25,000 per share liquidation
preference and a dividend rate of 5.000%.
•Series B: 20 thousand shares outstanding at December 31, 2020 and zero outstanding at December 31, 2019, with a €100,000 per
share liquidation preference, and an initial rate of 2.875%, subject to reset after May 1, 2025.
•Series C: 70 thousand shares outstanding at December 31, 2020 and zero outstanding at December 31, 2019, with a $25,000 per share
liquidation preference, and a dividend rate of 4.75%.
So long as the quarterly preferred dividends are declared and paid on a timely basis on each series of preferred shares, there are no
limitations on our ability to declare a dividend on or repurchase AT&T common shares. The preferred shares are optionally redeemable
by AT&T at the liquidation price on or after five years from the issuance date, or upon certain other contingent events.
Stock Repurchase Program From time to time, we repurchase shares of common stock for distribution through our employee benefit
plans or in connection with certain acquisitions. Our Board of Directors has approved the following authorizations to repurchase
common stock: (1) March 2013 authorization program of 300 million shares, which was completed in 2020 and (2) March 2014
authorization program for an additional 300 million shares, with approximately 178 million outstanding at December 31, 2020.
To implement these authorizations, we used open market repurchases, relying on Rule 10b5-1 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934,
where feasible. We also used accelerated share repurchase agreements with large financial institutions to repurchase our stock. During
2020, we repurchased approximately 142 million shares totaling $5,278 under the March 2013 and March 2014 authorizations.
Dividend Declarations In December 2020, AT&T declared a quarterly preferred dividend of $36 and a quarterly common dividend of
$0.52 per share of common stock. In December 2019, AT&T declared a quarterly preferred dividend of $8 and an increase in its quarterly
common dividend to $0.52 per share of common stock.
Preferred Interests Issued by Subsidiaries We have issued cumulative perpetual preferred membership interests in certain subsidiaries.
The preferred interests are entitled to cash distributions, subject to declaration. The preferred interests are included in “Noncontrolling
interest” on the consolidated balance sheets.
Mobility II
We previously issued 320 million Series A Cumulative Perpetual Preferred Membership Interests in Mobility II (Mobility preferred
interests), representing all currently outstanding Mobility preferred equity interests, which pay cash distributions of $560 per annum,
subject to declaration. So long as the distributions are declared and paid, the terms of the Mobility preferred equity interests will not
impose any limitations on cash movements between affiliates, or our ability to declare a dividend on or repurchase AT&T shares.
A holder of the Mobility preferred interests may put the interests to Mobility II. Mobility II may redeem the interests upon a change in
control of Mobility II or on or after September 9, 2022. When either options arise due to a passage of time, that option may be exercised
only during certain periods.
The price at which a put option or a redemption option can be exercised is the greater of (1) the market value of the interests as of the last
date of the quarter preceding the date of the exercise of a put or redemption option and (2) the sum of (a) twenty-five dollars ($8,000 in
the aggregate) plus (b) any accrued and unpaid distributions. The redemption price may be paid with cash, AT&T common stock, or a
combination of cash and AT&T common stock, at Mobility II’s sole election. In no event shall Mobility II be required to deliver more
than 250 million shares of AT&T common stock to settle put and redemption options. We have the intent and ability to settle the
Mobility preferred equity interests with cash.
120
AT&T Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
Tower Holdings
In 2019, we issued $6,000 nonconvertible cumulative preferred interests in a wireless subsidiary (Tower Holdings) that holds interests in
various tower assets and have the right to receive approximately $6,000 if the purchase options from the tower companies are exercised.
The membership interests in Tower Holdings consist of (1) common interests, which are held by a consolidated subsidiary of AT&T, and
(2) two series of preferred interests (collectively the “Tower preferred interests”). The September series (Class A-1) of the preferred
interests totals $1,500 and pays an initial preferred distribution of 5.0%, and the December series (Class A-2) totals $4,500 and pays an
initial preferred distribution of 4.75%. Distributions are paid quarterly, subject to declaration, and reset every five years. Any failure to
declare or pay distributions on the Tower preferred interests would not impose any limitation on cash movements between affiliates, or
our ability to declare a dividend on or repurchase AT&T shares. We can call the Tower preferred interests at the issue price beginning
five years from the issuance date or upon the receipt of proceeds from the sale of the underlying assets.
The holders of the Tower preferred interests have the option to require redemption upon the occurrence of certain contingent events, such
as the failure of AT&T to pay the preferred distribution for two or more periods or to meet certain other requirements, including a
minimum credit rating. If notice is given upon such an event, all other holders of equal or more subordinate classes of membership
interests in Tower Holdings are entitled to receive the same form of consideration payable to the holders of the preferred interests,
resulting in a deemed liquidation for accounting purposes.
Telco LLC
In September 2020, we issued $2,000 nonconvertible cumulative preferred interests out of a newly created limited liability company
(Telco LLC) that was formed to hold telecommunication-related assets.
Members’ equity in Telco LLC consist of (1) member’s interests, which are held by a consolidated subsidiary of AT&T, and (2) preferred
interests (Telco preferred interests), which pay an initial preferred distribution of 4.25% annually, subject to declaration, and subject to
reset every seven years. Failure to pay distributions on the Telco preferred interests would not limit cash movements between affiliates,
or our ability to declare a dividend on or repurchase AT&T shares. We can call the Telco preferred interests at the issue price beginning
seven years from the issuance date.
The holders of the Telco preferred interests have the option to require redemption upon the occurrence of certain contingent events, such
as the failure of Telco LLC to pay the preferred distribution for two or more periods or to meet certain other requirements, including a
minimum credit rating. If notice is given, all other holders of equal or more subordinate classes of members equity are entitled to receive
the same form of consideration payable to the holders of the preferred interests, resulting in a deemed liquidation for accounting
purposes.
PR Holdings
In 2019, we issued $1,950 nonconvertible cumulative preferred interests in a subsidiary (PR Holdings) that held notes secured by the
proceeds from our agreement to sell wireless and wireline operations in Puerto Rico and the U.S. Virgin Islands. These preferred interests
were redeemed on November 6, 2020. (See Note 6)
The membership interests in PR Holdings consisted of (1) common interests, which were held by consolidated subsidiaries of AT&T, and
(2) preferred interests (PR preferred interests). The PR preferred interests paid an initial preferred distribution at an annual rate of 4.75%.
Distributions were paid quarterly, subject to declaration.
NOTE 18. SALES OF RECEIVABLES
We have agreements with various third-party financial institutions pertaining to the sales of certain types of our accounts receivable. The
most significant of these programs are discussed in detail below and generally consist of (1) receivables arising from equipment
installment plans, which are sold for cash and a deferred purchase price, and (2) revolving service and trade receivables. Under these
programs, we transfer receivables to purchasers in exchange for cash and additional consideration upon settlement of the receivables,
where applicable. Under the terms of our agreements for these programs, we continue to bill and collect the payments from our
customers on behalf of the financial institutions.
121
AT&T Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
The sales of receivables did not have a material impact on our consolidated statements of income or to “Total Assets” reported on our
consolidated balance sheets. We reflect cash receipts on sold receivables as cash flows from operations in our consolidated statements of
cash flows. Cash receipts on the deferred purchase price are classified as cash flows from investing activities.
Our equipment installment and revolving receivables programs are discussed in detail below. The following table sets forth a summary of
the receivables and accounts being serviced at December 31:
2020 2019
Equipment
Installment RevolvingEquipment
Installment Revolving
Gross receivables: $ 5,565 $ 3,909 $ 4,576 $ 3,324 
Balance sheet classification
Accounts receivable
Notes receivable 2,716 — 2,467 — 
Trade receivables 554 3,715 477 2,809 
Other Assets
Noncurrent notes and trade receivables 2,295 194 1,632 515 
Outstanding portfolio of receivables derecognized from
our consolidated balance sheets 7,827 5,300 9,713 4,300 
Cash proceeds received, net of remittances 5,646 5,300 7,211 4,300 
Represents amounts to which financial institutions remain entitled, excluding the deferred purchase price.
Equipment Installment Receivables Program
We offer our customers the option to purchase certain wireless devices in installments over a specified period of time and, in many cases,
once certain conditions are met, they may be eligible to trade in the original equipment for a new device and have the remaining unpaid
balance paid or settled.
We maintain a program under which we transfer a portion of these receivables through our bankruptcy-remote subsidiary in exchange for
cash and additional consideration upon settlement of the receivables, referred to as the deferred purchase price. In the event a customer
trades in a device prior to the end of the installment contract period, we agree to make a payment to the financial institutions equal to any
outstanding remaining installment receivable balance. Accordingly, we record a guarantee obligation for this estimated amount at the
time the receivables are transferred.
The following table sets forth a summary of equipment installment receivables sold under this program:
2020 2019 2018
Gross receivables sold $ 7,270 $ 9,921 $ 9,391 
Net receivables sold 7,026 9,483 8,871 
Cash proceeds received 6,089 8,189 7,488 
Deferred purchase price recorded 1,021 1,451 1,578 
Guarantee obligation recorded 157 341 361 
Receivables net of allowance, imputed interest and equipment trade-in right guarantees.
The deferred purchase price and guarantee obligation are initially recorded at estimated fair value and subsequently adjusted for changes
in present value of expected cash flows. The estimation of their fair values is based on remaining installment payments expected to be
collected and the expected timing and value of device trade-ins. The estimated value of the device trade-ins considers prices offered to us
by independent third parties that contemplate changes in value after the launch of a device model. The fair value measurements used for
the deferred purchase price and the guarantee obligation are considered Level 3 under the Fair Value Measurement and Disclosure
framework (see Note 13).1
1
1
1
122
AT&T Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
The following table presents the previously transferred equipment installment receivables, which we repurchased in exchange for the
associated deferred purchase price:
2020 2019 2018
Fair value of repurchased receivables $ 1,271 $ 1,418 $ 1,480 
Carrying value of deferred purchase price 1,235 1,350 1,393 
Gain on repurchases $ 36 $ 68 $ 87 
These gains are included in “Selling, general and administrative” in the consolidated statements of income.
At December 31, 2020 and December 31, 2019, our deferred purchase price receivable was $1,991 and $2,336, respectively, of which
$1,476 and $1,569 are included in “Other current assets” on our consolidated balance sheets, with the remainder in “Other Assets.” The
guarantee obligation at December 31, 2020 and December 31, 2019 was $228 and $384, respectively, of which $161 and $148 are
included in “Accounts payable and accrued liabilities” on our consolidated balance sheets, with the remainder in “Other noncurrent
liabilities.” Our maximum exposure to loss as a result of selling these equipment installment receivables is limited to the total amount of
our deferred purchase price and guarantee obligation.
Revolving Receivables Program
In 2019, we entered into a one-year revolving agreement to transfer up to $4,300 of certain receivables through our bankruptcy-remote
subsidiaries to various financial institutions on a recurring basis in exchange for cash equal to the gross receivables transferred. In 2020,
we expanded the program limit to $5,300 and we extended the agreement by one year. As customers pay their balances, we transfer
additional receivables into the program, resulting in our gross receivables sold exceeding net cash flow impacts (e.g., collect and
reinvest). The transferred receivables are fully guaranteed by our bankruptcy-remote subsidiaries, which hold additional receivables in
the amount of $3,909 that are pledged as collateral under this agreement. The transfers are recorded at fair value of the proceeds received
and obligations assumed less derecognized receivables. The obligation is subsequently adjusted for changes in estimated expected credit
losses and interest rates. Our maximum exposure to loss related to these receivables transferred is limited to the amount outstanding.
The fair value measurement used for the obligation is considered Level 3 under the Fair Value Measurement and Disclosure framework
(see Note 13).
The following table sets forth a summary of receivables sold:
2020 2019 2018
Gross receivables sold/cash proceeds received $ 15,888 $ 11,989 $ — 
Collections reinvested under revolving agreement 14,888 7,689 — 
Net cash proceeds received (remitted) $ 1,000 $ 4,300 $ — 
Net receivables sold $ 15,760 $ 11,604 $ — 
Obligations recorded (reversed) 271 530 — 
Includes initial sale of receivables of $ 1,000  and $ 4,300  for 2020 and 2019, respectively .
Receivables net of allowance, return and incentive reserves and imputed interest.
NOTE 19. TOWER TRANSACTION
In December 2013, we closed our transaction with Crown Castle International Corp. (Crown Castle) in which Crown Castle gained the
exclusive rights to lease and operate 9,048 wireless towers and purchased 627 of our wireless towers for $4,827 in cash. The leases have
various terms with an average length of approximately 28 years. As the leases expire, Crown Castle will have fixed price purchase
options for these towers totaling approximately $4,200, based on their estimated fair market values at the end of the lease terms. We
sublease space on the towers from Crown Castle for an initial term of ten years at current market rates, subject to optional renewals in the
future.
We determined that we did not transfer control of the tower assets, which prevented us from achieving sale-leaseback accounting for the
transaction, and we accounted for the cash proceeds from Crown Castle as a financing obligation on our consolidated balance sheets. We
record interest on the financing obligation using the effective interest method at a rate of approximately 3.9%. The financing obligation is
increased by interest expense and estimated future net cash flows generated1
1
1
2
1
2
123
AT&T Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
and retained by Crown Castle from operation of the tower sites, and reduced by our contractual payments. We continue to include the
tower assets in “Property, Plant and Equipment - Net” on our consolidated balance sheets and depreciate them accordingly. At
December 31, 2020 and 2019, the tower assets had a balance of $764 and $804, respectively. Our depreciation expense for these assets
was $39 for each of 2020, 2019 and 2018.
Payments made to Crown Castle under this arrangement were $248 for 2020. At December 31, 2020, the future minimum payments
under the sublease arrangement are $253 for 2021, $258 for 2022, $264 for 2023, $269 for 2024, $274 for 2025 and $856 thereafter.
NOTE 20. FIRSTNET
In 2017, the First Responder Network Authority (FirstNet) selected AT&T to build and manage the first nationwide broadband network
dedicated to America’s first responders. Under the 25-year agreement, FirstNet provides 20 MHz of valuable telecommunications
spectrum and success-based payments of $6,500 over the first five years to support network buildout. We are required to construct a
network that achieves coverage and nationwide interoperability requirements and have a contractual commitment to make sustainability
payments of $18,000 over the 25-year contract. These sustainability payments represent our commitment to fund FirstNet’s operating
expenses and future reinvestments in the network which we own and operate, which we estimate in the $3,000 or less range over the life
of the 25-year contract. After FirstNet’s operating expenses are paid, we anticipate the remaining amount, expected to be in the $15,000
range, will be reinvested into the network.
During 2020, we submitted $120 in sustainability payments, with future payments under the agreement of $120 for 2021; $195 for 2022,
2023, 2024 and 2025; and $16,620 thereafter. Amounts paid to FirstNet, which are not expected to be returned to AT&T to be reinvested
into our network, will be expensed in the period paid. In the event FirstNet does not reinvest any funds to construct, operate, improve and
maintain this network, our maximum exposure to loss is the total amount of the sustainability payments, which would be reflected in
higher expense.
The $6,500 of initial funding from FirstNet is contingent on the achievement of six operating capability milestones and certain first
responder subscriber adoption targets. These milestones are based on coverage objectives of the first responder network during the
construction period, which is expected to be over five years, and subscriber adoption targets. Funding payments to be received from
FirstNet are reflected as a reduction from the costs capitalized in the construction of the network and, as appropriate, a reduction of
associated operating expenses. As of December 31, 2020, we have collected approximately $5,000 for the completion of certain tasks
and anticipate collecting the remainder of the $6,500 as we achieve milestones set out by FirstNet over the next two years. We also
expect to receive approximately $200 over the next few years from FirstNet for reinvestment above the original success-based payments.
NOTE 21. CONTINGENT LIABILITIES
We are party to numerous lawsuits, regulatory proceedings and other matters arising in the ordinary course of business. In evaluating
these matters on an ongoing basis, we take into account amounts already accrued on the balance sheet. In our opinion, although the
outcomes of these proceedings are uncertain, they should not have a material adverse effect on our financial position, results of
operations or cash flows.
We have contractual obligations to purchase certain goods or services from various other parties. Our purchase obligations are expected
to be approximately $20,274 in 2021, $21,275 in total for 2022 and 2023, $11,142 in total for 2024 and 2025 and $17,919 in total for
years thereafter.
See Note 13 for a discussion of collateral and credit-risk contingencies.
124
AT&T Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
NOTE 22. ADDITIONAL FINANCIAL INFORMATION
December 31,
Consolidated Balance Sheets 2020 2019
Accounts payable and accrued liabilities:
Accounts payable $ 31,836 $ 29,640 
Accrued payroll and commissions 2,988 3,126 
Current portion of employee benefit obligation 1,415 1,528 
Accrued participations and residuals 2,708 2,852 
Accrued interest 2,454 2,498 
Other 7,631 6,312 
Total accounts payable and accrued liabilities $ 49,032 $ 45,956 
Consolidated Statements of Income 2020 2019 2018
Advertising expense $ 5,253 $ 6,121 $ 5,100 
Interest expense incurred $ 8,048 $ 8,622 $ 8,450 
Capitalized interest (123) (200) (493)
Total interest expense $ 7,925 $ 8,422 $ 7,957 
Cash and Cash Flows We typically maintain our restricted cash balances for purchases and sales of certain investment securities and
funding of certain deferred compensation benefit payments.
The following table summarizes cash and cash equivalents and restricted cash balances contained on our consolidated balance sheets:
December 31,
Cash and Cash Equivalents and Restricted Cash 2020 2019 2018 2017
Cash and cash equivalents $ 9,740 $ 12,130 $ 5,204 $ 50,498 
Restricted cash in Other current assets 9 69 61 6 
Restricted cash in Other Assets 121 96 135 428 
Cash and cash equivalents and restricted cash $ 9,870 $ 12,295 $ 5,400 $ 50,932 
The following table summarizes cash paid during the periods for interest and income taxes:
Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows 2020 2019 2018
Cash paid (received) during the year for:
Interest $ 8,237 $ 8,693 $ 8,818 
Income taxes, net of refunds 993 1,421 (354)
Spectrum acquisitions 1,613 1,576 521 
Noncash Investing and Financing Activities In connection with capital improvements and the acquisition of other productive assets,
we negotiate favorable payment terms (referred to as vendor financing), which are reported as financing activities in our statements of
cash flows when paid. We recorded $4,664 of vendor financing commitments related to capital investments in 2020, $2,632 in 2019 and
$2,162 in 2018.
125
AT&T Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
Labor Contracts As of January 31, 2021, we employed approximately 230,000 persons. Approximately 37% of our employees are
represented by the Communications Workers of America (CWA), the International Brotherhood of Electrical Workers (IBEW) or other
unions. After expiration of the agreements, work stoppages or labor disruptions may occur in the absence of new contracts or other
agreements being reached. There are no significant contracts expiring in 2021. A contract covering approximately 14,000 Mobility
employees in 36 states and the District of Columbia that was set to expire in February 2021 was extended until February 2022. A
contract covering approximately 10,000 Mobility employees in nine Southeast states that was set to expire in February 2022 was
extended until February 2023.
NOTE 23. SUBSEQUENT EVENTS (UNAUDITED)
Video Business On February 25, 2021, we signed an agreement to form a new company named DIRECTV (New DTV) with TPG
Capital, which will be jointly governed by a board with representation from both AT&T and TPG. Under the agreement, we will
contribute our Video business unit to New DTV for $4,250 of junior preferred units, an additional distribution preference of $4,200 and a
70% economic interest in common units. We expect to receive $7,600 in cash from New DTV at closing. TPG will contribute
approximately $1,800 in cash to New DTV for $1,800 of senior preferred units and a 30% economic interest in common units. The
remaining $5,800 will be funded by debt taken on by New DTV. As part of this transaction, we agreed to pay net losses under the NFL
SUNDAY TICKET contract up to a cap of $2,500 over the remaining period of the contract.
The transaction is expected to close in the second half of 2021, pending customary closing conditions. The total of $7,600 of proceeds
from the transaction are expected to reduce our total and net debt positions.
In the first quarter of 2021, we expect to apply held-for-sale accounting treatment to the assets and liabilities of the U.S. video business,
and accordingly will include the assets in “Other current assets,” and the related liabilities in “Accounts payable and accrued liabilities,”
on our consolidated balance sheet at March 31, 2021. The carrying amounts at December 31, 2020 of these assets and liabilities were
approximately $16,150 and $4,900, respectively.
Spectrum Auction On February 24, 2021, the FCC announced that AT&T was the winning bidder for 1,621 C-Band licenses, comprised
of a total of 80 MHz nationwide, including 40 MHz in Phase I. We must provide to the FCC an initial down payment of $4,681 on March
10, 2021, of which $550 was paid as an upfront payment prior to the start of the auction, and to pay a remaining $18,725 on or before
March 24, 2021. We estimate that AT&T will be responsible for $955 of Incentive Payments upon clearing of Phase I spectrum and
$2,112 upon clearing of Phase II spectrum. Additionally, we will be responsible for a portion of compensable relocation costs over the
next several years as the spectrum is being cleared. Satellite operators have provided the FCC with relocation cost estimates totaling
$3,400. AT&T intends to fund the purchase price using a combination of cash and short-term investments, funds from operations and
either short-term or long-term debt, depending upon market conditions.
126
AT&T Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
ITEM 9. CHANGES IN AND DISAGREEMENTS WITH ACCOUNTANTS ON ACCOUNTING AND FINANCIAL
DISCLOSURE
During our two most recent fiscal years, there has been no change in the independent accountant engaged as the principal accountant to
audit our financial statements, and the independent accountant has not expressed reliance on other independent accountants in its reports
during such time period.
ITEM 9A. CONTROLS AND PROCEDURES
Disclosure Controls and Procedures
The registrant maintains disclosure controls and procedures that are designed to ensure that information required to be disclosed by the
registrant is recorded, processed, summarized, accumulated and communicated to its management, including its principal executive and
principal financial officers, to allow timely decisions regarding required disclosure, and reported within the time periods specified in the
SEC’s rules and forms. The Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer have performed an evaluation of the effectiveness of the
design and operation of the registrant’s disclosure controls and procedures as of December 31, 2020. Based on that evaluation, the Chief
Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer concluded that the registrant’s disclosure controls and procedures were effective as of
December 31, 2020.
There have not been any changes in our internal control over financial reporting during our most recent fiscal quarter that have materially
affected, or are reasonably likely to materially affect, our internal control over financial reporting. Due to the COVID-19 pandemic, most
of our corporate employees are working remotely. We continue to monitor and assess the impact of the COVID-19 situation on our
internal control over financial reporting to address any potential impact on its design and operating effectiveness.
Internal Control Over Financial Reporting
a.Management’s Annual Report on Internal Control over Financial Reporting
The management of AT&T is responsible for establishing and maintaining adequate internal control over financial reporting. AT&T’s
internal control system was designed to provide reasonable assurance as to the integrity and reliability of the published financial
statements. AT&T management assessed the effectiveness of the company’s internal control over financial reporting as of December 31,
2020. In making this assessment, it used the criteria set forth by the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway
Commission (COSO) in Internal Control – Integrated Framework (2013 framework). Based on its assessment, AT&T management
believes that, as of December 31, 2020, the Company’s internal control over financial reporting is effective based on those criteria.
b.Attestation Report of the Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm
The independent registered public accounting firm that audited the financial statements included in the Annual Report containing the
disclosure required by this Item, Ernst & Young LLP, has issued an attestation report on the Company’s internal control over financial
reporting.
ITEM 9B. OTHER INFORMATION
There is no information that was required to be disclosed in a report on Form 8-K during the fourth quarter of 2020 but was not reported.
127
AT&T Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
PART III
ITEM 10. DIRECTORS, EXECUTIVE OFFICERS AND CORPORATE GOVERNANCE
Information regarding executive officers required by Item 401 of Regulation S-K is furnished in a separate disclosure at the end of Part I
of this report entitled “Information about our Executive Officers.” Information regarding directors required by Item 401 of Regulation S-
K is incorporated herein by reference pursuant to General Instruction G(3) from the registrant’s 2021 definitive proxy statement (Proxy
Statement) under the heading “Management Proposal Item No. 1. Election of Directors.”
Information required by Item 405 of Regulation S-K is incorporated herein by reference pursuant to General Instruction G(3) from the
registrant’s Proxy Statement under the heading “Delinquent Section 16(a) Reports.”
The registrant has a separately-designated standing audit committee established in accordance with Section 3(a)(58)(A) of the Securities
Exchange Act of 1934. The members of the committee are Messrs. Di Piazza, Jr., Luczo and McCallister, and Ms. Taylor. The additional
information required by Item 407(d)(5) of Regulation S-K is incorporated herein by reference pursuant to General Instruction G(3) from
the registrant’s Proxy Statement under the heading “Audit Committee.”
The registrant has adopted a code of ethics entitled “Code of Ethics” that applies to the registrant’s principal executive officer, principal
financial officer, principal accounting officer, or controller or persons performing similar functions. The additional information required
by Item 406 of Regulation S-K is provided in this report under the heading “General” under Part I, Item 1. Business.
ITEM 11. EXECUTIVE COMPENSATION
Information required by this Item is incorporated herein by reference pursuant to General Instruction G(3) from the registrant’s Proxy
Statement under the headings “Director Compensation,” “CEO Pay Ratio,” and the pages beginning with the heading “Compensation
Discussion and Analysis” and ending with, and including, the pages under the heading “Potential Payments upon Change in Control.”
Information required by Item 407(e)(5) of Regulation S-K is included in the registrant’s Proxy Statement under the heading
“Compensation Committee Report” and is incorporated herein by reference pursuant to General Instruction G(3) and shall be deemed
furnished in this Annual Report on Form 10-K and will not be deemed incorporated by reference into any filing under the Securities Act
of 1933 or the Securities Exchange Act of 1934.
128
AT&T Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
ITEM 12. SECURITY OWNERSHIP OF CERTAIN BENEFICIAL OWNERS AND MANAGEMENT AND RELATED
STOCKHOLDER MATTERS
Information required by Item 403 of Regulation S-K is included in the registrant’s Proxy Statement under the heading “Common Stock
Ownership,” which is incorporated herein by reference pursuant to General Instruction G(3).
Equity Compensation Plan Information
The following table provides information as of December 31, 2020, concerning shares of AT&T common stock authorized for issuance
under AT&T’s existing equity compensation plans.
Equity Compensation Plan Information
Plan CategoryNumber of securities to be
issued upon
 exercise of 
 outstanding options,
warrants and rights 
 (a)Weighted average 
 exercise price of outstanding
options, warrants 
 and rights
 (b)Number of securities
 remaining available for
future issuance under
equity compensation plans
(excluding securities
reflected in column (a))
(c)
Equity compensation plans approved by
security holders 62,588,998$ 29.14 163,041,595 
Equity compensation plans not approved
by security holders — — — 
Total 62,588,998 $ 29.14 163,041,595 
Includes the issuance of stock in connection with the following stockholder approved plans: (a) 673,612 stock options under the
Stock Purchase and Deferral Plan (SPDP), (b) 507,631 phantom stock units under the Stock Savings Plan (SSP), 13,777,944
phantom stock units under the SPDP, 1,670,691 restricted stock units under the 2011 Incentive Plan, 1,559,312 restricted stock units
under the 2016 Incentive Plan and 2,467,052 restricted stock units under the 2018 Incentive Plan, (c) 0 target number of stock-settled
performance shares under the 2011 Incentive Plan, 20,370,670 target number of stock-settled performance shares under the 2016
Incentive Plan, and 18,470,269 target number of stock-settled performance shares under the 2018 Incentive Plan. At payout, the
target number of performance shares may be reduced to zero or increased by up to 150%. Each phantom stock unit and performance
share is settleable in stock on a 1-to-1 basis. The weighted-average exercise price in the table does not include outstanding
performance shares or phantom stock units.
The SSP was approved by stockholders in 1994 and then was amended by the Board of Directors in 2000 to increase the number of
shares available for purchase under the plan (including shares from the Company match and reinvested dividend equivalents).
Stockholder approval was not required for the amendment. To the extent applicable, the amount shown for approved plans in column
(a), in addition to the above amounts, includes 3,091,816 phantom stock units (computed on a first-in-first-out basis) that were
approved by the Board in 2000. Under the SSP, shares could be purchased with payroll deductions and reinvested dividend
equivalents by mid-level and above managers and limited Company partial matching contributions. No new contributions may be
made to the plan.
Includes 31,596,279 shares that may be issued under the SPDP, 128,769,042 shares that may be issued under the 2018 Incentive
Plan, and up to 2,676,274 shares that may be purchased through reinvestment of dividends on phantom shares held in the SSP.
Does not include certain stock options issued by companies acquired by AT&T that were converted into options to acquire AT&T
stock. As of December 31, 2020, there were 5,398,646 shares of AT&T common stock subject to the converted options, having a
weighted-average exercise price of $18.16. Also, does not include 1,437,871 outstanding phantom stock units that were issued by
companies acquired by AT&T that are convertible into stock on a 1-to-1 basis, along with an estimated 111,160 shares that may be
purchased with reinvested dividend equivalents paid on the outstanding phantom stock units. No further phantom stock units, other
than reinvested dividends, may be issued under the assumed plans. The weighted-average exercise price in the table does not include
outstanding performance shares or phantom stock units.(1) (2)
(3) (2)
(1)
(2)
(3)
129
AT&T Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
ITEM 13. CERTAIN RELATIONSHIPS AND RELATED TRANSACTIONS, AND DIRECTOR INDEPENDENCE
Information required by Item 404 of Regulation S-K is included in the registrant’s Proxy Statement under the heading “Related Person
Transactions,” which is incorporated herein by reference pursuant to General Instruction G(3). Information required by Item 407(a) of
Regulation S-K is included in the registrant’s Proxy Statement under the heading “Director Independence,” which is incorporated herein
by reference pursuant to General Instruction G(3).
ITEM 14. PRINCIPAL ACCOUNTANT FEES AND SERVICES
Information required by this Item is included in the registrant’s Proxy Statement under the heading “Principal Accountant Fees and
Services,” which is incorporated herein by reference pursuant to General Instruction G(3).
Part IV
ITEM 15. EXHIBITS and FINANCIAL STATEMENT SCHEDULES
(a)Documents filed as a part of the report:
Page
(1) Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm 62
Financial Statements covered by Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm:
Consolidated Statements of Income 66
Consolidated Statements of Comprehensive Income 67
Consolidated Balance Sheets 68
Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows 69
Consolidated Statements of Changes in Stockholders’ Equity 70
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements 72
(2) Financial Statement Schedules:
II - Valuation and Qualifying Accounts 134
Financial statement schedules other than those listed above have been omitted because the required information is contained in the
financial statements and notes thereto, or because such schedules are not required or applicable.
(3) Exhibits:
Exhibits identified in parentheses below, on file with the SEC, are incorporated herein by reference as exhibits hereto. Unless
otherwise indicated, all exhibits so incorporated are from File No. 1-8610.
Exhibit
Number
3-a Restated Certificate of Incorporation, filed with the Secretary of State of Delaware on December 13, 2013
(Exhibit 3.1 to Form 8-K filed on December 16, 2013)
3-b Bylaws (Exhibit 3.1 to Form 8-K filed on June 26, 2020)
3-c Certificate of Designations with respect to Series A Preferred Stock (Exhibit 3.1 to Form 8-K filed on
December 12, 2019)
3-d Certificate of Designations with respect to Series B Preferred Stock (Exhibit 3.1 to Form 8-K filed on February
18, 2020)
3-e Certificate of Designations with respect to Series C Preferred Stock (Exhibit 3.2 to Form 8-K filed on February
18, 2020)
4-a No instrument which defines the rights of holders of long-term debt of the registrant and all of its consolidated
subsidiaries is filed herewith pursuant to Regulation S-K, Item 601(b)(4)(iii)(A), except for the instruments
referred to in 4-b, 4-c, 4-d, 4-e, 4-f below. Pursuant to this regulation, the registrant hereby agrees to furnish a
copy of any such instrument not filed herewith to the SEC upon request.
4-b Guaranty of certain obligations of Pacific Bell Telephone Co. and Southwestern Bell Telephone Co. (Exhibit
4-c to Form 10-K for the period ending December 31, 2011)
130
AT&T Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
4-c Guaranty of certain obligations of Ameritech Capital Funding Corp., Indiana Bell Telephone Co. Inc.,
Michigan Bell Telephone Co., Pacific Bell Telephone Co., Southwestern Bell Telephone Company, Illinois
Bell Telephone Company, The Ohio Bell Telephone Company, The Southern New England Telephone
Company, Southern New England Telecommunications Corporation, and Wisconsin Bell, Inc. (Exhibit 4-d to
Form 10-K for the period ending December 31, 2011)
4-d Guarantee of certain obligations of AT&T Corp. (Exhibit 4-e to Form 10-K for the period ending December
31, 2011)
4-e Indenture, dated as of May 15, 2013, between AT&T Inc. and The Bank of New York Mellon Trust Company,
N.A., as Trustee (Exhibit 4.1 to Form 8-K filed on May 15, 2013)
4-f Indenture dated as of November 1, 1994 between SBC Communications Inc. and The Bank of New York, as
Trustee (Exhibit 4-h to Form 10-K for the period ending December 31, 2013)
4-g Deposit Agreement, dated December 12, 2019, among the AT&T Inc., Computershare Inc. and Computershare
Trust Company, N.A., collectively, as depositary, and the holders from time to time of the depository receipts
described therein (Exhibit 4.3 to Form 8-K filed December 12, 2019)
4-h Deposit Agreement, dated February 18, 2020, among the Company, Computershare Inc. and Computershare
Trust Company, N.A., collectively, as depositary, and the holders from time to time of the depositary receipts
described therein (Exhibit 4.3 to Form 8-K filed February 18, 2020)
4-i Description of AT&T’s Securities Registered Under Section 12 of the Exchange Act
10-a 2018 Incentive Plan (Exhibit 10-a to Form 10-K for the period ending December 31, 2017)*
10-b 2016 Incentive Plan (Exhibit 10-a to Form 10-Q for the period ending March 31, 2016)*
10-b(i)Resolution Regarding John Stankey (Exhibit 10-b to Form 10-Q for the period ending September
30, 2017)*
10-b(ii)Resolution Regarding John Stephens (Exhibit 10-c to Form 10-Q for the period ending September
30, 2017)*
10-c 2011 Incentive Plan (Exhibit 10-a to Form 10-Q for the period ending September 30, 2015)*
10-d Short Term Incentive Plan (Exhibit 10.1 to Form 8-K filed on February 2, 2018)*
10-e Supplemental Life Insurance Plan (Exhibit 10.1 to Form 8-K filed on June 26, 2020)*
10-f Supplemental Retirement Income Plan (Exhibit 10-e to Form 10-K for the period ending December 31, 2013)*
10-g 2005 Supplemental Employee Retirement Plan (Exhibit 10-g to Form 10-K for the period ending December
31, 2019)*
10-h Salary and Incentive Award Deferral Plan (Exhibit 10-k to Form 10-K for the period ending December 31,
2011)*
10-i Stock Savings Plan (Exhibit 10-l to Form 10-K for the period ending December 31, 2011)*
10-j Stock Purchase and Deferral Plan effective January 1, 2020 (Exhibit 10-j(i) to Form 10-K for the period
ending December 31, 2019)*
10-k Cash Deferral Plan effective January 1, 2020 (Exhibit 10-k(i) to Form 10-K for the period ending December
31, 2019)*
10-l Master Trust Agreement for AT&T Inc. Deferred Compensation Plans and Other Executive Benefit Plans and
subsequent amendments dated August 1, 1995 and November 1, 1999 (Exhibit 10-dd to Form 10-K for the
period ending December 31, 2009)*
10-m Officer Disability Plan (Exhibit 10-i to Form 10-Q for the period ending June 30, 2009)*
10-n AT&T Inc. Health Plan (Exhibit 10.3 to Form 10-Q for the period ending September 30, 2020)*
10-o Pension Benefit Makeup Plan No.1 (Exhibit 10-n to Form 10-K for the period ending December 31, 2016)*
10-p AT&T Inc. Equity Retention and Hedging Policy (Exhibit 10.2 to Form 8-K filed on December 16, 2011)
10-q Administrative Plan (Exhibit 10-q to Form 10-K for the period ending December 31, 2019*
10-r AT&T Inc. Non-Employee Director Stock and Deferral Plan (Exhibit 10-r to Form 10-K for the period ending
December 31, 2018)*
10-s AT&T Inc. Non-Employee Director Stock Purchase Plan (Exhibit 10-t to Form 10-K for the period ending
December 31, 2013)*
10-t AT&T Inc. Board of Directors Communications Concession Program (Exhibit 10-aa to Form 10-K for the
period ending December 31, 2012)
131
AT&T Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
10-u Form of Indemnity Agreement, effective July 1, 1986, between Southwestern Bell Corporation (now AT&T
Inc.) and its directors and officers. (Exhibit 10-bb to Form 10-K for the period ending December 31, 2011)*
10-v AT&T Executive Physical Program (Exhibit 10-ff to Form 10-K for the period ending December 31, 2016)*
10-w Attorney Fee Payment Agreement for John Stankey (Exhibit 10.1 to Form 8-K filed on July 3, 2018)*
10-x Agreement between Jason Kilar and WarnerMedia LLC (Exhibit 10.2 to Form 10-Q for the period ending June
30, 2020)*
10-y $7,500,000,000 Amended and Restated Credit Agreement, dated as of November 17, 2020, among AT&T Inc.,
certain lenders named therein and Citibank, N.A., as agent. (Exhibit 10.1 to Form 8-K filed on November 18,
2020)
10-z $7,500,000,000 Five Year Credit Agreement, dated as of December 11, 2018, among AT&T Inc., certain
lenders named therein and Citibank, N.A., as agent (Exhibit 10.2 to Form 8-K filed on December 13, 2018)
10-aa Amendment No. 1 to the $7,500,000,000 Five Year Credit Agreement, dated December 11, 2018, among
AT&T, certain lenders named therein and Citibank, N.A., as agent. (Exhibit 10.2 to Form 8-K filed on
November 18, 2020)
10-bb Amended and Restated Contribution Agreement (Exhibit 10-ee to Form 10-K for the period ending December
31, 2018)
10-cc Fifth Amended and Restated Limited Liability Company Agreement of Mobility II LLC (Exhibit 10-1 to Form
10-Q for the period ending September 30, 2020)
10-dd First Amendment to the Fourth Amended and Restated Limited Liability Company Agreement of Mobility II
LLC (Exhibit 10-gg to Form 10-K for the period ending December 31, 2018)
10-ee Second Amendment to the Fourth Amended and Restated Limited Liability Company Agreement of Mobility
II LLC (Exhibit 10-hh to Form 10-K for the period ending December 31, 2018)
10-ff Amended and Restated Registration Rights Agreement by and among AT&T Inc. and The SBC Master
Pension Trust and Brock Fiduciary Services LLC (Exhibit 10-ii to Form 10-K for the period ending December
31, 2018)
10-gg First Amendment to Amended and Restated Registration Rights Agreement by and among AT&T Inc. and The
SBC Master Pension Trust and Brock Fiduciary Services LLC (Exhibit 10.2 to Form 10-Q for the period
ending September 30, 2020)
10-hh Second Amended and Restated Limited Liability Company Agreement of NCWPCS MPL Holdings, LLC
(Exhibit 10.1 to Form 8-K filed on December 12, 2019)
10-ii AT&T Inc. Change in Control Severance Plan (Exhibit 10.1 to Form 8-K filed on June 30, 2014)*
10-jj Agreement of Contribution and Subscription, dated February 25, 2021 (Exhibit 10.1 to Form 8-K filed on
February 25, 2021)
21 Subsidiaries of AT&T Inc.
23 Consent of Ernst & Young LLP
24 Powers of Attorney
31 Rule 13a-14(a)/15d-14(a) Certifications
31.1 Certification of Principal Executive Officer
31.2 Certification of Principal Financial Officer
32 Section 1350 Certification
99 Supplemental Interim Financial Information
101 The consolidated financial statements from the Company’s Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2020,
as filed with the SEC on February 25, 2021, formatted in Inline XBRL: (i) Consolidated Statements of Cash
Flows, (ii) Consolidated Statements of Operations, (iii) Consolidated Statements of Comprehensive Income,
(iv) Consolidated Balance Sheets, and (v) Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements, tagged as blocks of text
and including detailed tags.
104 Cover Page Interactive Data File (formatted as Inline XBRL and contained in Exhibit 101)
*Management contracts and compensatory plans and arrangements required to be filed as exhibits pursuant to Item 15(b) of this report.
132
AT&T Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
We will furnish to stockholders upon request, and without charge, a copy of the Annual Report to Stockholders and the Proxy Statement,
portions of which are incorporated by reference in the Form 10-K. We will furnish any other exhibit at cost.
ITEM 16. FORM 10-K SUMMARY
None.
133
AT&T Inc.
Dollars in millions except per share amounts
SCHEDULE II - V ALUA TION AND QUALIFYING ACCOUNTS
Allowance for Cr edit Loss
COL. A COL. B COL. C COL. D COL. E
Additions
(1) (2) (3)
Balance at
Beginning of
PeriodCharged to 
 Costs and
Expenses (a)Charged to Other 
 Accounts (b) Acquisitions (c) Deductions (d)Balance at End 
of Period (e)
Year 2020 $ 1,235 1,972 405 — 2,023 $ 1,589 
Year 2019 $ 907 2,575 — — 2,247 $ 1,235 
Year 2018 $ 663 1,791 — 179 1,726 $ 907 
(a) Includes amounts previously written of f which were credited directly to this account when recovered.
Excludes direct char ges and credits to expense for nontrade receivables in the consolidated statements of income.
Includes the impact to operating expenses, for the year ended December 31, 2020, after adoption of ASC 326.
(b) Opening adjustments upon adoption of ASC 326, with modified retrospective application, as of January 1, 2020 (see Note 1).
(c) Acquisition of T ime W arner in 2018.
(d) Amounts written of f as uncollectible, or related to divested entities.
(e) Includes balances applicable to trade receivables, loans, contract assets and other assets subject to credit loss measurement (see Note 1).
SCHEDULE II - VALUATION AND QUALIFYING ACCOUNTS
Allowance for Deferred Tax Assets
COL. A COL. B COL. C COL. D COL. E
Additions
(1) (2) (3)
Balance at
Beginning of
PeriodCharged to 
 Costs and
ExpensesCharged to Other 
 Accounts (a)Acquisitions 
 (b)Deductions 
 (c)Balance at End 
of Period
Year 2020 $ 4,941 (168) — — — $ 4,773 
Year 2019 $ 4,588 (18) 371 — — $ 4,941 
Year 2018 $ 4,640 (210) (53) 211 — $ 4,588 
(a) Includes current year reclassifications from other balance sheet accounts.
(b) Acquisition of T ime W arner in 2018.
(c) Reductions to valuation allowances related to deferred tax assets.
134
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report
to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized, on the 25th day of February, 2021.
AT&T INC.
/s/ John J. Stephens
John J. Stephens
Senior Executive Vice President
   and Chief Financial Officer
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, this report has been signed below by the following persons on
behalf of the registrant and in the capacities and on the date indicated.
Principal Executive Officer:
John T. Stankey*
Chief Executive Officer
and President
Principal Financial and Accounting Officer:
John J. Stephens
Senior Executive Vice President
and Chief Financial Officer
/s/ John J. Stephens
John J. Stephens, as attorney-in-fact
and on his own behalf as Principal
Financial Officer and Principal
Accounting Officer
February 25, 2021
Directors:
John T. Stankey* Stephen J. Luczo*
Samuel A. Di Piazza, Jr.* Michael B. McCallister*
Richard W. Fisher* Beth E. Mooney*
Scott T. Ford* Matthew K. Rose*
Glenn H. Hutchins* Cynthia B. Taylor*
William E. Kennard* Geoffrey Y. Yang*
Debra L. Lee*
* by power of attorney
135
